<BODY DOCID=47>
inflation
plan, initially hailed at home and abroad as the saviour of the
economy, is limping towards its first anniversary amid soaring
prices, widespread shortages and a foreign payments crisis.
    Announced last February 28 the plan froze prices, fixed the
value of the new Cruzado currency and ended widespread
indexation of the economy in a bid to halt the country's 250
pct inflation rate.
    But within a year the plan has all but collapsed.
    "The situation now is worse than it was. Although there was
inflation, at least the economy worked," a leading bank
economist said.
    The crumbling of the plan has been accompanied by a
dramatic reversal in the foreign trade account. In 1984 and
1985 Brazil's annual trade surpluses had been sufficient to
cover the 12 billion dlrs needed to service its 109 billion dlr
foreign debt.
    For the first nine months of 1986 all seemed to be on
target for a repeat, with monthly surpluses averaging one
billion dlrs. But as exports were diverted and imports
increased to avoid further domestic shortages the trade surplus
plunged to 211 mln dlrs in October and since then has averaged
under 150 mln.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=271>
Japan's customs-cleared trade surplus in
the first 20 days of February jumped to 3.58 billion dlrs from
1.94 billion a year earlier, the Finance Ministry said.
    The February interim surplus was sharply up from a 965.04
mln dlr surplus in the same January period.
    FOB exports rose 14.6 pct from a year earlier in the first
20 days of February to 10.91 billion, while CIF imports fell
3.2 pct to 7.33 billion.
    The average dollar/yen rates were 152.32 for exports and
152.31 for imports against 196.61 for exports and 196.27 for
imports a year earlier.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=312>
South Korea plans to take steps to keep
its 1987 current account surplus below five billion dlrs,
Economic Planning Board Minister Kim Mahn-je said.
    Kim told reporters the government would repay loans ahead
of schedule and encourage firms to increase imports and
investment abroad to prevent the current account surplus from
rising too quickly.
    Last year South Korea's current account surplus was 4.65
billion dlrs. It widened to 622 mln dlrs in January from 484
mln in December and compared with a deficit of 334 mln in
January 1986, Bank of Korea figures show.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=338>
Sweden's ruling Social Democratic
Party gave full power to the government to decree unilateral
trade sanctions against South Africa, Prime Minister Ingvar
Calrsson said.
    Carlsson told a news conference the party decided the fight
against apartheid took priority over Sweden's traditional
policy of only adopting sanctions with the backing of the U.N.
Security Council.
    The government will decide later what form the trade
boycott will take and when it will come into force.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=342>
Japan and the U.S. Kick off top-level
trade talks tomorrow amid signs officials from both sides are
growing increasingly irritated with each other.
    The talks, held annually at sub-cabinet level to review the
whole gamut of U.S./Japan economic relations, will pave the way
for American Secretary of State George Schultz's one day
stop-over here at end-week on his way home from China.
    Faced with growing Congressional protectionist pressure,
the U.S. Administration is pressing Japan for speedy action to
reduce its still huge trade surplus, U.S. Officials said.
    "We appreciate their frustration," a senior Japanese
government official said. "But we are also frustrated."
    The official said the 40 pct rise of the yen over the last
18 months has hit Japan hard, forcing exporters to slash
spending and lay off workers to make up for lost sales abroad.
That has not yet shown up in dollar-based statistics on trade,
but it will, he said.
    He said the U.S. Administration was ignoring the progress
that has been made and instead emphasizing the problems that
remain when it talks with Congress.
    "It would only take five minutes to list their
accomplishments," a senior U.S. Official replied.
    The talks begin tomorrow with high-level discussions on the
economic structures of both countries and how they affect the
bilateral trade imbalance, which last year amounted to 51.48
billion dlrs in Japan's favour.
    On the following two days, the topics will range from
multilateral trade talks under the auspices of the General
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) to such bilateral trade
problems as super computers.
    The structural talks are intended to be free-wheeling
discussions among senior officials. Tomorrow's topics include
savings and investment issues such as consumer credit and
housing, and the implications of government budget deficits.
    These talks come at a particularly delicate time for the
Japanese government, which is facing increasing domestic
pressure to abandon its tight-fisted fiscal policy and
stimulate the sagging economy by spending more.
    Some U.S. Officials complained Japan has no intention of
boosting domestic demand and imports, as Washington wants.
    Japanese officials in turn pointed the finger at the huge
U.S. Budget deficit as one of the main culprits for the trade
imbalance. That budget deficit has meant that the U.S. Is
buying more imports.
    Japan seems particularly peeved at being singled in a draft
trade bill before the Senate as a nation following adverserial
trade practices. "It condemns Japan without due process," one
Japanese official said.
    That reference spoils what is otherwise a well-thought-out
bill introduced by Democratic Senator Lloyd Bentsen, he said.
    Japan is also not totally happy with the administration's
trade bill, particularly its proposal to establish reciprocal
access to foreign markets as one criteria for retaliatory trade
action by the U.S., Officials said.
    Nevertheless, Japanese officials said they remain in a weak
bargaining position, especially with the threat of a trade bill
overhanging them.
    "We have no leverage," one official admitted.
    As a result, Tokyo is striving to meet U.S. Complaints
about its trade practices in a variety of fields, including
super computers.
    The U.S. Is pressing for greater access to the Japanese
super computer market.
    The Japanese government has sent a long questionnaire to
public institutions like universities which buy the
sophisticated machines in hopes of eventually setting up
informal bidding procedures easily understood by all potential
sellers, officials said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=354>
Taiwan plans another round of deep tariff
cuts this year to help narrow its trade surplus with the U.S.,
A senior economic planner said.
    Wang Chao-Ming, vice-chairman of the council for economic
planning and development, told Reuters Taiwan would further
reduce import tariffs on 1,700 products sometime in the second
half of this year.
    Cuts of up to 50 pct on those items were made last year and
Wang said further cuts would go much deeper.
    "We have to speed up liberalisation and cut import tariffs
faster and more substantially," he said.
    The United States, Taiwan's main trading partner, has said
the island's import tariffs, still ranging from a high of
almost 60 pct, were unacceptable. It has criticised the cuts as
too selective.
     Taiwan's trade surplus with the United States hit 13.6
billion dlrs last year. The surplus has boosted foreign
exchange reserves to 50 billion dlrs, which Wang said made
Taiwan a target for U.S. Protectionism.
    Wang said the trade surplus and the reserves weakened
Taiwan's position in talks with Washington over export quotas,
particularly for shoes, textiles and machine tools which are
among the island's main export-earners.
    A special Taiwanese trade delegation leaves for Washington
tomorrow to try to renegotiate an agreement signed last year
limiting exports of Taiwan textiles.
    Under the accord, Taiwan's textile export growth was
limited to 0.5 pct each year until 1988. Taipei has said it is
losing markets to South Korea and Hong Kong which were given
more generous terms.
 REUTER...
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=718>
Canada's decision to raise the issue
of a free trade pact with the U.S. was a sign of what many see
as a new spirit of Canadian self-confidence, a public policy
study group said 
    "It suggests the Canada of the immediate post-war period,
when it was a major player in the process of building a postwar
world," the Washington-based Atlantic Council said.
    U.S. and Canadian negotiators opened talks last summer
aimed at dismantling trade barriers between the two countries,
the world's biggest trading partners with crossborder shipments
of about 150 billion dlrs annually.
    The council's study said the trade talks, with a deadline
of October for an agreement, are the biggest issue in
U.S.-Canadian relations.
   The study said liberalized trade between the two countries
would improve the competitiveness of their economies in world
markets and lessen trade irritants which now mar their ties.
    The council said "in the past most Canadians have shied away
from the notion of a free-trade arrangement, fearing to be
overwhelmed economically and politically by a closer
association with a country 10 times their size in population."
    But at the same time, it added, Canadians realized their
domestic market was too small to permit the mass production and
sales needed to raise productivity to the level demanded by an
increasingly competitive world.
    The council said that in the talks, Canada is chiefly
interested in minimizing the imposing of U.S. duties against 
allegedly subsidized exports.
    A recent example was the 15 per cent duty the U.S. imposed
on Canadian lumber exports on grounds the shipments were being
subsidized.
    The council said the chief U.S. concerns included ending
curbs against U.S. banking, insurance, telecommunications, and
the so-called "cultural industries" - publishing, broadcasting
and films.
    It said other major U.S.-Canadian issues were defense
cooperation, "acid rain" and the U.S. rejection of a Canadian
assertion of sovereignty over waters of the Northwest Passage.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=843>
French industry is failing to produce the
goods its markets need and its loss of competitiveness has left
the government little room for manoeuvre to reflate the
economy, the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and
Development said.
    With gross domestic product likely to grow only 2.1 pct
this year, the same rate as last year, unemployment could climb
to 11.5 pct of the workforce by mid-1988, from its present 10.9
pct, it said in an annual review of the French economy.
    The report said the French economy was "increasingly
ill-adapted to demand" selling goods at "uncompetitive relative
prices on both domestic and export markets."
    "France's poor export performance reflects a geographical
bias in favour of markets less dynamic than the average...
And...A substantial loss of market share...In the past 18
months," it said.
    Pointing to a likely widening of the French trade deficit
to around 2.9 billion dlrs this year from 2.4 billion in 1986,
it warned that a further depreciation of the dollar against the
franc could lead to "a (renewed) loss of competitiveness
relative not only to the United States but also to the newly
industrialised countries."
    This could result in further major losses of market share,
particularly in the non-OECD area, which accounts for almost a
quarter of French exports, it said.
    Until the competitive ability of industry improved, the
authorities would have "little scope for macroeconomic
manoeuvre, even if the unemployment situation or the need to
encourage a pickup in investment could require demand to grow
more briskly," it added.
    But rising unemployment could help to hold down wage
demands, contributing to a slowdown in inflation to around a
two pct annual rate this year and early next, the OECD said.
    Written mainly in December last year, the report took no
account of a rise in oil prices early in 1987, and a 0.9 pct
surge in January consumer prices, caused partly by the
government's deregulation of service sector tariffs.
    "We took a bet that the freeing of prices would not provoke
runaway rises, and it is not absolutely certain that bet has
been lost," one OECD official commented.
    OECD officials said the January data and a rise in oil
prices above the 15 dlrs a barrel average assumed in the
report, indicated an upward revision in the inflation forecast
to around 2.5 or three pct.
    The government last week revised its forecast up to between
2.4 and 2.5 pct from two pct, against last year's 2.1 pct.
    But the OECD backed the government's view that the
underlying trend for inflation remained downwards this year,
with a slowdown in domestic costs taking over from last year's
fall in oil and commodity prices as the chief cause of
disinflation.
    With French unit productivity costs now among the lowest in
the OECD area, the inflation differential between France and
its main trading rival, West Germany, could fall to just one
pct this year, it said.
    On the other hand, the report noted, consumer prices for
industrial goods and private services have been rising steeply
as companies built up their profits.
    "For the disinflationary process to continue , and price
competitiveness to become lastingly compatible with exchange
rate stability, it is essential that wage restraint continue,"
it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=894>
The Ministry of International Trade and
Industry (MITI) acted to tighten restrictions on microchip
exports to countries other than the U.S. To preserve a
U.S.-Japan pact on semiconductor trade, but major Japanese
chipmakers doubt its usefulness.
    A MITI spokesman said his ministry had asked chipmakers to
issue certificates to specified trading houses stating they are
authorised exporters.
    Trading houses applying for a MITI export licence will be
required to show such a certificate, but those without it will
not automatically be denied licences, he said.
    But some industry officials predicted any government
measures were likely to have limited effect as long as the
world semiconductor market remained weak.
    U.S. Government and industry officials have complained
repeatedly that Japanese chipmakers continue to sell at below
cost to third countries despite the July agreement.
    Japanese firms and officials in turn argue the flow of
cheap chips to third countries is due to grey-market sales by
third-party brokers, who seek to profit from the gap between
low prices in Japan and higher prices based on production costs
and set for Japanese makers under the agreement.
    The MITI spokesman said, "If the percentage of grey market
is increasing for one specific company, it suggests they are
distributing their products through their sales network knowing
they will be exported by some means. In that case we will ask
them what they are doing to reduce the figure."
    MITI earlier asked makers to cut output of certain chips by
10 pct in first-quarter 1987, spokesmen for the firms said.
    But they doubt the usefulness of the latest move. "As long
as there is a gap between prices set under the pact and market
prices, there will be people who want to exploit the gap to
make money," a Hitachi Ltd &lt;HIT.T> spokesman said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=924>
Swiss capital exports rose to 4.64
billion francs in January after 2.54 billion in December and a
year earlier 3.64 billion, the Swiss National Bank said.
    New bond issues accounted for 4.12 billion of the total
after December's 2.15 billion, and credits 525.1 mln after
389.9 mln.
    In January 1985, before the National Bank ended the
distinction between notes and bonds, bond issues totalled 1.66
billion francs, notes 1.39 billion and credits 597.5 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=925>
China called on the United States to
remove curbs on its exports, to give it favourable trading
status and ease restrictions on exports of high technology.
    But the U.S. Embassy replied that Chinese figures showing
13 years of trade deficits with the U.S. Out of the last 15 are
inaccurate and said Peking itself would have to persuade
Congress to change laws which limit its exports.
     The official International Business newspaper today
published China's demands in a  editorial to coincide with the
visit of U.S. Secretary of State George Shultz.
     "It is extremely important that the U.S. Market reduce its
restrictions on Chinese imports, provide the needed facilities
for them and businessmen from both sides help to expand Chinese
exports," the editorial said.
     "The U.S. Should quickly discard its prejudice against
favourable tariff treatment for Chinese goods and admit China
into the Generalised System of Preference (GSP).
     "Despite easing of curbs on U.S. Technology exports in
recent years, control of them is still extremely strict and
influences normal trade between the two countries," it added
     The paper also printed an article by China's commercial
counsellor in its Washington embassy, Chen Shibiao, who said
that "all kinds of difficulties and restrictions" were preventing
bilateral trade fulfilling its full potential.
     He named them as U.S. Protectionist behaviour, curbs on
technology transfer and out-of-date trade legislation.
     The paper also printed a table showing that, since
bilateral trade began in 1972, China has had a deficit every
year except 1972 and 1977. It shows the 1986 and 1985 deficits
at 2.09 billion and 1.722 billion dlrs.
     A U.S. Embassy official said the U.S. Did not accept
Peking's trade figures at all, mainly because they exclude
goods shipped to Hong Kong and then trans-shipped to U.S. While
U.S. Figures are based on country of origin.
     He said that, if China wants to obtain GSP status, it will
have to lobby Congress itself to persaude it to amend several
laws which currently prevent Peking getting such status.
     The U.S. Trade Act of 1974 says that to qualify for GSP,
China must be a member of the General Agreement of Tariffs and
Trade (GATT), for which it applied in July 1986, and "not be
dominated or controlled by international Communism."
     The official said China was well aware of the laws, some
of which date to the anti-Communist early 1950's, but that
there is not sufficient political will in the U.S. To change
them.
     China has been the subject of about a dozen cases
involving anti-dumping in the U.S. Within the last two years,
which the U.S. Side won, he said.
     But, for the first time, China signed last week an
agreement which it itself initiated to voluntarily restrain
exports of at least two categories of steel goods, which may
lead the U.S. Side to withdraw the anti-dumping case, he added.
     Another diplomat said willingness to provide such
voluntary export restraints would be an important issue in
bilateral trade issues and in Peking's application to GATT.
     "China has the potential to disrupt world markets,
especially in textiles. Other GATT countries will be nervous
about China in this respect. But there is a precedent for other
centralled planned economies in GATT," the diplomat said.
     Poland, Czechoslovakia, Hungary and Romania are members of
GATT but none has China's massive market potential for imports
or its vast labour pool to produce cheap exports.
     In a speech today in the northeast city of Dalian, U.S.
Secretary of State George Shultz said his country welcomed
China's interest in participating in GATT.
     "The process of Chinese accession will not be accomplished
overnight -- the GATT rules were not designed for a large
economy of the Chinese type," Shultz said.
     "China can play an important role by actively joining GATT
discussions seeking to expand general trading opportunities and
enhance market access for exports worldwide. China can further
develop its foreign trade system so as to gain the maximum
benefit from its GATT participation," he said.
     The problems facing U.S.-China trade and GATT membership
are similar -- a pricing system which many foreign businessmen
regard as arbitrary and not related to actual costs, especially
for exports, and a de facto dual currency system.
     In a memorandum backing its application presented to GATT
last month, China said it was gradually reforming its economic
system and replacing mandatory instruction with "guidance
planning" and economic levers.
     The diplomat said that, to join GATT, China had much to
do.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=991>
The U.S. Wants Japan to eliminate import
controls on agricultural products within three years, visiting
U.S. Under-Secretary of State for Economic Affairs Allen Wallis
told Eishiro Saito, Chairman of the Federation of Economic
Organisations (Keidanren), a spokesman for Keidanren said.
    The spokesman quoted Wallis as saying drastic measures
would be needed to stave off protectionist legislation by
Congress.
    Wallis, who is attending a sub-cabinet-level bilateral
trade meeting, made the remark yesterday in talks with Saito.
    Wallis was quoted as saying the Reagan Administration wants
Japanese cooperation so the White House can ensure any U.S.
Trade bill is a moderate one, rather than containing
retaliatory measures or antagonising any particular country.
    He was also quoted as saying the U.S. Would be pleased were
Japan to halve restrictions on agricultural imports within five
years if the country cannot cope with abolition within three,
the spokesman said.
    Japan currently restricts imports of 22 agricultural
products. A ban on rice imports triggered recent U.S.
Complaints about Japan's agricultural policy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1022>
China called on the United States to
remove curbs on its exports, to give it favourable trading
status and ease restrictions on exports of high technology.
    But the U.S. Embassy replied that Chinese figures showing
13 years of trade deficits with the U.S. Out of the last 15 are
inaccurate and said Peking itself would have to persuade
Congress to change laws which limit its exports.
    The official International Business newspaper today
published China's demands in a  editorial to coincide with the
visit of U.S. Secretary of State George Shultz.
    "It is extremely important that the U.S. Market reduce its
restrictions on Chinese imports, provide the needed facilities
for them and businessmen from both sides help to expand Chinese
exports," the editorial said.
    "The U.S. Should quickly discard its prejudice against
favourable tariff treatment for Chinese goods and admit China
into the Generalised System of Preference (GSP).
    "Despite easing of curbs on U.S. Technology exports in
recent years, control of them is still extremely strict and
influences normal trade between the two countries," it added.
    The paper also printed an article by China's commercial
counsellor in its Washington embassy, Chen Shibiao, who said
that "all kinds of difficulties and restrictions" were preventing
bilateral trade fulfilling its full potential.
    He named them as U.S. Protectionist behaviour, curbs on
technology transfer and out-of-date trade legislation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1197>
Belgian Foreign Trade Minister Herman
De Croo said if Congress passed legislation curbing world
textile imports the only way the European Community (EC) could
react was to retaliate.
    De Croo said at a news conference "if you limit textile
imports, you will re-orient textiles to Europe."
    And that he said would trigger EC taxes on U.S. goods.
    Congress passed a textile bill two years ago, but it was
vetoed by President Reagan on grounds that curbing imports to
protect the domestic textile industry would trigger retaliation
U.S. trading partners.
    A similar bill has been introducted this year, in a
Congress with a bigger Democratic majority and with a President
weakened by the Iran scandal.
    De Croo, here for talks with Administration officials and
Congressmen, said if a textile bill passed, "the only way we
could react would be retaliation, and it would cause more
retaliation, which is not a good way to deal with problems."
    He said if a textile bill was enacted, "we will impose taxes
on a lot of American products."  He said "it would be stupid. We
have to avoid that."
    He said Congressmen seem upset mosty with Japan, because of
its massive trade suprlus with the United States, and not with
EC nations, but EC nations will be hurt by the diverted 
shipments of Asian textiles.
    De Croo also criticized the way U.S. officials try to solve
EC trade issues, saying "each time we come in contact, it a
conflict contact. The clouts are coming fom the West."
    He said it then is a crisis atmosphere with officials cross
the Atlantic and dramatized with headlines.
    "This is not the way to work in a serious way between two
big powers," De Croo said.
   
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1201>
House Ways and Means Committee
Chairman Dan Rostenkowski said Congress must avoid a temptation
to pass a protectionist trade bill this year.
    In remarks prepared for delivery before the National Press
Club, Rostenkowski, D-Ill., predicted major trade legislation
will be sent to President Reagan by the end of this year.
    But he warned that his "conciliatory message" on the trade
bill did not mean he would oppose a proposal that would warn
other countries their access to the American market would be
curtailed unless they opened their markets to U.S. goods.
    "Complaints about (foreign trade) restraints are not a
smoke screen for protectionism, they a plea for fairness,"
Rostenkowski said.
    "It is only reasonable to ask the nations that have denied
us access to open up in return for continued freedom in the
American market," he added.
    However, he said there would likely be changes in the
market access proposal from the plan which cleared the House
last year. That plan would have set a specific time table for
foreign countries to ease import restraints or they would face
a 25 pct cut in exports to the United States.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1210>
Export Credits Guarantee Department has
named Malcolm Stephens, director of export finance at Barclay's
Bank Plc and a former career civil servant at ECGD for 17
years, to the post of executive director, a department
spokesman said.
    Stephens replaces Jack Gill, who is retiring early aged 57.
    A drop in the ECGD's business volume and a rise in its debt
to the Exchequer have led to criticism in Parliament in recent
years.
    Stephens said the fall in business volume was a top
convern, adding that the department may have to compete more
aggressively with private insurance firms providing similar
services.
    The department's annual report for the year ended March 31,
1986, showed exports insured by the department fell to 15.7
billion stg from 17.4 billion the year before, while its debt
to the Exchequer almost doubled to 756 mln stg.
    Stephens said he had no specific list of changes. But among
his chief concerns was the weakened condition of lesser
developed countries and their ability to pay for their imports.
    The agency will have to review its policies on insuring
export credits to lesser credits on a country by country basis,
he said. "Large lump political risk insurance is the sort of
thing we want to take a look at."
    "You have to try to look forward to see if you are simply in
a peak and trough situation or it is a more long term thing,"
Stephens said, in response to a qustion about whether ECGD will
strike more countries from its list of political risk insurance
recipients.
    He noted that certain countries have already been removed
from the list.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1226>
House Ways and Means Committee
Chairman Dan Rostenkowski said he would be reluctant to back
the tax increase if it did not have President Reagan's support.
    He told a National Press Club luncheon there would be a
number of tax proposals that could be debated if Reagan sought
a tax increase to help balance the budget.
    However, he said he would prefer to leave the tax rates
enacted in last year's tax reform bill unchanged.
    There have been calls in Congress to hold the rates at the
1987 level rather than allow them to fall next year.
    Reagan proposed 22 billion dlrs in revenue as part of his
1988 budget proposal, but it did not include general tax
increases.
    On trade issues, Rostenkowski said he did not expect the
major trade bill this year would single out any U.S. industry
for special protection.
    "To go after individual items in a trade bill is suicide,"
he said.
    This apparently ruled out congressional approval of another
textile trade bill to limit quotas on textile imports, as was
proposed again this year.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1347>
Exports of American wine rose 14.9
per cent last year to a total of 7.2 million gallons, the Wine
Institute said.
    The San Francisco-based promotional group said 95 per cent
of the exported wine was from California and the top three
markets were Canada, Japan and Britain.
    Japan, which edged out Britain as the leading importer of
American wines in 1985, continued in second place.
    Canadian imports rose 3.2 per cent to 2.6 million gallons;
Japan, 9.9 per cent to 1.2 million gallons, and Britain, 20.2
per cent to 962,360 gallons.
    A spokesman for the institute said the declining value of
the dollar and strong promotional efforts on the part of the
California wine industry contributed significantly to the
increased shipments.
    The 1986 wine exports were valued at 34.7 mln dlrs, up from
27.6 mln dlrs the previous year.              
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1356>
The U.S. Senate Agriculture Committee
may take up a bill tomorrow that would strengthen the
activities of U.S. agricultural trade teams in selected
developing countries, committee staff said.
    The measure, sponsored by committee Chairman Patrick Leahy
(D-Vt.) and Sen. John Melcher (D-Mont.), would establish trade
teams of between six and nine persons drawn from federal
agencies and private voluntary organizations, staff said.
    The trade missions would seek to generate interest in the
U.S. government's food donation and commercial programs --
PL480, Section 416, export credit and export enhancement -- and
upon return be required to advocate extension of concessional
or commercial benefits to interested countries.
    The trade teams would be made up of representatives of the
U.S. Agriculture Department, State Department, the Agency for
International Development and private voluntary organizations
such as U.S. Wheat Associates.
    The bill would require teams within six months to visit
seven countries: Mexico, Philippines, Indonesia, India,
Bangladesh, Senegal and Nigeria.
    Within one year after passage of the measure, another eight
countries would have to be visited: Peru, Kenya, the Dominican
Republic, Costa Rica, Malaysia, Venezuela, Tunisia and Morocco.
Other countries could be added to the list.
    Senate staff members said the bill, still in the drafting
stages, had broad support and was expected to be approved by
the committee tomorrow.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1478>
Spain unveils a 105 billion peseta plan
this month aimed at boosting exports to reach European
Community levels, director-general of the INFE export
institute, Apolonio Ruiz Ligero, said.
    "The target is to raise exports to 20 pct of Gross Domestic
Product over the next four years compared to 15 pct now," he
said.
     "This is the minimum prevailing level in the EC and there
is no reason why we should lag behind countries like Italy,
which have a similar productive structure," he said.
    The plan calls for providing soft loans, tax cuts and other
fiscal benefits to exporters and raising Spain's presence in
international trade fairs.
    Consumer goods such as fashion and wine, as well as
traditional industrial exports will be promoted.
    Ruiz Ligero said INFE would double its annual budget to 20
billion pesetas to finance the four-year plan, while the
government's development aid fund (FAD) would provide a special
25 billion peseta grant.
    The plan calls for boosting exports by five to six pct in
real terms this year after a 7.4 pct decline last year.
    Ruiz Ligero attributed this drop to a lack of demand in
developing countries and a rally in domestic consumer demand,
which rose six pct last year after 1.9 pct in 1985.
    He added that 80 pct of Spain's exports went to
Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD)
countries.
    The EC accounts for 60 pct of the market and exports to the
Community rose seven pct last year. The government plans to
concentrate efforts on Western Europe and the U.S.
    "The problem is convincing businessmen that exports are
vital to survival in the context of EC competition," he said.
    He said Spanish businessmen traditionally turned to the
domestic market to satisfy rises in consumer demand, while
turning their backs on foreign markets.
    "They have to realise their share of the home market is
going to shrink with growing deregulation," he said. "Foreign
companies are taking up positions in the domestic economy and
it is it vital to secure a market share abroad."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1499>
Secretary of Commerce Malcolm
Baldrige expressed concern about the continuing U.S. trade
deficits with South Korea and Taiwan and said that without an
adjustment in exchange rates there is little likelihood of
improvement.
    Speaking to the President's Export Council, an industry
advisory group, Baldrige said the trade deficit issue was under
discussion with those countries.
    "I feel that unless we see an exchange rate adjustment we
probably won't be able to see much of a change in the large
surplus that Taiwan in particular has with us," he said.
    In a wide-ranging discussion on U.S. trade matters,
Baldrige also repeated U.S. concern about an attempted takeover
by Japan's Fujitsu company of Fairchild Computer.
    He said that the Japanese were resisting allowing U.S.
companies into the giant computer business while at the same
time attempting to acquire control of a U.S. company that does
major computer business in the U.S. market.
    Lastly, Baldrige said that the United States was hopeful
that it could complete a free market agreement with Canada by
the autumn, but said major issues, including acid rain,
remained unresolved.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1588>
The European Community Commission today
appointed its chief spokesman, Hugo Paemen, as its top official
in charge of multilateral trade negotiations, a Commission
spokesman said.
    Paemen, a Belgian official who had previously been chief
aide to former External Affairs Commissioner Etienne Davignon,
has been in his post since January 1985.
    The spokesman said Paemen will continue as chief spokesman
until the retirement on May 1 of Paul Luyten, who is now in
charge of EC departments handling negotiations in the world
trade body GATT, the OECD and other forums.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1611>
Turkey expects a 1986 balance of payments
deficit of 1.5 billion dlrs, well over target, but is taking
steps to improve its performance in this and other fields, Ali
Tigrel, director of economic planning at the State Planning
Organisation said.
    He told Reuters the shortfall was a direct consequence of
economic growth of nearly eight pct, up from 5.1 pct in 1985,
which he said resulted mostly from a surge in domestic demand.
    Tigrel acknowledged a need to cut inflation further after a
drop of more than 12 points to 24.6 pct in the Treasury
wholesale index last year.
    This year's target of 20 pct "might be attainable but the
economic management will have to be careful," he said.
    Tigrel, whose department produces the annual programme
which is central to the government's economic planning, said
Turkey's creditworthiness was at risk over the current account
shortfall, originally targeted at 695 mln dlrs.
    "We must alleviate the current account substantially to
sustain the creditworthiness that we have managed to secure
over the last five years," he added.
    His comment echoed last October's Organisation for Economic
Cooperation and Development report on Turkey, which said
Ankara's case for more medium-term financing on better terms
would look better if inflation were lower and the current
account deficit cut or turned into a surplus.
    "In 1987 we must reduce the rate of growth in public sector
investments, we must reduce the public sector deficit as a
percentage of GNP and we must achieve a very visible
improvement in the current account deficit," he said.
    Tigrel said a surge in public sector spending last year was
also to blame for the high deficits.
    Appropriations to government departments had been cut by
eight pct since the budget was passed in December and foreign
borrowing by municipalities had been restrained.
    "We are trying make sure that public bodies stick to the
investment programme and do not exceed their appropriations," he
said. It was hoped to bring the public sector borrowing
requirement down to five pct of GNP in 1987 from an estimated
5.6 pct in 1986.
    More modest GNP growth of five pct for 1987 was also
targeted, Tigrel said. Measures were being taken to encourage
exports, and production incentives were being considered.
    "We must try to make sure that more capacity is injected
into the Turkish economy in the coming years. The promotion
policy is geared to make sure that both foreign investment and
local private capital come more into play as far as
manufacturing capacity is concerned," Tigrel said.
    He said the process of structural adjustment of the Turkish
economy to free market policies, begun in 1980, was still under
way. Trade had been liberalised and a freer exchange rate
policy applied, but he acknowledged there was more to be done
in a country where the state still dominates industry and the
currency is only partially convertible.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1656>
South Korea's record 7.1 billion dlrs
trade surplus with the U.S. is bound to diminish as the
country switches purchases from Japan in favor of U.S.
companies, Trade Minister Woong-Bae Rha said.
     He rejected suggestions the Korean Won is undervalued, and
denied any plans for a "drastic and sudden" revaluation.
    Rha is heading a trade mission to 37 U.S. cities. Last year
South Korea ran a 4.3 billion dlr trade surplus, including a
record 7.1 billion surplus with the U.S. and a 5.5 billion dlr
deficit with Japan.
    Rha told Reuters in an interview the current trade mission
is looking for 2.0 billion dlrs in purchases from U.S.
companies, about a quarter of which represents "transferred
purchases from Japanese sources."
    Rha said the items being sought by the current mission are
"mainly chemicals, machinery and parts."
    He said South Korea is the fourth largest importer of U.S.
agricultural products. The current mission is not involved in
that area but there are plans to buy "substantial amounts of
cotton" from the U.S.
    He noted his country "is clearly not as open as the American
market. Nor is it reasonable to expect that it should be,"
considering South Korea has a 40 billion dlr foreign debt and
spends six pct of its gross national product on defense.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1675>
The ruling GATT Council deferred a
decision on whether to set up a dispute panel on the basis of a
European Community complaint against the U.S.- Japanese
agreement on exports of computer semiconductors.
    David Woods, spokesman of the General Agreement on Tariffs
and Trade (GATT), told a news briefing that the main parties
would continue bilateral talks. This was in the hope of
resolving the row before the next Council meeting on April 15.
    The five-year accord signed in July 1986 aims to protect
the U.S. Market from dumping of low-price Japanese microchips,
officially known as semiconductors.
    The E.C. Complained the accord breached GATT trade rules by
allowing Tokyo to monitor prices, allowing it to set minimum
prices for Japanese chips sold in third countries.
    The 12-nation Community also charged the agreement gave
U.S. Producers preferential access to the Japanese market.
    Woods said many nations -- Hong Kong, Canada, Switzerland,
Singapore, Sweden, Malaysia and Nigeria -- had supported the EC
complaint during the heated Council debate.
    Japan's delegate, Minoru Endo, and U.S. Ambassador Michael
Samuels replied in the debate that the E.C. Charges were
unfounded, but they were willing to continue bilateral talks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1680>
The ruling GATT Council set up a formal
dispute panel to examine a U.S. Complaint that a Canadian law
prohibiting export of unprocessed herring and salmon was
discriminatory.
    David Wood, official spokesman of the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade (GATT), told a news briefing the decision was
taken after bilateral consultations failed to resolve the row.
    U.S. Ambassador Michael Samuels charged during the Council
debate that Canada was trying to preserve domestic jobs by
insisting that herring and salmon be processed at home.
    Robert White, Canada's deputy chief of delegation, replied
the law was in line with GATT rules, and was for conservations
reasons. But he agreed to setting up the dispute panel.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1772>
Congressmen from beef producing
states and representatives of the U.S. livestock industry 
urged the Reagan administration to press Japan and South Korea
to open up their markets to imports of beef.
    Testifying at a House subcommittee hearing on livestock
issues, Rep. Hal Daub (R-Nebr.), said the administration should
push hard for greater beef imports by Japan and South Korea.
Daub was joined by several other lawmakers.
    U.S. assistant trade representative Suzanne Earley, replied
"we're not going to let Japan off the hook, or Korea." She
noted trade representative Clayton Yeutter met with a senior
Korean official last week on the beef issue, and that Yeutter
and Agriculture Secretary Richard Lyng will visit Tokyo in
April for discussions on farm trade issues.
    Japan maintains a quota on beef imports, set at 58,400
tonnes high quality beef in fiscal 1987. South Korea has banned
beef imports but there are indications Seoul may bow to U.S.
pressure and allow some imports soon, industry officials said.
    In testimony today, Tom Cook, director of industry affairs
for the National Cattlemens Association said "the Congress,
administration and the industry must take a strong, tough and
united stand to impress the Japanese that we mean business and
that we expect them to open their markets."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1809>
A senior British official said that
protectionist bills being considered by Congress could trigger
retaliation by the European Community (EEC) and threaten the
global trading system.
    Paul Channon, secretary for trade and industry, said if
Congress passed legislation to curb textile imports, which
would hit EC shipments as well as shipments from major Asian
textile producers, "the community would have to retaliate."
    His comments echoed those made yesterday by Belgian Trade
Minister Herman De Croo, who said if the bill passed, the
community would retaliate by imposing taxes on U.S. exports.
    Channon made his remarks at a news conference after two
days of talks with Reagan Administration officials and members
of Congress.
    De Croo was also in Washington for trade talks.
    Channon said there was a greater protectionism sentiment in
Congress since his visit here last year as Congress and the
Administration tried to find ways to reduce the U.S. trade
deficit, which last year hit a record 169.8 billion dlrs.
    Channon also called for greater EC-U.S. cooperation to
force Japan to open its markets to foreign goods.
    Channon said Japan's trade surplus is causing everyone
problems - its surplus with the United States last year was
51.5 billion dlrs and with EC nations, 16.7 billion dlrs.
    "The more united pressure there could be, the better," he
said.
    Channon also called for increased U.S.-EC cooperation to
avoid trade disputes.
    He said the two sides narrowly avoided a confrontation
earlier this year over lost grains sales when Spain and
Portugal joined the community and its liberal imports
regulations were tightened to conform to EC standards.
    "But if both sides drew back from the brink that time," he
said, ""it does not mean that they would do so on another
occasion."
    Channon added that "There is increasing reesentment in
Europe over the U.S. tactic of negotiating under the pressure
of unilaterally imposed deadlines."
    He said other potential conflicts are already in sight -
alleged European government subsidies of Airbus aircraft and
taxes on fats and oils - and "the commuity and the United States
must therefore learn to manage their relations better."
    He said another bill to let the United States retaliate
against a nation if that nation's market was not open to U.S.
goods would bypass the trade pact GATT (General Agreeeement on
Tariffs and Trade) as an arbiter of trade practices.
    He said foreign trade law should be judged by GATT and not
by the United States, adding "if the (trade) law is to be
interpreted by the United States and not by the GATT, what is
to happen to the rest of us?"
   
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1811>
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter said he hoped the U.S. dollar would continue to decline
in relation to the currencies of Taiwan and South Korea as a
way to improve the U.S. trade picture.
    Testifying before the House Appropriations subcommittee
which must approve his agency's 1988 budget, he said, "In my
judgment economic factors justify a continued decline."
    Asked by a committee member if he expected a further
decline, and how much, Yeutter said the Taiwan and South Korean
currencies should be adjusted to reflect "positive factors" in
their economies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1839>
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter said he plans a July trip to China to discuss trade
issues including China's admission to the General Agreements on
Tariffs and Trade.
    Yeutter told a congressional hearing it was possible China
could be a member of GATT before the end of the year.
    "They are making major moves to becoming a full scale member
of the world economy," he told the House Appropriations
subcommittee which oversees his agency's budget.
    Depending on how the negotiations go on the terms of
China's GATT membership, Yeutter said he could put the final
touches on the U.S. part of the agreement during his trip.    
The admission of China to GATT, which is the multinational
group of nations which negotiates international rules on trade,
would offer both potential export markets and potential
competition for U.S. industries, he said.
    "That has a lot of potential as well as risks for U.S.
business," Yeutter said.
    "I think China will develop into a fine market for us," he
added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1863>
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter said he expects imports to fall soon but he was
concerned about the lack of improvement in U.S. exports given
the dollar's decline in the last 18 months.
    "I'm convinced we're about to see an improvement on the
import side. I'm more concerned about the export side," he told
a House Appropriations subcommittee.
    Part of the blame goes on other countries which have not
generated the economic growth to increase demand for U.S. goods
and part to some U.S. companies which are not generating
competitive exports, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1871>
The House Ways and Means trade
subcommittee postponed until next week its opening session to
start drafting major changes to U.S. trade laws, a committee
aide said.
    The subcommittee had not yet completed the preparatory work
to start writing the legislation, the aide said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1890>
New Zealand's current account deficit
narrowed to 180 mln N.Z. Dlrs in January from 203 mln, revised
from 207 mln, in December and 305 mln in January 1986, in a
smoothed measurement, the Statistics Department said.
    Unsmoothed figures show a deficit of 162 mln dlrs for
January against 107 mln, revised from 75 mln for December 1986
and 575 mln in January 1986.
    The smoothed series -- adjusted to iron out random
fluctuations -- shows a widening surplus on merchandise trade
to 46 mln from a surplus of 33 mln, revised from 43 mln dlrs in
December and a 71 mln deficit in the a year ago period.
    Exports were 905 mln dlrs against 929 mln, revised from 971
mln in December and 816 mln a year earlier, while imports fell
to 858 mln from 895 mln, revised from 928 mln in December and
888 mln in January 1986.
    Unadjusted merchandise figures show a surplus of 53 mln
dlrs vs 141 mln, revised from 203 mln surplus in December 1986
and a 323 mln deficit a year earlier.
    The deficit on invisibles on unsmoothed figures eased to
215 mln dlrs from 248 mln, revised from 277 mln in December and
252 mln in January 1986.
    The smoothed deficit on invisibles fell to 226 mln from 237
mln, revised from 250 mln in December and 234 mln in the year
ago period.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1932>
The Belgo-Luxembourg Economic Union
(BLEU) moved into a narrow trade surplus of 4.7 billion francs
in 1986 after a 140.4 billion franc deficit in 1985, figures
given by a spokesman for the National Statistics Institute
show.
    He said imports fell last year to 3,061.8 billion francs
from 3,304.1 in 1985 while exports were also lower at 3,066.6
billion francs against 3,163.7 billion.
    In December, the BLEU had an 11.9 billion franc trade
surplus after a 10.9 billion franc surplus in November and a
2.3 billion franc surplus in December 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1940>
Taiwan's foreign exchange reserves hit a
new high of more than 51 billion U.S. Dlrs on March 4, compared
with 50 billion in mid-February and 25.1 billion a year
earlier, the central bank said.
    Bank governor Chang Chi-Cheng told reporters the increase
came mainly from the bank's purchases of more than one billion
U.S. Dlrs on the local interbank market between February 18 and
March 4.
    He said the rise showed signs of slowing, however, because
Taiwan has liberalised import policy and expects its trade
surplus to decline over the next few months as a result.
    Chang declined to predict how high the reserves might rise,
but local economists have forecast they will hit 60 billion
U.S. Dlrs by the end of 1987.
    In January, Taiwan reduced import tariffs of up to 50 pct
on some 1,700 foreign products. It had been under growing U.S.
Pressure to cut its 1986 record 13.6 billion dlr trade surplus
with the U.S. Taiwan's 1985 surplus with the U.S. Was 10.2
billion, according to official statistics.
    Wang Chang-Ming, Vice Chairman of the Council for Economic
Planning and Development, told Reuters the government is
planning another round of deep tariff cuts in the second half
of this year.
    The reserves could support imports of more than two years
for Taiwan, compared with about three months for Japan and the
U.S.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1951>
U.S. Undersecretary of State for Economic
Affairs Allen Wallis said he had urged Japan to do much more to
reduce its large trade surplus with the United States.
    "Our central message to Japan this week was that while we
have made progress in some areas, much needs to be done," he
told a press conference after three days of talks.
    "What we need is a resolution of trade issues, we need
visible efforts to restructure the economy to encourage more
imports and we need greater domestic-led growth."
    Forecasting sluggish economic growth in Japan this year,
Wallis urged Tokyo to stimulate domestic demand to help reduce
its trade surplus, which hit a record 83 billion dlrs in 1986.
    He named several areas of particular concern to Washington
-- computer microchips, supercomputers, Kansai airport,
agricultural products and car telephones.
    He warned that the U.S./Japan agreement governing trade in
semiconductors was in jeopardy. Despite the pact, Japanese
producers are still dumping microchips in foreign markets other
than the United States while U.S. Penetration of the Japanese
market has not increased, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1963>
Poland says U.S. Sanctions have cost its
economy 15 billion dlrs and has made clear it wants Washington
to take a lead in repairing the damage after lifting remaining
restrictions two weeks ago.
    Polish officials are unable to provide a precise breakdown
of the figure, saying it takes into account a number of
hypothetical losses. Some of them are "too sophisticated to
convert into financial terms," one banking source said.
    But Western economic experts say the effect of sanctions is
impossible to calculate.
    They say it is blurred by the poor performance of Poland's
economy, and dismiss the 15 billion dlr figure as illusory.
    "Sanctions have provided a very useful excuse for under-
achieving. They did have a bad effect, yes, but they only
contributed to largely internal, economic problems," one said.
    The U.S. Imposed the measures and withdrew Most Favoured
Nation (MFN) trading status from Poland in 1982 in retaliation
for suppression of the Solidarity free trade union under
martial law. The estimated cost to the Polish economy was
originally devised several years ago by the Institute of
National Economy, an offshoot of the central planning
commission.
    According to one Western envoy, an expert on Polish
economic affairs, it extrapolated 1979 information on growth
trends in trade with the United States, as well as increases in
credits from Western commercial and government lenders.
    But the calculations were based on a time when trade was
booming and credits still flowed freely, he said, dismissing
the estimate as "a theoretical projection based on a high point,
which has no real scientific evaluation."
    A foreign trade ministry official said Polish exports to
the U.S. In the late 1970s averaged around 400 mln dlrs
annually and had fallen by half since the sanctions were
imposed.
    Imports have suffered, slumping from around 800 mln dlrs to
200 mln, as credits ran out. Poland has a dwindling trade
surplus with the West. Last year it was one billion dlrs
against a targeted 1.6 billion, official figures show.
    Acknowledging that sanctions have lost Poland important
U.S. Markets -- including agricultural equipment, textiles,
chemicals and some foodstuffs -- Western economists say credits
dried up for economic not political reasons.  "Poland is
accusing the West of letting economic relations deteriorate for
political reasons," said one expert. "It's an illusion based on a
misunderstanding of Western economy."
    "There's a limit to how much you can go on giving someone
who has no hope of repaying it," another said, adding that
Poland had benefited from a global phenomenon of easy credits
in the 1970s which were no longer today's reality.
    Describing the 15 billion dlr assessment as "nebulous," one
diplomat said it also included losses of hypothetical orders
and setbacks to Polish research through the curbing of
scientific links and exchanges.  Western officials say the
lifting of sanctions and new MFN status will have little impact
on Poland, which has a hard currency debt of 33.5 billion dlrs
and lacks the means to modernise its industry.
    "MFN doesn't really mean anything, only that Poland will not
be treated worse than other countries. It will be difficult to
regain access to the U.S. Market because different forces are
in play now," said one Western envoy.
    He said Polish products were not competitive, and their
quality was too low. Trade wars and possible protectionist
measures amongst the U.S., Japan and Europe would also hamper
Poland's efforts to regain entry.
    Deputy foreign trade minister Janusz Kaczurba recognised
this fact recently.
    Kaczurba told the official PAP news agency recently, "Making
up our lost position will take a long time and be uncommonly
difficult, and in certain cases impossible... In a period of
two to three years it will be possible to increase the level of
exports by only about 100 mln dlrs."
    While Poland is unlikely to seek compensation, it says it
has a "moral right" to assistance from the U.S. Which it says
imposed the sanctions illegally. But a Western economist said
"The argument that U.S. Sanctions were a unilateral torpedoing
of the Polish economy won't cut any ice. The Americans will
just reply that the Poles acted immorally in crushing
Solidarity."
    Nevertheless, Polish National Bank head Wladyslaw Baka, in
talks in Washington last week with the International Monetary
Fund (IMF) and World Bank, made it clear that Poland was
looking for a lead from the United States.
    He was quoted by PAP as saying that Poland would meet its
financial obligations to the United States, "but not in a short
time and not without a cooperative stand on the part of its
foreign economic partners."
    He stressed that the U.S. "had a particular opportunity to
play a part in the cooperative policy of Poland's partners
interested in the settlement of Polish debt."
    Putting it more sharply, one senior banking official blamed
Washington for obstructing talks with the World Bank, IMF and
Paris Club of Western creditor governments in recent years and
said it should now play a more positive role.
    "As a major superpower the United States can influence
international organisations," he said, citing recent meetings
aimed at stabilising currencies as an example of the extent to
which Western nations were prepared to cooperate.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=1964>
Britain had a visible trade deficit of
2.6 billion stg in the fourth quarter of 1986 against a revised
deficit of 2.9 billion in the third quarter, official
statistics show.
    Seasonally-adjusted figures issued by the Central
Statistical Office (CSO) show the current account was in
deficit by 760 mln stg against an upwardly revised third
quarter shortfall of 930 mln.
    For 1986 as a whole, visible trade was in deficit by 8.3
billion stg, sharply up from 1985's 2.2. Billion shortfall and
a 4.4 billion deficit in 1984.
    Preliminary figures for invisible transactions in the
fourth quarter show a surplus 1.8 billion stg to give an
estimated surplus for 1986 of 7.2 billion. The fourth quarter
figure was in line with CSO projections released on Friday.
    The third quarter invisibles surplus was revised down to
1.9 billion stg from 2.25 billion.
    In 1985 the invisibles surplus was 5.1 billion stg.
    The reduced deficit on visible trade in the fourth quarter
was due to an increase in the surplus on oil of 200 mln stg and
a reduction in the non-oil trade deficit of 100 mln, the CSO
said.
    However, 1986's surplus on oil trade was 4.0 billion stg
lower than in 1985, while the deficit on non-oil trade
increased by 2.1 billion.
    The figures were broadly in line with market expectations.
    The CSO stressed that figures for invisible transactions,
particularly for the most recent quarters are liable to
substantial revisions as later information becomes available.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10005>
Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher said
the U.K. Was growing more impatient with Japanese trade
barriers and warned that it would soon have new powers against
countries not offering reciprocal access to their markets.
    She told Parliament that the bid by the U.K.'s Cable and
Wireless Plc &lt;CAWL.L> to enter the Japanese telecommunications
market was being regarded by her government as a test case.
    "I wrote to the prime minister of Japan, Mr Nakasone, on the
fourth of March to express our interest on the Cable and
Wireless bid. I have not yet had a reply. We see this as a test
on how open the Japanese market really is," Thatcher said.
    Thatcher told Parliament that "shortly ... We shall have
more powers than we have now, when, for example the powers
under the Financial Services Act and the Banking Act become
available, then we shall be able to take action in cases where
other countries do not offer the same full access to financial
services as we do."
    Cable and Wireless is seeking a stake in the proposed
Japanese telecommunications rival to Kokusai Denshin Denwa.
    But the Japanese minister for post and telecommunications
was reported as saying that he opposed Cable and Wireless
having a managerial role in the new company.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10209>
The White House Economic Policy
Council made a recommendation to President Reagan whether to
retaliate against Japan for alleged unfair practices in
semiconductor trade, U.S. officials said.
    They would not disclose the council's recommendation, but
the officials said earlier it was likely the council would call
for retaliation and urge that curbs be imposed on Japanese
exports to the United States.
    The officials said it might be several days before Reagan
would act and his moves made public.
    The Senate last week unanimously called on Reagan to impose
penalities on Japanese exports. Retaliation was also called for
by the semiconductor industry and its chief trade union, both
hard hit by Japanese semiconductor trade.
    In a pact last summer, Japan summer agreed to stop dumping
its semiconductors at less than cost in the United States and
other nations and to open its own market to the U.S. products.
    In return, the United States agreed to hold up imposing
anti-dumping duties on Japanese semiconductor shipments.
    U.S. officials say that while Japan has stopped dumping
semiconductors on the American market, they have continued to
dump them in third countries and that the Japanese market has
remained all but closed to the U.S. semiconductors.
semiconductors on the American market, they have continued to
dump them in third countries and that the Japanese market has
remained all but closed to the U.S. semiconductors.
 reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10255>
The United States' emphasis on its
foreign trade deficit is misplaced and the country's real
problem lies in its large federal budget deficit, the General
Agreeement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) said.
     By stressing its record trade deficit of 169.8 billion
dlrs last year, the U.S. Was fuelling protectionist pressure
which threatens the world trading system, it said in an annual
report.
    The fundamental problem, the size of the U.S. Federal
budget deficit, could be remedied only by cutting government
spending or encouraging personal savings to finance the debt,
it said.
    GATT also predicted world trade would grow by only 2.5 pct
in 1987 -- a full percentage point lower than in each of the
previous two years.
    GATT experts urged Washington to resist protectionism and
instead seek macroeconomic changes to reduce the current
account payments deficit -- higher private savings, lower
investment and a smaller federal budget deficit.
    Raising U.S. Trade barriers "would result in little or no
reduction in the current account deficit. It would, however,
increase inflation and reduce world trade," it said.
    "The basic cause -- some combination of insufficient
domestic savings and an excessive budget deficit -- would
remain," the report said.
    GATT economists said trade expansion would slow this year
because of slower growth forecasts in Japan and some West
European nations as they adjust production and workforces to a
low dollar, risk of higher U.S. Inflation, concerns over Third
World debt management and looming protectionism.
    The report also said imbalances in the current accounts of
Japan, West Germany and the U.S. Had increased in 1986.
    The most likely explanation was that exchange rate changes
were not backed by changes in macroeconomic policies, it added.
    "Thus the prediction that these imbalances would be reduced
as a result of the major realignment of exchange rates was not
borne out last year," the report said.
    GATT warned there was a risk of a sizeable increase in the
U.S. Inflation rate under the combined impact of a rapidly
expanding money supply and low dollar.
    "Such a development could worsen the business climate by
increasing uncertainty and pushing up interest rates, which, in
turn, would adversely affect world trade."
    But the report noted a surprising rise in imports to the
United States, despite the dollar's depreciation which makes
foreign products more expensive.
    It suggested that resources idle in the U.S., Both human
and in underutilised factories, were not geared to produce the
goods and services sought from abroad.
    World trade in manufactures grew by only three pct in 1986,
about half of the rate of the previous year.
    Trade in agricultural goods expanded by just one pct,
continuing a stagnant pattern in that sector this decade, GATT
said.
    Developing countries' exports declined significantly, while
their imports increased moderately, although full statistics
are not available yet, GATT said.
    The combined export earnings of 16 major indebted nations
were sharply lower, and only five of them (Chile, Colombia,
Philippines, South Korea, and Thailand) had higher exports.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10264>
The White House Economic Policy
Council decided to recommend trade sanctions against Japan for
violations of the U.S.-Japanese semiconductor agreement,
industry sources said.
    They would give no details, noting that the White House had
not commented on the decision. The administration has been
under pressure to retaliate.
    There was no immediate announcement on the council's
decision, but U.S. Officials said it was likely the senior
policy group's move on curbs reflected growing American
frustration over alleged unfair Japanese trade practices.
    U.S. Officials said President Reagan would probably act on
the recommendations in a day or so, after consulting with aides
on the foreign policy implications of retaliation.
    The officials said Reagan might delay retaliation for a
last try to persuade Japan to abide by the agreement reached
last July governing trade in semiconductors.
    Under a pact reached last July, Japan was to stop dumping
semiconductors in world markets and to open its own market to
U.S.-made semiconductors.
    In return, the U.S. Agreed to hold up imposing anti-dumping
duties on Japanese semiconductor shipments.
    The United States said that dumping has stopped in the U.S.
Market but has continued in third countries, and that the
Japanese market remains closed.
    The pressure on Reagan to retaliate included a unanimous
call by the Senate last week to impose penalties on Japanese
high technology products containing semiconductors.
    A call for retaliation also came from the semiconductor
industry and from its chief trade union.
    U.S. Officials said the most likely move against Japan
would involve duties on semiconductor-based goods, such as
televisions, video cassette recorders and computers.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10265>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone will
make an official week-long visit to the United States from
April 29 and hold talks in Washington with President Reagan,
Chief Cabinet Secretary Masaharu Gotoda told reporters.
    Government sources said Nakasone would try to resolve
growing bilateral trade friction and discuss the June Venice
summit of Western industrial democracies.
    Foreign Minister Tadashi Kuranari will accompany Nakasone,
ministry officials said.
    U.S. Industry sources in Washington said the White House
Economic Policy Council was recommending trade sanctions
against Japan for violating the two countries' agreement on
semiconductor trade.
    Under the pact, Japan pledged to stop dumping microchips in
the U.S. And Asia and open its domestic market to U.S.
Semiconductors.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10268>
India is searching for non-communist
countertrade partners to help it cut its trade deficit and
conserve foreign exchange.
    Wheat, tobacco, tea, coffee, jute, engineering and
electronic goods, as well as minerals including iron ore, are
all on offer in return for crude oil, petroleum products,
chemicals, steel and machinery, trade sources told Reuters.
    Most of the impetus behind countertrade, which began in
1984, comes from two state trading firms -- the State Trading
Corp (STC) and the Minerals and Metals Trading Corp (MMTC).
    "The two state trading corporations are free to use their
buying power in respect to bulk commodities to promote Indian
exports," a commerce ministry spokeswoman said, adding that
private firms are excluded from countertrading.
    One trade source said India has targetted countries that
depend on an Indian domestic market recently opened to foreign
imports.
    However, countertrade deals still make up only a small part
of India's total trading and are likely to account for less
than eight pct of the estimated 18.53 billion dlrs in trade
during the nine months ended December, the sources said.
    Countertrade accounted for just five pct of India's 25.65
billion dlrs in trade during fiscal 1985/86 ended March,
against almost nothing in 1984/85, official figures show.
    However, the figures exclude exchanges with the Eastern
Bloc paid in non-convertible Indian rupees, the sources said.
    Total trade with the Soviet Union, involving swaps of
agricultural produce and textiles for Soviet arms and crude
oil, is estimated at 3.04 billion dlrs in fiscal 1986/87,
against three billion in 1985/86.
    Indian countertrade, which is being promoted mainly to help
narrow the country's large trade deficit, is still
insignificant compared with agreements reached by Indonesia,
Venezuela and Brazil, the trade sources said.
    The trade deficit, which hit an estimated record 6.96
billion dlrs in 1985/86, is expected to decline to 5.6 billion
in the current fiscal year.
    But the push to include non-communist countries in
countertrade is also due to other factors, including the slow
growth of foreign reserves, a tight debt repayment schedule,
shrinking aid and trade protectionism, businessmen said.
    One source said India is showing more dynamism in promoting
countertrade deals than in the past, when the deals were made
discreetly because they break GATT rules. As a member of the
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), India cannot
officially support bartering.
    The MMTC's recent countertrade deals include iron ore
exports to Yugoslavia for steel structures and rails.
    "MMTC's recent global tenders now include a clause that
preference will be given to parties who accept payment in kind
for goods and services sold to India," a trade official said,
adding that the policy remains flexible.
    "We also take into account other factors such as prices at
which the goods and services are offered to India," the trade
official said.
    Early this year the commerce ministry quietly told foreign
companies interested in selling aircraft, ships, drilling rigs
and railway equipment to India that they stood a better chance
if they bought Indian goods or services in return, the trade
sources said.
    Illustrating the point, the official said a South Korean
firm recently agreed to sell a drilling platform worth 40 mln
dlrs to the state-run Oil and Natural Gas Commission.
    In return, the South Koreans gave a verbal assurance to buy
Indian goods worth 10 pct of the contract, against the 25 pct
sought by New Delhi, the trade official said.
    "We selected the Korean firm because its bid was the lowest,"
he added.
    Countertrade is helping African countries short of foreign
currency to import goods. India has signed a trade protocol to
buy up to 15,000 tonnes of asbestos fibre from Zimbabwe in
exchange for Indian goods, including jute bags and cars.
    But despite India's new drive, countertrade has some
inherent problems, they added.
    "It is not always easy to meet the basic requirement that
the trade should always be balanced," one trade source said. "The
other problem is it is often difficult to supply or buy
commodities which the other party wants."
    Another added, "Barter is also restrictive. We look upon it
as a temporary measure to get over the current balance of
payments difficulty.
    "This is why countertrade has not been made a law in India.
It does not even figure in the country's foreign trade policy."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10275>
Four major Japanese steelmakers plan to
form a seamless pipe export cartel for markets other than the
U.S. And the European Community for a year from April to keep
prices above output costs, company officials involved said.
    The companies are Nippon steel Corp &lt;NSTC.T>, Sumitomo
Metal Industries Ltd &lt;SMIT.T>, Nippon Kokan KK &lt;NKKT.T> and
Kawasaki Steel Corp &lt;KAWS.T>, which together account for some
95 pct of Japan's total seamless pipe exports.
    The firms will apply to form the cartel to the Ministry of
International Trade and Industry today and approval is expected
later this month, the officials said.
    Under the plan, the four companies will set floor prices
for exports as prices have fallen sharply due to the yen's
appreciation against the dollar, reduced world demand caused by
lower oil prices and excess domestic capacity which resulted in
price-cutting competition, the officials said.
    In calendar 1986, seamless pipe exports fell to 2.34 mln
tonnes from 2.99 mln in 1985 and 3.12 mln in 1981.
    The officials declined to give any idea of floor prices,
saying it depends partly on volume, but industry sources
estimate average export prices would rise by around 20 pct to
some 800 dlrs a tonne.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10297>
Japan's current account surplus rose to
7.38 billion dlrs in February from 3.89 billion a year ago and
from 4.95 billion in January, the Finance Ministry said.
    The trade surplus rose to 8.14 billion dlrs in February
from 4.77 billion a year earlier and 5.70 billion in January.
    The long-term capital account deficit widened to 11.40
billion dlrs from 8.06 billion a year ago, but it narrowed from
12.32 billion in January, the Ministry said.
    Japan's February exports rose to 16.74 billion dlrs from
14.89 billion in February 1986 and from 14.65 billion in
January, the Ministry said. Imports fell to 8.61 billion from
10.12 billion a year earlier and 8.94 billion in January.
    The invisible trade deficit fell to 617 mln dlrs in
February from 693 mln a year earlier, but was up from a 527 mln
deficit in January.
    Figures do not tally exactly because of rounding.
    Transfer payments narrowed to a 140 mln dlr deficit last
month from a 185 mln deficit a year earlier and a 225 mln
deficit in January.
    The basic balance of payments deficit in February fell to
4.02 billion dlrs from 4.17 billion in February 1986 and 7.37
billion in January. Short-term capital account payments swung
to a 1.28 billion dlr deficit in February from a 1.60 billion
surplus a year earlier and a 1.44 billion dlr surplus in
January.
    Errors and omissions were 2.65 billion dlrs in surplus,
compared with a 1.27 billion surplus a year earlier and a 1.10
billion deficit in January. The overall balance of payments
deficit rose to 2.65 billion dlrs from 1.30 billion a year
earlier but was down from 7.04 billion in January.
    The seasonally adjusted trade surplus fell to 9.16 billion
dlrs in February from the record 9.58 billion in January, the
Ministry said.
    The seasonally adjusted current account surplus also
dropped to 8.4 billion dlrs in February from the record 8.83
billion set in January.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10341>
Japan today announced another mammoth
monthly trade surplus that economists said would be sure to
intensify already mounting pressure on the country for action.
    "The world has every reason to be furious with Japan for not
moving more quickly," Jardine Fleming (Securities) Ltd economist
Eric Rasmussen said.
    The Finance Ministry said today that the trade surplus
soared to 8.14 billion dlrs in February from 5.7 billion in
January and 4.77 billion a year ago.
    The current account surplus, which includes trade in
services as well as goods, climbed to 7.38 billion dlrs last
month from 4.95 billion in January and 3.89 billion a year ago.
    After being adjusted for seasonal fluctuations, the figures
look a bit better, but not much. On that basis, the trade
surplus declined slightly in February to 9.16 billion dlrs from
a record 9.58 billion in January.
    "In the medium term we expect this modest improvement to
continue but the pace of progress may be too slow to ward off
further protectionism or further yen strength," said William
Stirling, economist at Merrill Lynch Japan Inc.
    A strong yen would make Japanese goods more expensive on
world markets while making imports into the country cheaper.
    "On a seasonally adjusted basis, we appear to be making some
progress on getting exports down," Jardine's Rasmussen said.
    But imports do not seem to be picking up much because the
Japanese economy remains sluggish, he said.
    Finance Ministry officials blamed last month's slower
import growth on a decline in oil imports as refiners worked
off stocks they had built up in January.
    The officials took comfort from a decline in the volume of
exports last month, after an unexpected year-on-year increase
in January.
    This means the effects of the two-year rise of the yen
against the U.S. Dollar are finally beginning to have an impact
on exports, they said.
    But economists warned that may not be soon enough for
Japan's trading partners.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10347>
World Bank President Barber Conable
called on Japan to boost investment in developing nations, for
its own sake as well as that of the world economy.
    "Japan has the means to make a major contribution to
development in the Third World," he told about 500 Japanese
businessmen and academics. "I would be pleased with additional
support."
    With 25 pct of the world's total banking assets, Japan
could do more to help assist indebted Third World countries
develop roads, bridges and other infrastructure, he said.
    Conable said additional commercial bank investment would
also be to Japan's advantage.
    It would profit from rechannelling its huge trade surplus
into Third World economies -- notably those in South America,
China and India -- that are likely to expand faster than those
in the developed world, he said.
    Japan is now the second largest shareholder in the Bank's
concessionary lending affiliate, the International Development
Association (IDA). It has also agreed recently to expand its
contribution to another affiliate, the International Bank for
Reconstruction and Development (IBRD), Conable noted.
    Conable said the World Bank was expanding its structural
adjustment loans, designed to encourage developing countries to
open their economies more to free competition and trade.
    "Adjustment loans could rise to 30 pct (of total World Bank
loans) in the near future, though maybe not this year," Conable
told Reuters after his speech.
    Such loans currently account for slightly over 20 pct.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10352>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone will
make an official week-long visit to the United States from
April 29 and hold talks in Washington with President Reagan,
Chief Cabinet Secretary Masaharu Gotoda told reporters.
    Government sources said Nakasone would try to resolve
growing bilateral trade friction and discuss the June Venice
summit of Western industrial democracies.
    Foreign Minister Tadashi Kuranari will accompany Nakasone,
ministry officials said.
    U.S. Industry sources in Washington said the White House
Economic Policy Council was recommending trade sanctions
against Japan for violating the two countries' agreement on
semiconductor trade.
    Under the pact, Japan pledged to stop dumping microchips in
the U.S. And Asia and open its domestic market to U.S.
Semiconductors.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10355>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone will
visit Washington next month in a bid to defuse mounting U.S.
Anger over Japanese trade policies, but Western diplomats said
they believed his chances of success were slim.
    Boxed in by powerful political pressure groups and
widespread opposition to his tax reform plans, Nakasone will be
hard-pressed to come up with anything new to tell U.S.
President Ronald Reagan and key U.S. Congressmen, they said.
    News of the week-long visit starting April 29 coincided
with news that Japan recorded a 8.14 billion dlr trade surplus
last month, more than 70 pct higher than a year earlier.
    It also came one day after the Reagan Administration's
Economic Policy Council decided to take retaliatory action
against Japan for its alleged failure to live up to a joint
trade agreement on computer microchips.
    Nakasone wants to go armed with two separate packages - one
designed to pep up Japan's sagging economy and imports in the
short-term, the other to redirect the country in the medium
term away from its over-dependence on exports for growth.
    But government officials said political infighting could
rob both packages of much of their punch and might even prevent
one from seeing the light of day.
    Nakasone has insisted that the government would not draw up
a package of short-term economic measures until after its
1987/88 budget passed parliament because he feared that would
amount to a tacit admission that the budget was inadequate.
    But his hopes for quick passage of the budget in time for
his trip have been shattered by a parliamentary boycott by
opposition parties protesting over the sales tax plan.
    Faced with the possibility that he might have to go to the
U.S. Virtually empty-handed, Nakasone today ordered his ruling
Liberal Democratic Party (LDP) to come up with its own
measures.
    He can then tell Reagan the LDP package will form the basis
of the government's plans, without losing face in parliament
over the budget, political analysts said.
    Officials working on the government's short-term economic
package said it would probably include interest rate cuts on
loans by government corporations, deregulation, measures to
pass on some of the benefits of the strong yen to consumers in
the form of lower prices, and accelerated public investment.
    They said a record portion of state investment planned for
the entire 1987/88 fiscal year will take place in the first
half, probably over 80 pct.
    Diplomats said that was unlikely to be enough to satisfy
Reagan, who is under pressure from the Democrat-controlled U.S.
Congress to take greater action to cut the huge American trade
deficit.
    To complement the short-term measures, Nakasone is also
likely to present Reagan with details of Japan's longer-term
economic plans.
    A high-ranking advisory body headed by former Bank of Japan
governor Haruo Maekawa is expected to come up with a final
report outlining concrete steps to redirect the economy days
before Nakasone is scheduled to leave for Washington.
    Its recommendations are designed as a follow-up to
Maekawa's report last year on economic restructuring and are
likely to cover such potentially politically explosive areas as
agricultural reform and land policy, officials said.
    While wanting to make the report as explicit and detailed
as possible, they said the political realities might force them
to water down some of the committee's recommendations.
    A subcommittee is considering what the Japanese economy
might look like in the medium to longer term after it undergoes
massive restructuring, officials said. The subcommittee
projects that the current account surplus will fall to less
than two pct of Japan's total output, or gross national
product, around 1993 or 1995. Last year the surplus, which
measures trade in goods and services, amounted to over four pct
of gnp.
    The subcommittee also projects annual economic growth for
Japan of nearly four pct over that period and a very gradual
appreciation of the yen, to about 130 to the dollar by around
1993, from 150 now.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10372>
South Africa's trade surplus rose
to 1.62 billion rand in February after falling to 906.2 mln in
January, Customs and Excise figures show.
    This compares with a year earlier surplus of 958.9 mln
rand.
    Exports rose slightly to 3.36 billion rand in February from
3.31 billion in January but imports fell to 1.74 billion from
2.41 billion.
    This brought total exports for the first two months of 1987
to 6.67 billion rand and imports to 4.15 billion for a total
surplus of 2.52 billion rand against 1.71 billion a year
earlier.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10375>
India is searching for non-communist
countertrade partners to help it cut its trade deficit and
conserve foreign exchange.
    Wheat, tobacco, tea, coffee, jute, engineering and
electronic goods, as well as minerals including iron ore, are
all on offer in return for crude oil, petroleum products,
chemicals, steel and machinery, trade sources told Reuters.
    Most of the impetus behind countertrade, which began in
1984, comes from two state trading firms -- the State Trading
Corp (STC) and the Minerals and Metals Trading Corp (MMTC).
    "The two state trading corporations are free to use their
buying power in respect to bulk commodities to promote Indian
exports," a commerce ministry spokeswoman said, adding that
private firms are excluded from countertrading.
    One trade source said India has targetted countries that
depend on an Indian domestic market recently opened to foreign
imports.
    However, countertrade deals still make up only a small part
of India's total trading and are likely to account for less
than eight pct of the estimated 18.53 billion dlrs in trade
during the nine months ended December, the sources said.
    Countertrade accounted for just five pct of India's 25.65
billion dlrs in trade during fiscal 1985/86 ended March,
against almost nothing in 1984/85, official figures show.
    However, the figures exclude exchanges with the Eastern
Bloc paid in non-convertible Indian rupees, the sources said.
    Total trade with the Soviet Union, involving swaps of
agricultural produce and textiles for Soviet arms and crude
oil, is estimated at 3.04 billion dlrs in fiscal 1986/87,
against three billion in 1985/86.
    Indian countertrade, which is being promoted mainly to help
narrow the country's large trade deficit, is still
insignificant compared with agreements reached by Indonesia,
Venezuela and Brazil, the trade sources said.
    The trade deficit, which hit an estimated record 6.96
billion dlrs in 1985/86, is expected to decline to 5.6 billion
in the current fiscal year.
    But the push to include non-communist countries in
countertrade is also due to other factors, including the slow
growth of foreign reserves, a tight debt repayment schedule,
shrinking aid and trade protectionism, businessmen said.
    One source said India is showing more dynamism in promoting
countertrade deals than in the past, when the deals were made
discreetly because they break GATT rules. As a member of the
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), India cannot
officially support bartering.
    The MMTC's recent countertrade deals include iron ore
exports to Yugoslavia for steel structures and rails.
    "MMTC's recent global tenders now include a clause that
preference will be given to parties who accept payment in kind
for goods and services sold to India," a trade official said,
adding that the policy remains flexible.
    "We also take into account other factors such as prices at
which the goods and services are offered to India," the trade
official said.
    Early this year the commerce ministry quietly told foreign
companies interested in selling aircraft, ships, drilling rigs
and railway equipment to India that they stood a better chance
if they bought Indian goods or services in return, the trade
sources said.
    Illustrating the point, the official said a South Korean
firm recently agreed to sell a drilling platform worth 40 mln
dlrs to the state-run Oil and Natural Gas Commission.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10376>
Japan's current account surplus rose to
7.38 billion dlrs in February from 3.89 billion a year ago and
from 4.95 billion in January, the Finance Ministry said.
    The trade surplus rose to 8.14 billion dlrs in February
from 4.77 billion a year earlier and 5.70 billion in January.
    The long-term capital account deficit widened to 11.40
billion dlrs from 8.06 billion a year ago, but it narrowed from
12.32 billion in January, the Ministry said.
    Japan's February exports rose to 16.74 billion dlrs from
14.89 billion in February 1986 and from 14.65 billion in
January, the Ministry said. Imports fell to 8.61 billion from
10.12 billion a year earlier and 8.94 billion in January.
    The invisible trade deficit fell to 617 mln dlrs in
February from 693 mln a year earlier, but was up from a 527 mln
deficit in January.
    Figures do not tally exactly because of rounding.
    Transfer payments narrowed to a 140 mln dlr deficit last
month from a 185 mln deficit a year earlier and a 225 mln
deficit in January.
    The basic balance of payments deficit in February fell to
4.02 billion dlrs from 4.17 billion in February 1986 and 7.37
billion in January. Short-term capital account payments swung
to a 1.28 billion dlr deficit in February from a 1.60 billion
surplus a year earlier and a 1.44 billion dlr surplus in
January.
    Errors and omissions were 2.65 billion dlrs in surplus,
compared with a 1.27 billion surplus a year earlier and a 1.10
billion deficit in January. The overall balance of payments
deficit rose to 2.65 billion dlrs from 1.30 billion a year
earlier but was down from 7.04 billion in January.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10406>
India is searching for non-communist
countertrade partners to help it cut its trade deficit and
conserve foreign exchange.
    Wheat, tobacco, tea, coffee, jute, engineering and
electronic goods, as well as minerals including iron ore, are
all on offer in return for crude oil, petroleum products,
chemicals, steel and machinery, trade sources told Reuters.
    Most of the impetus behind countertrade, which began in
1984, comes from two state trading firms -- the State Trading
Corp (STC) and the Minerals and Metals Trading Corp (MMTC).
    "The two state trading corporations are free to use their
buying power in respect to bulk commodities to promote Indian
exports," a commerce ministry spokeswoman said, adding that
private firms are excluded from countertrading.
    One trade source said India has targetted countries that
depend on an Indian domestic market recently opened to foreign
imports. But countertrade deals still make up only a small part
of India's total trading and are likely to account for less
than eight pct of the estimated 18.53 billion dlrs in trade
during the nine months ended December, the sources said.
    Countertrade accounted for just five pct of India's 25.65
billion dlrs in trade during fiscal 1985/86 ended March,
against almost nothing in 1984/85, official figures show.
    However, the figures exclude exchanges with the Eastern
Bloc paid in non-convertible Indian rupees, the sources said.
    Total trade with the Soviet Union, involving swaps of
agricultural produce and textiles for Soviet arms and crude
oil, is estimated at 3.04 billion dlrs in fiscal 1986/87.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10455>
The British government may revoke the
licences of selected Japanese banks and securities companies
operating in London's financial City when they come up for
renewal next summer if progress is not made towards opening up
Japan's markets to foreign competition, government sources
said.
    "We can't say "yes, we are going to do it (revoke licences)"
but this is definitely being considered," an official said.
    His comments came after the government was formally urged
today by a cross-section of influential MPs to take joint
retaliatory action with the United States against Japan.
    Britain has grown increasingly impatient with Japanese
trade practices. "There's a sense of urgency here now, but the
emphasis is on securing - not undermining - our interests in
Japan," another government official told Reuters.
    Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher said on Thursday that
Britain would not hesitate to use new powers contained in the
Financial Services Act 1986 and the Banking Bill to retaliate
against countries that do not offer reciprocal market access.
    She clearly had Japan in mind, government sources said.
    The U.K. Last year showed a trade defict with Japan of 3.7
billion stg, official figures show.
    A parliamentary motion, signed by 98 MPs, today urged the
U.K. Government to "coordinate action with the President of the
United States, and through the Department of Trade and
Industry, to suspend all further applications from Japanese
communications companies for equipment approval by the British
Approvals Board for Telecommunications, and all further
applications from Japanese financial institutions for licences"
until authorities in Japan stopped imposing what the MPs called
"restrictive conditions" on the bid by (Cable and Wireless PLC)
(cawl.L) and its U.S. And Japanese partners for a stake in
Japan's international telecommunications market.
    The motion for retaliatory steps came from a cross-section
of MPs, reflecting the strength of feeling inside Parliament.
Parliamentarians said their action would increase pressure on
the Conservative government to take firm action.
    Officials said another option now being considered by the
U.K. Is to refuse issuing new banking licences to Japanese
institutions. That could be done under the government's
proposed Banking Bill now moving through parliament.
    58 Japanese financial institutions are authorised to deal
in London, of which 29 are banks. In Tokyo, 14 London-based
firms are authorised to do financial business, officials said.
    The new financial services and banking acts offer Britain
an alternative for retaliation which would be otherwise denied
under legally-binding international trade agreements.
    "The Financial Services Act gives (Trade and Industry
Secretary Paul) Channon power to stop firms from engaging in
investment, banking and insurance," one official said.
    "This point has been made to the Japanese at official level
a number times," the official added.
    Britain and France are now working together to urge that
the European Community take collective action against Japan,
but by working within EC treaties, another official said.
    British Trade Minister Alan Clark said this week in a radio
interview that the European Community should build barriers
against Japanese imports through certification procedures
similar to those facing European exporters in Japan.
    "There comes a point where you cannot resist any longer," he
said, adding "(such barriers) can't be put in place overnight."
Clark said the issue of reciprocity regarding visible trade
"strikes at the basis of whether British industry is to have a
fair access to an extremely large market (Japan) which is
itself in a very dominant position (in) certain aspects of our
own domestic market ... It is really a question of fairness."
    The situation is only likely to worsen following news that
Japan's trade surplus with the rest of the world rose by more
than 70 pct in February, year-on-year, to 8.14 billion dlrs
from 5.7 billion in January, political sources said.
    But Clark said in his interview that the issues of visible
trade and access to financial markets should be kept separate.
    Should Britain decide to act against Japanese financial
institutions, it would most likely focus on the smaller, rather
than larger ones, to minimise any risks to its role as a global
business centre, government sources said. Japan's four largest
securities houses are members of the London Stock Exchange.
    In Washington, White House officials said President Reagan
was ready to impose retaliatory trade action against Japan for
breaking its semiconductor agreement with the United States.
    There was no immediate indication when Reagan might act on
the recommendations of his Economic Policy Council to curb
Japanese exports to the United States but officials said the
move could come today or early next week.
    Trade sources said the actions being weighed by Reagan
included tariffs on a wide variety of Japanese exports which
use semiconductors.
 REUTER


</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10520>
Hungary's economy and hard currency
trade have failed so far this year to reverse a two-year
unfavourable trend, the official Hungarian news agency MTI
said.
    Industrial production in January and February was only 1.3
pct up on the same 1986 period, MTI said, while hard currency
exports fell six pct as imports rose 10 pct.
    Hungary's hard currency trade fell into a deficit of 539.4
mln dlrs last year from a surplus of 295.3 mln in 1985 and 1.2
billion in 1984.
    MTI quoted a government spokesman saying last December's
wage freeze decree would expire on April 1 as envisaged.
    Gross domestic product grew a sluggish one pct in 1986
after stagnating in 1985 and growing 2.6 pct in 1984.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10530>
President Reagan was ready to impose
retaliatory trade action against Japan for breaking its
semiconductor agreement with the United States, White House
officials said.
    There was no immediate indication when Reagan might act on
the recommendations of his Economic Policy Council to curb
Japanese exports to the United States, but officials said the
move could come today or early next week.
    Trade sources said the actions being weighed by Reagan
include tariffs on a wide variety of Japanese exports which use
semiconductors.
    The sources said the tariffs could be slapped on personal
computers, television receivers and laser-printers, with the
aim of penalizing Japan's major electronic firms, including NEC
Corp, Hitachi Ltd, Toshiba Corp and Fujitsu Ltd.
    They said Reaan could also delay invoking sanctions for a
week or two, giving Japan a final opportunity to end the
dumping practice, but added that negotiators had already held
extensive talks with the Japanese to no avail.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10608>
Japanese computer chip makers reacted
angrily to news the United States plans to take retaliatory
action against them for allegedly failing to live up to an
agreement on trade in computer microchips.
    Electronic Industries Association of Japan (EIAJ) Chairman
Shoichi Saba stated: "EIAJ believes that it is premature and
even irrational to attempt an assessment of the impact of the
agreement and our efforts to comply with it only six months
after concluding the agreement."
    "We urge U.S. Governmental authorities to reconsider the
decision made, to evaluate fairly the results of Japanese
efforts in implementing the objectives of the agreement, and to
resist emotional biases," he said.
    Yesterday, Washington announced plans to slap as much as
300 mln dlrs in tariffs on Japanese imports in retaliation for
what is sees as Japan's failure to comply with the terms of the
pact.
    The agreement, struck late last year after months of heated
negotiations, called on Japan to stop selling cut-price chips
on world markets and to buy more American-made semiconductors.
    To salvage the pact, Tokyo has instructed its chip makers
to slash production and has helped establish a multi-lateral
organisation designed to promote chip imports.
    Saba said that Japanese chip companies have pledged three
mln dlrs over the next five years to the new organisation and
expressed regret that no American company has seen fit to join.
    "This suggests that American semiconductor manufacturers may
not be really interested in participating in the Japanese
market," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10623>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone sounded
a conciliatory note in Japan's increasingly bitter row with the
United States over trade in computer microchips.
    "Japan wants to resolve the issue through consultations by
explaining its stance thoroughly and correcting the points that
need to be corrected," he was quoted by Kyodo News Service as
saying.
    While expressing regret over America's decision to impose
tariffs on imports of Japanese electrical goods, Nakasone said
Tokyo was willing to send a high-level official to Washington
to help settle the dispute.
    Government officials said Japan would make a formal request
next week for emergency talks and that the two sides would
probably meet the week after, just days before the April 17
deadline set by Washington for the tariffs to take effect.
    Tokyo is expected to propose a joint U.S./Japan
investigation of American claims that Japanese companies are
dumping cut-price chips in Asian markets.
    Yesterday, Washington announced plans to put as much as 300
mln dlrs in tariffs on imports of certain Japanese electronic
goods in retaliation for what it sees as Tokyo's failure to
live up to their bilateral chip pact.
    That agreement, hammered out late last year after months of
heated negotiations, called on Japan to stop selling cut-price
chips in world markets and to buy more American-made chips.
    Nakasone's comments seemed distinctly more conciliatory
than those of his Trade and Industry Minister, Hajime Tamura,
who earlier today said Japan was ready to take "appropriate
measures" if Washington went ahead with the sanctions.
    Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI)
officials later sought to downplay the significance of Tamura's
remark and said that his main message was that the two sides
need to talk urgently about the issue.
    But they admitted that Japan was considering taking the
United States to GATT, the Geneva-based international
organization which polices world trade, if Washington imposed
the tariffs.
    Any Japanese action would probably be taken under Article
23 of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), they
said. If that article were invoked, GATT would set up a panel
to consider the legality of the U.S. Action.
    But officials here said they hope that can be avoided. "It
may be wishful thinking but there is a possibility the United
States may lift its decision at an early date," Tamura said.
    In announcing the U.S. Sanctions yesterday, President
Ronald Reagan said he was prepared to lift them once he had
evidence that Japan was no longer dumping chips in world
markets and had opened up its own market to imports.
    Japanese government officials said they are confident they
can make the pact work.
    They said that the export of cut-price Japanese chips
through unregulated distributors has all but dried up after
MITI instructed domestic makers to cut output.
    While acknowledging that it is harder to increase Japanese
imports of American chips, MITI officials said that the
ministry is doing all it can to ensure that happens.
    The Ministry recently called on Japan's major chip users,
some of whom are also leading producers, to step up their
purchases of foreign semiconductors.
    A spokesman for one of the companies, Toshiba Corp &lt;TSBA.T>
said his firm would do just that and could announce its plans
in the next week or so. He expects other Japanese companies to
do likewise.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10625>
The Islamic Development Bank (IDB) and
20 Islamic Banks signed an agreement to establish a 50 mln dlr
trade portfolio to finance trade among Islamic countries, IDB
sources said.
    They said IDB's share in the portfolio, which will only
finance exports and imports of the private sector, was limited
to up to 25 mln dlrs.
    The sources said shares in the porfolio could be traded or
redeemed by the IDB, adding that this was a major step in
establishing an Islamic financial market.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10642>
Japan is seeking to prevent its computer
chips dispute with the U.S. From erupting into a full-scale
trade war, government officials said.
    "We hope that the dispute on this specific issue won't have
an adverse effect on our overall relationship with the United
States," a Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI)
official said.
     On Friday, Washington announced plans for as much as 300
mln dlrs in tariffs on Japanese electronic goods for Tokyo's
alleged failure to live up to a bilateral computer chip pact.
    That agreement, reached last year after heated
negotiations, called on Japan to stop selling cut-price chips
in world markets and to buy more American-made semiconductors.
    Foreign Ministry officials immediately tried to isolate the
fall-out from the dispute by seeking to separate it from Prime
Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's planned trip to Washington at the
end of April.
    While Japan has already done about all it can to make sure
the chip pact is working, the government is studying measures
it can take in other fields to defuse American anger and ensure
the trip's success, they said.
    "The perception of Japan in the (U.S.) Congress is very bad,"
one official told Reuters. "We would very much like to do
something to respond to that."
    In an apparent effort to prevent the chip dispute from
spreading to other areas, MITI officials sought to depict the
U.S. Action as a severe warning to Japanese semiconductor
makers, not to the government.
    Faced with a belligerent domestic chip industry and an
angry American Congress, the Japanese government has been
forced to walk an increasingly fine line in the semiconductor
dispute, trade analysts said.
    They said that it was an open secret that Japan's largest
chip maker, NEC Corp, was not happy with what it viewed as the
draconian measures MITI was taking to implement the pact,
included enforced production cuts.
    The angry response of Japanese chip makers yesterday to the
announcement of the U.S. Tariffs highlighted the difficulties
the government faces in taking further action.
    "Japanese semiconductor manufacturers have complied with the
U.S./Japan agreement," said Shoichi Saba, Chairman of the
Electronic Industries Association of Japan.
    He accused the U.S. Of being "irrational." He said the U.S.
Action had made the bilateral chip pact "meaningless."
    Saba's comments contrasted with those of Prime Minister
Yasuhiro Nakasone, who said Tokyo wanted to solve the dispute
through consultations.
    Japan is expected to send a high-level official to
Washington early next month to try to convince the U.S. Not to
go ahead with the tariffs on April 17.
    Trade analysts say Tokyo is likely to outline industry
plans to step up purchases of U.S. Chips and to propose a joint
investigation into Washington's allegations of chip dumping.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10643>
The U.S. Expects more harmonious
talks than usual during French Prime Minister Jacques Chirac's
first official visit this week as frequently rancorous disputes
between the two countries begin to fade.
    "The Libyan bombing is a thing of the past, the trade war
didn't happen and we have reached reasonably good cooperation
on terrorism," one U.S. Official told Reuters.
    "It looks like a reasonably harmonious visit in prospect,
more harmonious than usual."
    Since taking office a year ago, Chirac has been obliged to
deal with a series of potentially serious disputes with the
United States.
    During the U.S. Bombing of alleged terrorist targets in
Libya last April, France refused to allow British-based U.S.
Planes to overfly its territory, forcing them to take a
circuitous route. That angered Washington.
    The U.S. Officials, who asked not to be identified, said a
year ago Washington felt the French were not taking strong
enough action against terrorism. "Now they are. We're pleased
and they are pleased that we are pleased," one said.
    More recently, a dispute over U.S. Access to the grain
markets of Spain and Portugal after they joined the European
Community  threatened to become a trade war.
    In retaliation for what Washington saw as deliberate
Community moves to exclude U.S. Grain, the United States was
poised to impose swingeing tariffs on European Community food
imports and a major trade war was averted at the last minute.
    Last week, the forces of President Hissene Habre of Chad,
supported, trained and armed by Paris and Washington, scored a
major success by pushing Libyan troops out of their last bases
in northern Chad.
    A French official added: "There is also a common interest in
getting Japan to cut its trade surplus with the rest of the
world by opening up its markets."
    Although relations have improved markedly between the two
countries, many irritants remain. At the top of the list is the
Community's common agricultural policy (CAP).
    To Washington, as one official put it, "CAP is the root of
all evil" in international food trade because it subsidises
farmers and sells vast amounts of excess produce at below world
prices, thereby eating into U.S. Markets.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10665>
The United States and Japan will
soon settle their trade dispute over semiconductors, U.S.
Commerce secretary Malcolm Baldrige said on television.
    Baldrige, referring to the U.S.-Japan trade agreement on
semiconductors, said: "Their government wants to live up to it.
Their industries haven't been doing it, and I think we'll have
a good settlement to spare both sides."
    "I think the Japanese understand full well that they haven't
lived up to this commitment," he said.
    He added: "I do not think there will be a trade war at all."
    On Friday, Washington announced plans to put as much as 300
mln dlrs in tariffs on Japanese electronic goods from April 17,
because of Tokyo's failure to observe the agreement.
    The officials said the tariffs would be ended as soon as
Japan started adhering to the agreement. But they said there
was little chance Japan could react quickly enough to avert the
higher tariffs.
    Baldrige said the Reagan administration hoped the strong
U.S. Action against Japan would convince Congress to tone down
protectionist trade legislation now being drafted.
    He denied the action had been taken for that reason.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10695>
The Japanese government appears to have
little new to offer to settle a dispute with the U.S. Over
computer chips, trade analysts and government officials said.
    The U.S. Has threatened to impose tariffs worth up to 300
mln dlrs on Japanese electronics exports to the U.S., In
retaliation for Japan's alleged failure to keep a pact on the
microchip trade signed last September.
    A Foreign Ministry official told Reuters "Japan has done
what it can, and now we must persuade the United States to wait
for those steps to take effect."
    The U.S. Alleges that, in defiance of the September
agreement, Japan is still selling microchips at below cost in
non-U.S. Markets and refusing to open Japan further to U.S.
Chip sales. U.S. Tariffs are due to take effect on April 17.
     Analysts noted Japan's Ministry of International Trade and
Industry (MITI) has already ordered chipmakers to cut
production in order to dry up the source of cheap chips sold in
third countries at non-regulated prices.
    "I'm not sure MITI can do much more than it has," said
Jardine Fleming (Securities) Ltd analyst Nick Edwards.
    A MITI official said the Ministry was not planning to call
for production cuts beyond those already sought, although it
would continue to press chip users to buy more foreign goods.
    Spokesmen for some Japanese electronics firms said they
would consider buying more U.S. Chips. But a Matsushita
Electric Industrial Co spokesman said a rapid increase in
imports was not likely.
    Most analysts said Japanese exporters would be hard hit if
the United States did implement the tariffs, which would be
levied on consumer electronics products rather than on
microchips themselves.
    "If the tariffs remain in place for any length of time,
there will be complete erosion of exports to the United States,"
said Tom Murtha, analyst at James Capel and Co.
    "The Japanese electronics industry is too powerful to be
stopped altogether, but recovery for the industry will be
delayed for another year," he said.
    Some analysts said tariffs would also harm U.S. Industry by
stepping up offshore production and by reducing demand in Japan
for semiconductors U.S. Firms are trying to sell here.
    "The American approach is full of contradictions," Jardine
Fleming's Edwards said.
    "If they want to expand (U.S.) exports, the last thing they
want to do is hit the makers of the final products because that
hurts the final market," Edwards said.
    But other analysts said the dispute reflects not just U.S.
Concern over what it sees as a strategic industry, but also
frustration with Japan's vast trade surplus. Some analysts
argued that to solve the semiconductor problem Japan may have
to take action beyond that pledged in the semiconductor pact.
    Carole Ryavec, an analyst at Salomon Brothers Asia Ltd,
said "The major overall issue is to stimulate the domestic
economy and move away from an export-dependent economy."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10767>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone sounded
a conciliatory note in Japan's increasingly bitter row with the
United States over trade in computer microchips.
    "Japan wants to resolve the issue through consultations by
explaining its stance thoroughly and correcting the points that
need to be corrected," he was quoted by Kyodo News Service as
saying.
    While expressing regret over America's decision to impose
tariffs on imports of Japanese electrical goods, Nakasone said
Tokyo was willing to send a high-level official to Washington
to help settle the dispute.
    Government officials said Japan would make a formal request
next week for emergency talks and that the two sides would
probably meet the week after, just days before the April 17
deadline set by Washington for the tariffs to take effect.
    Tokyo is expected to propose a joint U.S./Japan
investigation of American claims that Japanese companies are
dumping cut-price chips in Asian markets.
    On Friday, Washington announced plans to put as much as 300
mln dlrs in tariffs on imports of certain Japanese electronic
goods in retaliation for what it sees as Tokyo's failure to
live up to their bilateral chip pact.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10771>
Japan is becoming dangerously isolated
again as the U.S. And Europe feel they have been cheated by
Japanese promises to switch from export to domestic-led growth,
officials and businessmen from around the world said.
    As the dollar today slipped to a record low below 145 yen,
making Japanese exporters and holders of dollar investments
grit their teeth harder, Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa said
there was a perception Japan had reneged on its promise.
    The problem goes deep and centres on misunderstandings by
both sides over the key Maekawa report of April, last year.
    The document was prepared by a private committee formed by
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone and led by former Bank of
Japan head Haruo Maekawa. It recommended that to stop friction
due to its large trade surpluses, Japan must "make a historical
transformation in its traditional policies on economic
management and the nation's lifestyle. There can be no further
development for Japan without this transformation."
    Americans and Europeans took the report to heart and have
looked in vain for clear signs of this historic change. But the
Japanese remain doubtful about the short, or even medium term
prospects of totally transforming their economic habits.
    The bubble of frustration against what appears as Japanese
prevarication burst last week. The U.S. Said it intended to
raise tariffs of as much as 300 mln dlrs on Japanese exports to
the U.S. On the grounds Japan had abrogated a bilateral
semiconductor pact.
    British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher threatened to
block Japanese financial firms from London after the Japanese
placed what the British say are restrictive conditions on a bid
by British firm Cable and Wireless to join a domestic
telecommunications joint venture.
    On Friday, European currency dealers said European central
banks, annoyed at restrictive Japanese trade practises, might
leave Japan alone to intervene to staunch the rise of the yen.
    Eishiro Saito, head of top Japanese business group
Keidanren, spotted the dangers inherent in such contradictory
views last November when he visited the European Community.
"Related to this matter of (trade) imbalance, the point that I
found to be of great cause for alarm during this trip to Europe
was the excessive degree of hope placed by the Europeans in the
results of the Maekawa report," he said.
    "We explained that the process of restructuring the economy
away from its dependence on exports toward a balance between
domestic and external demand...Would take time," Saito said.
    Saito's words were ignored. In February, EC Industrial
Policy Director Heinrich von Moltke came to Japan and said "I
only know that your government, under the leadership of
Maekawa, points to restructuring your economy into a less
outward looking, more inward looking one. It is the Maekawa
report which has attracted the most attention in Europe."
    And Europeans and Americans want quick action. "A far better
answer than protectionism would be structural change within the
Japanese economy, the kind suggested by the Maekawa report. And
we hope to see changes occur in the near future," visiting
Chairman of General Motors Roger Smith said in March.
    Such expectations are now ingrained, which was partly the
fault of Nakasone, who heralded Maekawa's report as a sea of
change in Japanese affairs, said U.S. Officials.
    Months before the report was issued, U.S. And EC business
leaders met their Japanese colleagues to discuss the trade
problem.
    "We are more anxious than ever that the new approach of the
Maekawa committee does lead to speedy and effective action,"
said EC Industrial Union leader Lord Ray Pennock.
    "The important implication of the Maekawa report is that it
is finally looking to let Japanese enjoy the fruits of their
labour," said Philip Caldwell, Senior Managing Director of
Shearson Lehman Brothers.
    Contents of the report were leaded well ahead of issuance.
    Japanese officials say they are implementing the report as
fast as they can, said a European ambassador who has travelled
the country asking about this issue.
    He said People mentioned many things in line with the
spirit of the report, including restructuring of the coal and
steel industries.
    A major misunderstanding is that the private report was
government policy. Europeans are confused about this,
underlined by von Moltke's reference to the "leadership" of the
Maekawa report. Even so, Japanese officials point to last
September's government programme of new economic measures.
"Without endorsing the report as policy, officials point out
that the government has put its signature to a programme
designed to implement the report," the ambassador said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10779>
Japan is seeking to prevent its computer
chips dispute with the U.S. From erupting into a full-scale
trade war, government officials said.
    "We hope that the dispute on this specific issue won't have
an adverse effect on our overall relationship with the United
States," a Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI)
official said.
     On Friday, Washington announced plans for as much as 300
mln dlrs in tariffs on Japanese electronic goods for Tokyo's
alleged failure to live up to a bilateral computer chip pact.
    That agreement, reached last year after heated
negotiations, called on Japan to stop selling cut-price chips
in world markets and to buy more American-made semiconductors.
    Foreign Ministry officials immediately tried to isolate the
fall-out from the dispute by seeking to separate it from Prime
Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone's planned trip to Washington at the
end of April.
    While Japan has already done about all it can to make sure
the chip pact is working, the government is studying measures
it can take in other fields to defuse American anger and ensure
the trip's success, they said.
    "The perception of Japan in the (U.S.) Congress is very bad,"
one official told Reuters. "We would very much like to do
something to respond to that."
    In an apparent effort to prevent the chip dispute from
spreading to other areas, MITI officials sought to depict the
U.S. Action as a severe warning to Japanese semiconductor
makers, not to the government.
    Faced with a belligerent domestic chip industry and an
angry American Congress, the Japanese government has been
forced to walk an increasingly fine line in the semiconductor
dispute, trade analysts said.
    They said that it was an open secret that Japan's largest
chip maker, NEC Corp, was not happy with what it viewed as the
draconian measures MITI was taking to implement the pact,
included enforced production cuts.
    The angry response of Japanese chip makers yesterday to the
announcement of the U.S. Tariffs highlighted the difficulties
the government faces in taking further action.
    "Japanese semiconductor manufacturers have complied with the
U.S./Japan agreement," said Shoichi Saba, Chairman of the
Electronic Industries Association of Japan.
    He accused the U.S. of being "irrational." He said the U.S.
action had made the bilateral chip pact "meaningless."
    Saba's comments contrasted with those of Prime Minister
Yasuhiro Nakasone, who said Tokyo wanted to solve the dispute
through consultations.
    Japan is expected to send a high-level official to
Washington early next month to try to convince the U.S. Not to
go ahead with the tariffs on April 17.
    Trade analysts say Tokyo is likely to outline industry
plans to step up purchases of U.S. chips and to propose a joint
investigation into U.S. allegations of chip dumping.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10780>
In a bid to hasten Japan's promise
to speed up its economic growth and open markets to foreign
trade, top U.S. officials appear once again to have signaled
their tolerance of a lower dollar.
    Treasury Secretary James Baker and one of his top aides,
Assistant Secretary David Mulford, said last week there was no
target for the dollar, a statement that sent the yen soaring
against the dollar, despite massive central bank intervention.
    "That was no slip of the tongue," said one western monetary
official, who asked not to be identified.
    For now, the strategy appears to be working. Japanese
officials said late last week a package to bolster domestic
demand will be ready in early April. Until last week, there
were few indications the package would be ready anytime soon.
    The Reagan administration, facing an uproar in Congress
over the apparent lack of progress in cutting the 169.8 billion
dlr trade deficit, is learning now that to extract results from
Japan, dramatic action is required.
    Last week the White House imposed unprecedented tariffs on
certain Japanese electronic goods after Tokyo failed to adhere
to a semi-conductor pricing accord between the two countries.
    The shift in U.S. strategy, in part designed to appease
mounting Congressional anger over Japanese policies, comes just
two weeks before industrial nations reconvene here to review
the Paris agreement to stabilize currencies.
    And news that Japan earned a record 18 billion dlr trade
surplus in the first two months this year just underscored the
need for urgent action, in the view of U.S. officials.
    Nonetheless, U.S. officials see signs of improvement in the
deficit. "I'd be stunned if we were not going to derive some
benefits (from the lower dollar) soon," said one.
    In Paris, leading industrial nations agreed to cooperate
closely to foster currency stability within ranges reflecting
"underlying economic fundamentals" or economic reality.
    The agreement envisages those fundamentals to include Japan
and West Germany stimulating their economies and the United
States cutting its budget deficit.
    The three nations, joined by France, Britain and Canada,
agree these policies are essential to redress huge global trade
imbalances.
    But analysts say markets have signalled the underlying
fundamentals imply a lower dollar, rather than a stable one.
    Markets, in effect, are less confident than governments
that these measures -- including U.S. budget deficit cuts
agreed by Congress and the White House --will be carried out.
    Nonetheless, the dollar's sharp fall has not undermined 
cooperation. A U.S. economic policymaker said the accord was on
track and Tokyo and Bonn seem "to want more stimulative measures
which is what the Paris accord calls for."
    International monetary sources said exchange market
developments generally have not unsettled policymakers,
although Japan is an obvious exception. "Everybody feels it can
still be managed," one source said of market developments.
    But last week, the Bank of Japan spent an estimated five
billion dlrs intervening to halt the rise in the yen, and other
central banks about one billion dlrs.
    Another monetary source said Japan was upset with America's
half-hearted attempt to halt the falling dollar, flouting the
Paris accord outright.
    The source, close to the top levels of Japanese economic
policymaking, said Japan's understanding of the accord was that
the yen would be kept at around 154 to the dollar, the level it
stood at when the accord was struck.
    The source said Tokyo was extremely worried by Washington's
use of the exchange rate to change Japanese policies. It was a
"pointed reminder" to Japan to do something about the trade
issues, the source said of the dollar's fall against the yen.
    By departing last Sunday from the language of the Paris
accord -- that nations agreed to foster currency stability
around current levels -- Baker triggered a run on the dollar.
    Later in the week, Mulford too said there was no target for
the dollar and called on Japan and West Germany to live up to
their international responsibilities and stimulate growth.
    But U.S. officials said recent market developments will not
unravel the spirit of the Paris agreement.
    "There's a realisation now that you cannot leave things
alone, everyone agrees that the external (trade) imbalances
ought to be adjusted," one official said.
    "While no-one is going to cede national sovereignty, we
certainly seem to be moving towards much closer co-operation,"
another U.S. official said.
    The officials said the meeting here, where the six will be
joined by Italy, will be a status report.
    "Japan will have to explain what the state of their program
is and Germany will report on its plans. Maybe there's a need
to move faster," one source said.
    Mulford told Congress last week the Paris accord called, in
effect, for currency stability for several months. This would
buy time for Japan and West Germany to speed up their economic
growth and help bring down the U.S. trade deficit.
    His comments appeared to serve notice on other major
nations that Washington cannot wait too long for action to
reduce the gap between the Japanese and German trade surpluses
and the U.S. trade deficit.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10781>
The United States and Japan will
soon settle their trade dispute over semiconductors, U.S.
Commerce secretary Malcolm Baldrige said on television.
    Baldrige, referring to the U.S.-Japan trade agreement on
semiconductors, said: "Their government wants to live up to it.
Their industries haven't been doing it, and I think we'll have
a good settlement to spare both sides."
    "I think the Japanese understand full well that they haven't
lived up to this commitment," he said.
    He added: "I do not think there will be a trade war at all."
    On Friday, Washington announced plans to put as much as 300
mln dlrs in tariffs on Japanese electronic goods from April 17,
because of Tokyo's failure to observe the agreement.
    The officials said the tariffs would be ended as soon as
Japan started adhering to the agreement. But they said there
was little chance Japan could react quickly enough to avert the
higher tariffs.
    Baldrige said the Reagan administration hoped the strong
U.S. Action against Japan would convince Congress to tone down
protectionist trade legislation now being drafted.
    He denied the action had been taken for that reason.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10807>
Remarks by Japan's Prime Minister
Yasuhiro Nakasone that last month's G-6 meeting agreed to
stabilize the dollar above 150 yen have come too late to
influence currency trading, dealers said.
    After Nakasone's statement the dollar rose to 146.40/50 yen
from an initial low of 144.20/40 and New York's Friday finish
of 147.15/25. But the rebound was largely on short-covering,
they said.
    "I think (Nakasone's) desperate," said a U.S. Bank foreign
exchange manager.
    Nakasone told a Lower House Budget Committee in Parliament
that Japan and other industrialized nations committed
themselves in Paris last month to stabilize the dollar above
150 yen.
    Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa told the same committee
that the six - Britain, Canada, France, Japan, the U.S. And
West Germany - had intervened aggressively since the dollar
fell below 150 yen.
    "His (Nakasone) remarks should have been made and should
have had a bigger influence when the dollar was still above 150
yen," said P.S. Tam of Morgan Guaranty Trust.
    Tam said the dollar has hit short-term chart targets  and
is likely to rebound. But he warned of another dip to below 145
yen.
    Dealers said the worsening trade relations between the U.S.
And Japan will continue to depress the dollar.
    The trade issue has now become a political issue since the
Reagan Administration is facing uproar in Congress over
th3pYgks in cutting the country's 169.8 billion dlr trade
deficit, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10825>
Yugoslav trade is declining rapidly
this year in hard currency terms, according to the latest
Federal Statistics Office (FSO) figures.
    The FSO figures showed total exports from January 1 to
March 23 valued at 875.59 billion dinars, compared with 667.18
billion dinars in the same period last year.
    These figures were down by 12.5 pct on last year in dollar
terms due to exchange rate fluctuations and changes in how the
figures were calculated, FSO sources said.
    This year current exchange rates were used for the first
time instead of a fixed rate of 24.53 dinars to the dollar.
    BELGRADE, March 30 - Yugoslav trade is declining rapidly
this year in hard currency terms, according to the latest
Federal Statistics Office (FSO) figures.
    The FSO figures showed total exports from January 1 to
March 23 valued at 875.59 billion dinars, compared with 667.18
billion dinars in the same period last year.
    These figures were down by 12.5 pct on last year in dollar
terms due to exchange rate fluctuations and changes in how the
figures were calculated, FSO sources said.
    This year current exchange rates were used for the first
time instead of a fixed rate of 24.53 dinars to the dollar.
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=10905>
The U.S. Congress is making Japan,
with its enormous worldwide trade surplus, the symbol of the
U.S. trade crisis and the focus of its efforts to turn around
America's record trade deficit.
    "Japan has come to symbolize what we fear most in trade: the
challenge to our high technology industries, the threat of
government nutured competition, and the multitude of barriers
to our exports," Senate Democratic Leader Robert Byrd said.
    "If we can find a way to come to terms with Japan over trade
problems, we can manage our difficulties with other countries,"
the West Virginia Democrat said at a Senate Finance Committee
hearing on the trade bill.
    Byrd and House Speaker Jim Wright, a Texas Democrat, have
made trade legislation a priority this year and a wide-ranging
bill is being readied for probable House approval next month.
    Japan's bilateral trade surplus jumped from 12 billion dlrs
in 1980 to 62 billion dlrs last year. Its surplus rose to 8.14
billion dlrs in February from 5.7 billion dlrs in January.
    Congress points to the record 169 billion dlrs U.S. trade
deficit in 1986 and the slow response in the trade imbalance to
the dollar's decline in world currency markets as a reason to
press Japan to buy more U.S. goods.
    They are particularly dismayed by the rapid deterioration
in U.S. exports of sophisticated computer technology.
    In response to the growing anger and pressure by the U.S.
semiconductor industry, President Reagan Friday announced he
intended to raise tariffs as much as 300 mln dlrs on Japanese
electronic goods in retaliation for Japan's failure to abide by
a 1986 U.S.-Japanese semiconductor agreement.
    Congress also has been been angered by the administration's
lack of success with Japan on a host of other trade issues
including beef, citrus, automobile parts, telecommunications
goods, and financial services.
    The bulk of the House trade bill was written last week in
four committees. It is a package of trade sanctions and
measures to force the administration take tough action against
foreign trade barriers and unfair competition.
    Although most provisions do not single out Japan, in many
cases their impact would be to restrict imports of Japanese
products or make them more expensive with higher duties.
    The cornerstone of the trade legislation passed the House
Ways and Means Committee by a vote of 34 to 2. Its focus is to
force President Reagan to retaliate against unfair foreign
competition and to make it easier for U.S. industries to win
temporary relief from surges in imports.
    The most controversial issue, an amendment to restrict
imports if countries such as Japan with large surpluses do not
buy more U.S. goods was left for an April vote by the House.
    Rep. Richard Gephardt, a Democratic presidential aspirant
from Missouri, has the support of Wright and other key
Democrats to press for passage of the amendment.
    The measure would have the most impact on Japan, West
Germany, Taiwan and South Korea. If Japan, for example, does
not reduce its barriers by mid-1988, the United States would
set import quotas or tariffs to cut Japanese surplus by ten per
cent a year for three years.
    "I'm tired of going into companies and having managers say
to me, 'We're not over competing in Japan because we can't
compete in the marketplace.' That argument needs to be taken
away from American business," Gephardt said.
    The administration has said it could not support a trade
bill containing such a provision.
    
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11076>
A high level U.S. trade official
said it would be foolish for Japan to strike back against the
United States for its sanctions on Japanese semiconductor
electronics products.
    Asked by reporters if Japan was expected to retaliate
against U.S. exports, Deputy Under Secretary of Commerce Bruce
Smart replied, "That would be the height of foolishness."
    In addition, he doubted Japan could show enough progress in
meeting the conditions of the agreement to avoid the actual
imposition of the 300 mln dlrs in tariffs on April 17.
    Japan's 58.6 billion dlr trade surplus with the United
States last year has come under fire in Congress concerned
about the loss of jobs to foreign competition and with the
record 169 billion dlrs U.S. trade deficit in 1986.
    President Reagan's sanctions decision won praise today from
the two Democratic leaders of Congress.
    "I think it's about time," Senate Democratic Leader Robert
Byrd of West Virginia told reporters. House Speaker Jim Wright
of Texas told reporters before the opening of the House
session, "It just shows we were right all along when we said
something needs doing."
    Smart testified before a Senate Labor Committee hearing
that last Friday's U.S. trade action would help U.S.
negotiations on access to Japan for U.S. auto parts.
    Since last August Smart has been leading talks to open up
Japan to purchases of more U.S.-made automotive parts. Last
year, Japan racked up a 3.6 billion dlr trade surplus with the
United States in these products.
    Both countries expect to conclude the talks by August 1987.
    "It's amazing to me that the Japanese were surprised. I
hope it will persuade them we're serious," Smart said of the
White House trade sanctions.
    The United States has tried to convince Japanese car
companies of the quality of American-made parts and to draw
them away from their traditional Japanese suppliers.
    "All we ask is a chance. We have a job to do persuading them
we can do better than our reputation seems to be," he said.
    Measured per car, each American-made car contained about
700 dlrs in Japanese auto parts while each Japanese-made car
contained about 26 dlrs in U.S. auto parts, Smart said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11174>
China and the European Community (EC)
signed an agreement on the establishment of an EC office here.
    Chinese vice-foreign minister Zhou Nan and the EC's
external relations commissioner, Willy De Clercq, signed the
accord. EC sources said the office was likely to open in the
second half of this year.
    In 1986 the EC was China's third largest trading partner,
with Chinese imports from the EC worth 5.7 billion dlrs and
exports worth 2.6 billion dlrs.
    De Clercq told the official China Daily that more joint
ventures should be set up in China as a way of reducing China's
trade deficit with the EC.
    The EC's affairs in China are currently looked after by
whichever country holds the group's six-monthly rotating
presidency, now held by the Belgians until the Danes take over
in July.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11175>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone may have
been dealt a fatal political blow by the yen's renewed rapid
rise and the threat of a trade war with the United States,
political analysts said.
    Nakasone, already under fire over an unpopular tax reform
plan, may now be forced to resign before the June economic
summit of seven industrialised nations if local elections later
next month go against candidates from his ruling Liberal
Democratic Party (LDP), they said.
    "The close relationship between Nakasone and President
Reagan was an important element of Nakasone's power base,"
Waseda University Political Science Professor Mitsuru Uchida
told Reuters. "So the emergence of U.S. Criticism damages
Nakasone."
    Even before the latest trade friction flared, Nakasone was
encountering criticism not only from opposition parties but
also within his own LDP over his proposal to levy a sales tax.
    "Many factions within the LDP are distancing themselves from
Nakasone," Uchida said. "His position within the LDP itself is
not so strongly established today."
    Nakasone, who has been more popular with the general public
than with many LDP members, is now seeing his public support
eroded, the analysts said.
    The yen's rise to record highs and the U.S. Threat on
Friday to impose tariffs on Japanese electronics goods in
retaliation for Japan's alleged violation of a microchip trade
pact are now giving Nakasone's critics fresh ammunition, the
analysts said.
    "Apparently the special relationship between Reagan and
Nakasone hasn't worked effectively," Rei Shiratori, director of
the Institute for Political Studies in Japan, said.
    This is making the Japanese people doubt Nakasone's
credibility, Shiratori told Reuters.
    The cumulative impact of the sales tax issue, the yen's
rise and mounting trade friction could mean serious LDP losses
in the April 11 and 26 local elections, analysts said.
    "If the elections go against the LDP, Nakasone may have to
resign early," Shiratori said.
    But Nakasone still has a chance to soothe U.S. Tempers
before or during his week-long Washington visit from April 29,
some analysts said.
    However, "unless the Japanese political system can move more
quickly to give Nakasone some nice present to take to
Washington on smouldering trade issues, he will face a very
hostile audience," said Merrill Lynch Securities economist
William Sterling.
    "If the trip is a major disaster, it would seem to put the
final nail in his coffin," he said.
    Reagan's own weakened domestic position, and growing
Republican as well as Democratic anger with Japan, argue
against a quick settlement to the trade dispute, the analysts
said.
    But a desire on both sides to find some solution, coupled
with uncertainty at home and abroad over likely successors to
Nakasone, could still lead to an attempt to paper over the
differences and aid Nakasone, they said.
    "One factor against a trade war may be that Washington is
not anxious to push Nakasone into his grave," Sterling said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11198>
Rising imports of Japanese-made cars and
electronic goods may upset West European officials, but they
generally seem prepared to stay on the sidelines in the latest
trade row between the United States and Japan.
    Japan's huge trade surplus is a sore point in West Europe,
as it is in the United States. But U.S. Charges of unfair trade
practices involving computer microchips leave Europeans cold.
    The European Community ran a 18.2 billion dlr trade deficit
with Japan last year, and seeks redress when it feels Japanese
trade policy hurts Europeans, diplomats and economists said.
    But only in Britain has there been any suggestion of acting
with the U.S. To do something about Japan's huge trade surplus.
    "The EC is no more illiberal on trade issues than is the
U.S.," said Martin Wolf, director of studies at the Trade Policy
Research Centre in London. "Basically, their policies are pretty
much the same."
    But that did not mean Europe would support the U.S., Or
that the EC would climb on the bandwagon to take advantage of
the U.S. Dispute to press its own claims, Wolf said.Basically,
Europeans have a different approach to trade problems, he said.
    "In the U.S., People talk about fair trade, but not here," he
added. "In the U.S., It all has to do with the general ethic of
free competition, while in Europe, the general approach is that
liberal trade is good because it makes countries rich."
    Wolf said this basic U.S. Attitude explains Washington's
tendency to impose so-called "countervailing duties" - an import
tax designed to offset advantages alleged to be unfair.
    In Western Europe, the approach to trade disputes tends to
be to try to reach a settlement through negotiation, Wolf said.
    In the latest U.S.-Japan trade row, President Reagan has
threatened to raise tariffs on selected Japanese electronic
goods by as much as 300 mln dlrs, alleging that Japan has
failed to abide by a 1986 U.S.-Japan pact on microchip trade.
    But the European Community has challenged the agreement as
a violation of General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT)
practices that discriminates against its microchip producers.
    "It follows that they're not likely to rally to the side of
the United States in defence of the agreement," said Wolf.
    Although British parliamentarians are pushing for a tough
line on Japanese trade issues, government officials in the rest
of Europe told Reuter correspondents they would let the EC take
the lead in any response to the U.S.-Japan trade row.
    A spokeswoman for the EC Commission in Brussels told
Reuters there has been no change in the Community's position
since a March 16 meeting of foreign ministers which sent a
strong warning to Tokyo on trade imbalances.
    In a statement issued after that meeting, EC foreign
ministers deplored Japan's continued trade imbalance and
appealed for a greater Japanese effort to open up its markets.
    EC External Trade Commissioner Willy De Clercq said after
the talks there was a growing impatience with Japan in the EC.
    Diplomats accredited to the EC in Brussels said they saw no
signs of any immediate intention to impose any broad-ranging
sanctions against Japan. The EC is anxious to avoid provoking a
trade war, they said.
    Instead, the Community is trying to target problem areas in
European trade with Japan, including wines and spirits,
cosmetics, and financial services, and will continue talking to
try to improve the situation, the diplomats said.
    In Britain, where the government is angered over the
difficulties telecommunications giant Cable and Wireless has
faced in its bid to crack the Japanese market, officials said
last week that retaliatory action is being considered.
    But government officials said last night, "We are not
talking about days or weeks. This is going to take time."
    They said the government would consider its options at a
cabinet meeting on Thursday, but added that no final decisions
were expected. The main thing the British would threaten the
Japan with is denial of access to London's booming financial
markets, government officials said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11209>
South Korea's Finance Minister Chung
In-yong will visit U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker next
week to discuss U.S. Requests for an appreciation of South
Korea's won against the dollar, finance ministry officials
said.
    They said Chung would leave for Washington on Monday to
attend the International Monetary Fund's (IMF) Interim
Committee meeting and for talks with U.S. Officials on ways of
reducing Seoul's trade surplus with Washington.
    The dates for the Baker-Chung meeting have yet to be set.
    The IMF committee meeting, scheduled for April 9, is
expected to review the resolution reached by the six top
industrialised nations in Paris last month calling for newly
industrialised countries, such as South Korea and Taiwan, to
allow their currencies to rise.
    The official said Chung is expected to outline Seoul's
efforts to increase imports of U.S. Goods and to stress the
need for South Korea to maintain a trade surplus in the next
few years in order to cut foreign debts totalling some 44.5
billion dlrs.
    South Korea has ruled out a major revaluation of the won,
but is allowing its currency to appreciate slowly.
    Trade Minister Rha Woong-bae told the U.S. Chamber of
Commerce earlier this month a sudden won revaluation could
result in South Korea running a large trade deficit and being
forced to renege on its international debt repayments.
    The Bank of Korea, the central bank, today fixed the won at
a two-year high of 846.90. The won has gained 5.1 pct since the
beginning of 1986.
    South Korea's trade surplus with the U.S. Rose to 7.1
billion dlrs last year from 4.3 billion in 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11222>
British Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher
said she and Soviet Premier Nikolai Ryzhkov had set targets for
increased trade between the two countries during talks earlier
today.
    She said she hoped more economic exchanges between Britain
and the Soviet Union "will also lead to increased friendship and
increased understanding."
    Earlier, she told a meeting of Soviet and British
businessmen that she had agreed with Ryzhkov that they would
work to achieve a total volume of 2.5 billion roubles in
bilateral trade by 1990.
    This would entail an increase by each side of 350 to 400
mln stg over their present export levels.
    "Mr Ryzhkov handed me a list of import and export
opportunities which I hope you will all jump at," she told the
meeting to mark the opening of new offices of the British-
Soviet Chamber of Commerce.
    After her talks with Ryzhkov, Thatcher and the Soviet
Premier were joined for the signing of agreements covering new
scientific and cultural exchanges by Kremlin leader Mikhail
Gorbachev, who had nine hours of talks with her yesterday.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11225>
Leading domestic semiconductor makers
will boost imports and cut production of key memory microchips
from next month in line with government attempts to ward off
U.S. Trade sanctions, company spokesmen said.
    The moves might persuade the U.S. To call off the
sanctions, despite obstacles to full implementation of the
plans, analysts said.
    The tariffs will affect about 300 mln dlrs worth of
products and are in retaliation for Japan's alleged failure to
honour a semiconductor trade pact.
    In announcing the sanctions last Friday, President Reagan
said Japan had not fulfilled its promise to halt predatory
pricing and open Japan's market to foreign products.
    But U.S. Trade representative Clayton Yeutter said
yesterday on U.S. Television that the U.S. Is willing to drop
the tariffs if Japan shows a "clear indication" that it will open
its markets to U.S. Goods.
    The Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) has
urged producers to slash output of the chips by 11 pct in the
second quarter, following a call to reduce production by more
than 20 pct the previous quarter.
    MITI also urged makers to boost chip imports.
    Analysts said the moves could encourage Washington to
cancel the tariffs ahead of next month's meeting between Prime
Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone and President Reagan.
    "The U.S. Wants to be satisfied. It has rattled its sword
and shown that it can and will do business," said analyst Nick
Edwards at Jardine Fleming Securities Ltd in Tokyo.
    But analysts cautioned that although Japanese producers can
cut output, boosting imports -- the key to U.S. Withdrawal of
the sanctions -- is more difficult.
    "The U.S. Does not have the low-end consumer IC's
(integrated circuits) that the Japanese need for consumer
products. They're well supplied here," said Richard May, senior
analyst at Barclays de Zoete Wedd Ltd in Tokyo.
    The U.S. Leads in production of medium and high-end IC's,
but Japanese makers are keen to develop their own high-end
production skills, the analysts said.
    "The Japanese must be prepared to trade some losses on
semiconductors in return for free access to other areas," said
Edwards.
    A spokesman for Hitachi Ltd &lt;HIT.T>, said the firm's
reduced output of 256 kilobit dynamic random access memory
(256K DRAM) was unrelated to MITI's efforts to ward off the
trade sanctions. Decreased production was a natural result of
the company increasing output of one-mln bit DRAM's, he said.
    Company officials unveiled the following plans -
    - NEC Corp &lt;NESI.T>, Japan's largest chipmaker, plans to
slash production of 256K DRAM semiconductors by 29.41 pct to
six mln per month from a monthly average of 8.5 mln last
quarter.
     In the year beginning April 1, NEC will boost chip
imports, which comprised some 20 pct of all NEC chip
consumption the year before.
    - Hitachi Ltd's &lt;HIT.T> April output of 256K DRAM's will
fall by 25.93 pct to four mln compared to 5.4 mln in March. The
company is trying to boost imports but has not set a specific
target. Imports are currently very low.
    - Toshiba Corp &lt;TSBA.T> will reduce April 256K DRAM
production by 16.67 pct to just over four mln and is
considering ways to boost imports, a company official said.
    Toshiba has an agreement with Motorola Inc (MOT.N) to sell
the U.S. Firm's chips in Japan. The firms are planning a
joint-venture production of memory chips in Sendai, northern
Japan.
    - Mitsubishi Electric Corp (MIET.T) will trim second
quarter output by about 10 pct to between 5.5 mln to 5.6 mln
chips compared to the first quarter. Plans call for increased
imports but an official said "boosting imports will be difficult
as it depends on sales demand."
    - Fujitsu Ltd (ITSU.T) will cut production in accord with
MITI guidelines and boost imports from currently low levels.
    - Oki Electric Industry Co Ltd (OKIE.T) will reduce April
production by 10 pct from March's 3.2 mln. Oki is studying ways
to increase imports by 10 pct in the fiscal year beginning
April 1 from the previous year's total of more than five
billion yen, a company official said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11254>
The U.S. Is willing to drop tariffs on
Japanese electronic imports if Japan shows it will abide by an
agreemement opening its markets to American goods, U.S. Trade
Representative Clayton Yeutter said in a TV interview.
    "But there has to be a clear indication that they are
willing to act," he said.
    Yeutter said difficulties in the Japanese economy caused by
the U.S. Tariffs and the yen's rise against the dollar are
problems "they have brought on themselves."
    The dollar fell to 40-year lows against the yen today.
    "Certainly the movement of the yen is causing some economic
turmoil in Japan," he said. "My only response is that we have
gone through about five years with the dollar going in just the
opposite direction. Although I can sympathise, it's occurred
for only a few weeks or months in Japan."
    The tarriffs, announced on Friday by President Reagan, will
affect about 300 million dlrs worth of products, only a tiny
fraction of Japan's total exports to the U.S.
    Even so, Reagan's decision "doesn't give us any joy. We
don't want to take retaliatory action here if we don't have to,"
Yeutter said.
    Yeutter said the meetings scheduled next month in
Washington between Reagan and Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone
will include "some difficult items on the agenda."
    Japan has failed to implement two parts of a three-part
semiconductor agreement, Yeutter said.
    Japan has stopped dumping chips in the U.S. But it has
failed to open its domestic markets to U.S.-made chips and has
failed to end predatory pricing in Third World countries,
undercutting U.S. Products, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11260>
Japan's Minister of International Trade
and Industry, Hajime Tamura, will meet representatives from 151
of the nation's largest companies next week and appeal to them
to do their best to increase imports, ministry officials said.
    The meeting was unveiled as part of a plan to boost imports
and help head off protectionist legislation in the U.S.
    Senior officials from the Ministry of International Trade
and Industry told reporters that such personal appeals appeared
to have paid off in the past, as Japanese imports of
manufactured goods have climbed.
    Leading domestic semiconductor makers will boost imports
and cut production of key memory microchips next month in an
attempt to help ward off U.S. Trade sanctions, company
spokesmen said.
    The officials also said they expect the government's new
trade insurance law to boost imports and encourage Japanese
companies to set up production facilities overseas.
    Under the new law, the government will insure Japanese
companies who pre-pay for imports against loss arising from
everything from war to bankruptcy of the foreign firm they are
dealing with. MITI estimated that it would help solve Japan's
trade problem to the tune of about $10 billion dlrs a year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11281>
South Korean Finance Minister Chung
In-yong will resist pressure for a currency revaluation to cut
South Korea's trade surplus with the United States when he
meets Treasury Secretary James Baker next week, Finance
Ministry officials said.
    They said Chung would leave Monday to attend the
International Monetary Fund's Interim Committee meeting and to
hold talks with Baker and other U.S. officials on ways to
reduce the surplus.
    The April 9 committee meeting is expected to review the
agreement by six industrialized nations in Paris last month
that newly-industrialized countries, such as South Korea and
Taiwan, should allow their currencies to increase in value.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11287>
U.K. Chancellor of the Exchequer Nigel
Lawson said the United States and Japan must work to avert a
possible trade war, and he added that a trade war would not be
in the interests of Britain.
    Lawson told journalists that "the prospects for the (U.K.)
economy look very very good - providing we can avoid a trade
war." He stressed that "a heavy responsiblity in different ways
lies on Japan and the United States to ensure that we do avoid
such a trade war."
    Asked whether he believed such a trade war could be
averted, Lawson replied, "I very much hope so."
    Britain last week warned that it would retaliate if Japan
did not move soon to open its markets to outside competition.
    Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher gave notice that the U.K.
Would fight the Japanese government's attempt to prevent (Cable
and Wireless Plc) (CAWL.L) from taking a significant position
in a new Japanese international telecommunications venture.
    But British officials are now trying to dampen
anti-Japanese rhetoric, to try to keep developments under
control.
    The British Conservative government will on Thursday
consider what legal options are available to it to try to
increase U.K. Access to Japanese markets, officials said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11315>
EC ministers have approved financial
packages for several Mediterranean states totalling 1.6 billion
European currency units, an EC official said.
    The packages, part of special EC trade agreements with
Tunisia, Egypt, Lebanon, Israel, Algeria, Morocco and Jordan
until 1992, include 615 mln Ecus in grants, he said.
    They include one billion Ecus in loans from the European
Investment Bank, the EC long-term financing arm. The framework
for the transfers was signed yesterday by EC farm ministers
after being agreed in principle by foreign ministers earlier.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11352>
China's application to join the General
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) is seen as a test case by
the Soviet Union, which will probably demand to follow China, a
top European Community official said.
    Willy de Clercq, External Relations Commissioner of the
European Communities, told a news conference that China's
application would involve long and difficult negotiations.
    China formally applied to join GATT in July 1986 and in
February presented a memorandum backing its application, which
De Clercq said was now being studied. Questions would then be
presented to China.
    "After China, other important state-trading countries
including the Soviet Union, will probably demand accession.
China's application could be considered a test case," he said.
    He said the EC strongly backed China's application, but
others among GATT's 92 contracting parties took a tougher line.
    Among the numerous problems of a huge centrally-run economy
entering a free trade system are tariffs and reciprocity and
the expectation that China will practice an open-trade policy
without trade discrimination, de Clercq added.
    De Clercq noted the different dimensions of the Chinese
economy and those of Hungary and Yugoslavia, the two current
Socialist GATT members.
    On China's import potential, he said a foreign exchange
shortage would force China to import less this year and next
than in the past, with an emphasis on technological equipment
and capital.
    During his visit, De Clercq has met top Chinese leaders and
today signed an agreement to open a European Community
Commission office in Peking.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11357>
The Senate's Democratic and 
Republican leaders praised President Reagan for retaliating
against Japan for violating a semiconducter accord but dashed
cold water on ideas it was the first shot in a trade war.
    Senate Democratic Leader Robert Byrd and Republican leader
Bob Dole both told the Senate Reagan's decision was long
overdue and urged Japan to open its markets to U.S. goods and
stop dumping on world markets.
    Each noted in separate speeches that they saw no trade war
over the issue, despite concerns in financial markets.
    "That fear has no basis in fact," Byrd said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11390>
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter said the stock market overreacted to a U.S. decision
last week to proceed with tariffs on some Japanese computer
products.
    Speaking to reporters prior to testifying at a House
Agriculture Committee hearing, Yeutter said it is "difficult to
comprehend" that a trade decision affecting only 300 mln dlrs
in goods caused the stock market collapse yesterday.
    "I have a hunch a lot of other things were involved in that
(stock market fall), including simple profit-taking," Yeutter
said.
    Yeutter said Japan would be sending a senior official from
its trade ministry to Washington next week for talks on the
computer chip dispute.
    "We will be glad to have him here, but that's not going to
affect a decision that's already been made," Yeutter said.
    The decision announced last week would apply higher tariffs
on a range of Japanese products in retaliation for the alleged
failure of Tokyo to honor an agreement with the U.S. on
semiconductor trade.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11397>
The Japanese ambassador to the U.S.
Suggested that Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone make efforts to
present "advanced' proposals on trade issues when he visits
Washington next month.
    Ambassador Nobuo Matsunaga made the recommendation at a
meeting with Nakasone, Kyodo News Service said.
    Matsunaga also advised that the prime minister should be
prepared to discuss U.S.-Japan economic issues.
    Matsunaga cited issues such as a U.S.-Japan micro chip
trade pact, foreign access to the Kansai international airport
project, and a new international telecommunications firm.
    Matsunaga returned on Sunday to report to Japanese leaders
on recent U.S. Developments over trade, in preparation for
Nakasone's visit to Washington, April 29 to May 5.
    Kyodo quoted Nakasone as telling reporters after meeting
the envoy, "I entirely accept what ambassador Matsunaga
recommended." Nakasone did not elaborate.
    The U.S.-Japan trade dispute intensified last week when
President Ronald Reagan said the U.S. Would impose heavy
tariffs on Japanese imports in retaliation against alleged
Japanese breach of the computer chip trade pact.
    Meanwhile, Nakasone's ruling Liberal Democratic Party (LDP)
is to consider measures to boost imports and open up the
Japanese market, such as government purchase of supercomputers
and expanding foreign access to the Kansai airport project,
party sources said.
    The LDP international economic affairs council was
responding to Nakasone's request for measures to reduce Japan's
increasing trade surpluses with the U.S. And Europe, they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11446>
Treasury secretary James Baker
predicted the U.S. trade deficit would decline 15-20 billion
dlrs this year.
    However, he acknowledged signs were still lacking on such a
decline.
    "We think we are beginning to see changes," he told the House
Appropriations Committee.
    "It has begun to level off (but) we don't see it beginning
to go down yet," he told the panel.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11460>
Treasury Secretary James Baker,
asked whether he was concerned about yesterdays precipitous
decline in bond prices, said he was not.
    Questioned by reporters as he left a House committee
hearing, Baker said "no," when asked about the bond decline,
adding that it was a reflection of concern about the
possibility of a trade war.
    "It is what the markets think would be the adverse
consequences of a trade war."
    He said the administration was concerned that protectionism
would lead to international trade problems adding that he
thought the action against the Japanese was still consistent
with this policy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11461>
The United States and Japan are not
involved in a trade war, despite U.S. sanctions announced last
week against Japanese semiconductors, U.S. Trade Representative
Clayton Yeutter said.
    "In my judgement, we're not even close to a trade war,"
Yeutter told a House Agriculture Committee hearing.
    Yeutter said if Japan takes action to honor its agreement
with the U.S. on semiconductor trade, "Then the retaliatory
response will last a relatively short period."
    Yeutter said Japan must stop dumping chips in third
countries and buy more American computer chips.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11487>
French Prime Minister Jacques Chirac
opened talks with President Ronald Reagan expected to focus on
superpower arms control moves and trade issues.
    French officials said a major aim of Chirac's visit was to
present France's concern that the United States might ignore
European security interests in any accord with Moscow on
removing medium-range nuclear missiles from the continent.
    But Reagan was expected to assure Chirac that he will not
agree to a deal at the Geneva superpower talks that would give
the Russians superiority in shorter-range systems, diplomats
said.
    France has expressed doubts about removing U.S. missiles
from Europe so long as the Soviet Union maintains an edge in
other weaponry, particularly shorter-range rockets,
conventional forces and chemical weapons.
    Speaking last night, Chirac set out the French position
saying: "Any agreement on intermediate nuclear forces should
mention how equality can be achieved in short-range missiles."
    Reagan and Chirac meanwhile signed an agreement ending a
dispute between two leading research institutes over patent
rights to a blood screening test for the deadly disease AIDS.
    In a joint statement, Chirac and Reagan said the Pasteur
Institute in Paris and the National Cancer Institute, of
Bethesda, Maryland, agreed to give part of the royalties from
the test to a new foundation dedicated to the wordwide fight
against AIDS (Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome).
    "This agreement opens a new era in Franco-American
cooperation, allowing France and the United States to join
their efforts to control this terrible disease in the hopes of
speeding the development of an AIDS vaccine and cure," Reagan
said at the signing ceremony. 
    He said the two parties would share the patent and give 80
per cent of the royalties received to the new foundation.
    The foundation would also raise private funds and would
donate 25 per cent of its money to combat AIDS in less
developed countries. 
    Both leaders stressed the long ties between France and the
United States during a welcoming ceremony in the White House
East Room, with Reagan describing France as "America's oldest
ally in war and peace." 
    "I have come to tell you that we are remain motivated by the
same ideals of freedom, by the same will to face the dangers
which we both confront -- terrorism, war, hunger, poverty, new
diseases and drugs," Chirac replied.
    But the two countries are likely to have less to agree on
over the issue of trade, where Chirac is worried about a rise
in protectionism in the U.S. Congress. 
    A senior U.S. official yesterday dismissed a French idea to
sell cut-price grain to poor countries in Africa as a way of
lessening surplus stocks.
    Chirac is expected to canvass support for the idea, first
proposed by French Agriculture Minister Francois Guillaume,
during his two-day visit to Washington.
    The U.S. official described the idea as a "grain producers'
OPEC" -- a reference to the Organization of Petroleum Exporting
Countries -- and said it went against the Reagan
administration's desire to lessen government intervention in
trade.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11498>
The threatened trade war between the
United States and Japan is just the kind of shock that
economists say could send world stock markets into a tailspin.
    But they are not so sure if that would be a brief
corrective dip, or whether this week's falling share prices
mark the start of a "bear" market.
    "It's the billion dollar question," said Richard O'Brien,
economist at American Express International Bank in London.
    Japan's trade surplus -- 92.7 billion dlrs last year -- has
poured into share and bond markets around the world, and funded
a good chunk of the huge U.S. Budget deficit. Around a third of
any new sale of U.S. Treasury bonds has been bought by the
Japanese. However, Japanese investors have lost money as the
dollar falls and will lose more if the United States lets it
fall further to cut the trade deficit. The counterpart of
improving the trade deficit either through a lower dollar or
because the U.S. Increases duties on Japanese electronic goods,
may be to hit the capital inflow which has financed the budget
deficit.
   And if the U.S. Trade deficit does fall, the Japanese will
have less money to invest. To entice U.S. Investors to fill the
gap that would be left if the Japanese stopped buying U.S.
Bonds, interest rates would have to soar, O'Brien said. The
subsequent shift from shares to bonds could cause major falls
on the world stock markets.
    "A year ago, we could be pretty confident about the markets,"
said O'Brien. "Now, it is much less certain."
    Buoyant share prices are supposed to reflect a booming
economy. But the world economy, with sluggish growth at best in
the industrial nations, a massive load of Third World debt and
huge trade imbalances is not in good shape, said O'Brien.
    Nevertheless, New York analyst William Raferty, of Smith
Barney Harris Upham said  "We're still in a bull market," adding
that corrections are a normal part of a rising market and "The
bear usually strikes slowly."
    Economist Evelyn Brody, at Morgan Grenfell and Co in
London, said the huge sums of money going through the world
financial system will keep a floor under share and bond prices.
    Although interest by the Japanese in putting their money in
non-dollar denominated bonds and stocks has increased it's very
difficult to see where else they can put their money than in
U.S. Dollars and especially the U.S. Treasury (bond) market,
according to David Butcher, a senior executive at Yamaichi
Securities Co Ltd's bond operation in London.
    He said the Japanese are paying much closer attention now
to the French franc and West German mark.
    In the longer run, he worries about what trade tensions and
the dollar's slide will mean for securities markets.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11545>
President Reagan has reaffirmed his
opposition to protectionism and his chief spokesman said trade
sanctions imposed on Japan were unlikely to start a trade war.
    "We don't want to go down that road," Reagan was quoted as
telling Prime Minister Jacques Chirac after the visiting French
official expressed concern about the rising tide of
protectionist sentiment in the United States.
    Later, White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater defended the
new sanctions against Japan and said administration officials
"do not believe this will result in a trade war."
    "It is the first time that the United States has taken an
action of this type and it is significant but it is nothing to
be alarmed about," the presidential spokesman added.
    "We do not want protectionism ... We do not want a trade
war," he said.
    Fitzwater said the president was forced to act in the
Japanese microchip case because Tokyo had failed to fulfill "an
agreement to make some corrections."
    Noting that there are "enormous pressures in the Congress
and the land" for the United States to take a tough stand, he
said, "This was a case where we felt we simply had to act."
    Fitzwater said the decision to impose sanctions was "well
considered by this administration and not taken lightly."
    While the White House official held open the possibility
that Washington and Tokyo will settle their trade dispute, he
indicated a settlement probably would not come in time to head
off the sanctions.
    "We are always open to negotations ... Whether it (a
settlement) could occur in time to prevent this (the sanctions)
from going into effect is questionable at this point," the
spokesman said.
    The sanctions take effect in mid-April.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11555>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
said the United States would go ahead with planned 300 mln dlr
sanctions against Japanese semiconductor exports, despite any
U.S. Japanese talks to avert the trade curbs.
    He said in a speech to an export-import group that he was
sure the United States and Japan could work out their dispute
over unfair Japanese trade practices in semiconductor trade,
but "I am sure the sanctions will go in before we work it out."
    Sanctions are to be imposed on April 17.
    He also said he did not think there would be a trade war
with Japan, because Japan had too much value in exports to the
United States to risk such a war.
    "Those fears are unfounded," he said.
    He told reporters later that the sharp drop in the
securities market was not due to fears of a trade war, but fear
of inflation and that the Federal Reserve may act on that fact.
    Market reaction was also due, he said, to the drop in the
value of the dollar, although trade issues did have some
effect.
    Baldrige said that observers who were attributing the drop
in the market to trade sanctions were "barking up the wrong
tree."
    He said the market observers will realize this shortly.
    Baldrige said his remarks did not mean to suggest anything
about the market or the exchange rate of the dollar.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11558>
Undersecretary of State Michael
Armacost will visit Tokyo next week for meetings with
high-level officials that will include discussions of a growing
trade row over Japanese semiconductor electronics products.
    He is the first high-level U.S. official to visit Japan
since President Reagan announced last week plans to impose
tariffs worth up to 30 mln dls on Japanese electronic goods on
April 17 in retaliation for Tokyo's alleged failure to live up
to a pact on microchip trade signed last September.
    The trip is set for April 6-8, the state department said.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11574>
Republican members of the House
Agriculture Committee said they will propose amendments
tomorrow to a pending trade bill increasing funding for the
export enhancement program, EEP, and significantly expanding
the scope of the program.
    At a press conference, Republican lawmakers said they would
propose expanding EEP to include all countries "willing to
purchase additional commodities at reasonable prices."
    In addition, the Congressmen said they would propose
extending the life of EEP to five years from the current three
years and increasing the EEP funding ceiling to 2.5 billion
dlrs from 1.5 billion at present.
    The Agriculture committee tomorrow will begin drafting
amendments to an omnibus trade bill now before the House.
    Responding to the Republican plan, Agriculture Secretary
Richard Lyng and Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter said they
favor a flexible, targeted use of EEP instead of an
across-the-board program which they termed too costly.
    The Republican Congressmen also said they will offer an
amendment to the trade bill instructing the U.S. Agriculture
Department to value the bonus commodities used for EEP at the
market value, rather than the cost of acquisition.
    But Lyng said USDA already plans to change to market value
accounting rather than acquisition value, in order to avoid
hitting a funding ceiling for eep of 1.5 billion dlrs.
    Lyng said under market value accounting only about 700 mln
dlrs of EEP commodities have been used to date. Using
acquisition value, USDA officials said the value is higher.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11580>
Undersecretary of State Michael
Armacost will visit Tokyo next week for meetings with
high-level officials that will include talks on the growing
trade row over Japanese semiconductor electronics products.
    He is the first high-level U.S. official to visit Japan
since President Reagan announced last week plans to impose
tariffs worth up to 30 mln dlrs on Japanese electronic goods on
April 17 in retaliation for Tokyo's alleged failure to live up
to a pact on microchip trade signed last September.
    Deputy State Department spokeswoman Phyllis Oakley said the
trip is set for April 6 to 8.
    U.S.-Japanese talks of this kind are regularly held each
year at this time, she told reporters.
    The Armacost discussions with Deputy Foreign Minister
Ryohei Murata and other senior Japanese officials will focus on
U.S.-Japanese foreign aid programs and political security
issues of mutual concern, she added.
    "Although an exchange of views on bilateral relations is
expected, the talks are not directly related to U.S.-Japanese
trade relations," she insisted.
    But, in response to questions, Oakley acknowledged that
trade will be discussed.
   Japan's 58.6 billion dlrs trade surplus with the United
States last year has come under fire in Congress, which is
concerned about the loss of jobs to foreign competition and
with the record 169 billion dlrs U.S. Trade deficit in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11658>
Beryl Sprinkel, chairman of the
White House Council of Economic Advisers, said he sees "growing
but incomplete evidence that (U.S.) export volumes are finally
strengthening."
    In remarks prepared for a speech today in Los Angeles,
Sprinkel said the decline in the dollar's value since 1985 had
"largely" restored U.S. cost competitiveness in world markets and
appeared to signal an end to U.S. trade imbalances.
    "I am confident that further improvements in our trade
performance will contribute significantly to U.S. growth in
1987," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=11771>
Taiwan's imports in the second quarter of
1987 are expected to rise to 7.75 billion U.S. Dlrs from 5.82
billion a year earlier and from 6.95 billion in the first
quarter of this year, the statistics department said.
    A department official attributed the increase to growing
domestic investment by the private and public sectors. It is
expected to rise to 4.68 billion U.S. Dlrs from 3.79 billion a
year earlier and 3.41 billion during the first quarter.
    Taiwan's exports in the April-June quarter are expected to
rise to 12.03 billion U.S. Dlrs from 9.63 billion a year
earlier and 11.28 billion in the first quarter.
    The official said Taiwan's trade surplus is expected to
climb to 4.28 billion U.S. Dlrs in the second quarter of 1987
from 3.81 billion a year earlier. It was 4.33 billion in the
first quarter of this year.
    Most of the surplus is expected to come from trade with the
U.S., Taiwan's largest trading partner and importer of nearly
50 pct of Taiwan's total exports, he said.
    He said he expected Taiwan's imports, including grains,
machinery and power plant equipment, from the U.S. To rise
sharply because of government efforts to balance trade with
Washington. He declined to give figures.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12401>
Agriculture Ministry officials said they
are not considering cuts in import duties on chocolate to help
ease friction with the United States over agricultural trade.
    Japan has already lowered the duties sharply and we must
consider domestic market conditions, an official said.
    Duties on chocolate were cut to 20 pct from 31.9 pct in
April 1983.
    Washington has been demanding a cut to seven pct,
equivalent to its own duties, ministry sources said.
    Japanese chocolate imports rose to 8,285 tonnes in calendar
1986 from 5,908 in 1985, official statistics show.
    However, the ministry sources added it is possible the
government may make further cuts in response to strong U.S. And
European demand.
    "Due to concern about the farm trade row with the U.S.,
Top-level government officials may press the ministry to cut
the duties," one said.
    But he said it would be difficult for Japan to resolve its
overall trade row with Washington and reduce its trade surplus,
which reached 58.6 billion dlrs in 1986.
    Agricultural trade issues between Japan and the U.S.
Include Japanese import restrictions on 12 farm products.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12457>
Japan is doing all it can to solve its
trade problems with the United States but the two nations will
remain at odds as long as the trade account is lopsided in
Japan's favour, a senior official said.
    "So long as there is an external imbalance there will be
trade friction and ...Harsh words between the two governments,"
the Foreign Ministry official told reporters.
    Last year, Japan racked up a 51.5 billion dlr surplus with
the United States and economists said they do not see it
falling significantly any time soon.
    Washington announced plans last week to slap up to 300 mln
dlrs in tariffs on Japanese electronic goods, raising the
spectre of a trade war between the two countries.
    "We take the current situation very seriously," said the
official, who declined to be identified. "The basic stance of
the Japanese government is to tackle the issues with all
available resources."
    The United States has accused Japan of reneging on an
agreement that called on it to stop selling cut-price computer
microchips in world markets and to try to import more American
semiconductors. Tokyo has denied the charges.
    The Foreign Ministry official refused to rule out Japanese
retaliation if America went ahead with its threatened tariffs
in the middle of this month. But he said that any response
would be in accordance with international law and Japan's
international obligations.
    He added that both Japan and the United States must take
account of the impact of their dispute on their own and the
world economy.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12472>
Japan is sending a three-man team to
Washington to try to halt threatened trade sanctions that
officials warn could spark a wave of anti-U.S. Sentiment here.
    The team will lay the groundwork for high-level emergency
talks next week aimed at defusing an increasingly bitter row
over trade in computer microchips, officials said.
    "The sanctions are against the free trade system," Ministry
of International Trade and Industry (MITI) director general
Noboru Hatakeyama told reporters, adding: "If these measures are
taken, the atmosphere in Japan against the United States would
become not so good as before."
    Other officials were more blunt. "The U.S. Action will have
a significant impact on the growing anti-U.S. Feeling (here),"
another MITI official said.
    A senior Foreign Ministry official, who declined to be
identified, told Reuters the U.S. Threats have undercut those
in the government who argue for conciliation.
    "There is a very strong argument in Japan that since the
United States is imposing tariffs unilaterally, why should we
bother doing anything," he said. "Anything we do, we will be
bashed."
    The senior official sounded pessimistic about the
likelihood of Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone defusing U.S.
Anger over Japanese trade practices when he visits Washington
on April 29.
    "I don't think trade friction will be solved all of a sudden
(by the visit)," he said.
    Nakasone is widely expected to present a package of
measures to President Reagan to help contain U.S. Frustration
over Japan's large trade surplus.
    But the senior official played down those expectations.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12473>
Japan is doing all it can to solve its
trade problems with the United States but the two nations will
remain at odds as long as the trade account is lopsided in
Japan's favour, a senior official said.
    "So long as there is an external imbalance there will be
trade friction and ...Harsh words between the two governments,"
the Foreign Ministry official told reporters.
    Last year, Japan racked up a 51.5 billion dlr surplus with
the United States and economists said they do not see it
falling significantly any time soon.
    Washington announced plans last week to slap up to 300 mln
dlrs in tariffs on Japanese electronic goods, raising the
spectre of a trade war between the two countries.
    "We take the current situation very seriously," said the
official, who declined to be identified. "The basic stance of
the Japanese government is to tackle the issues with all
available resources."
    The United States has accused Japan of reneging on an
agreement that called on it to stop selling cut-price computer
microchips in world markets and to try to import more American
semiconductors. Tokyo has denied the charges.
    The Foreign Ministry official refused to rule out Japanese
retaliation if America went ahead with its threatened tariffs
in the middle of this month. But he said that any response
would be in accordance with international law and Japan's
international obligations.
    He added that both Japan and the United States must take
account of the impact of their dispute on their own and the
world economy.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12563>
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter stressed the importance of trade negotiations to open
foreign markets rather than trade restrictions in a statement
to the Senate Finance Committee.
    "In the long term we cannot repeatedly bludgeon other
nations into opening their markets with threats of U.S.
restrictions. Rather, we must be able to negotiate credibly for
global liberalization," Yeutter said.
    Yeutter did not mention the recent U.S. trade sanctions
against Japanese semiconductors in his testimony on the pending
trade bill.
    Yeutter said the trade bill should increase U.S.
competitiveness, aid U.S. trade negotiating leverage, and avoid
provoking foreign retaliation.
    He urged Congress to reject provisions that would mandate
U.S. retaliation against foreign unfair trade practices.
    Yeutter emphasized the importance of the new multilateral
trade negotiating round and called on Congress to quickly
approve an extension of U.S. negotiating authority.
    "We want to open foreign markets and establish and enforce
rules of international competition, not foster dependence on
protection and subsidies," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12564>
The U.S. and the European Community could
enter into a new trade dispute unless urgent action is taken to
explain EC farm policy to the U.S. Congress, French official
sources said.
    They said Prime Minister Jacques Chirac planned to urge EC
Commission president Jacques Delors to send a team of experts
to Washington as soon as possible.
    Chirac returned to Paris this morning after three days of
talks in New York and Washington in which trade and
protectionism featured prominently.
    At the centre of the new trade tension is an EC Commission
proposal to tax vegetable oils, the sources said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12755>
An big expansion in bilateral trade is
expected as a result of Swedish Prime Minister Ingvar
Carlsson's visit to China, a official of China's Foreign
Economic Relations and Trade Ministry official said.
    He told the China Daily that petroleum, coal, cotton,
non-ferrous metals and electric engines could help balance the
trade running at over three-to-one in Sweden's favour.
    Total trade reached 290 mln dlrs last year, up 32 pct on
1985, according to Chinese statistics. Swedish sources said
major paper mill projects and an aviation agreement would be
discussed during Carlsson's one week visit.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=12848>
Amid new concerns about inflation,
interest rate increases and trade confrontations,
finance ministers and central bankers meet next week to discuss
a deteriorating global debt and economic situation.
    The meetings, under the auspices of the International
Monetary Fund and World Bank, come as interest rates are
turning higher and the already-weak dollar has sunk further,
upsetting bond and stock markets.
    Uncertainty is growing about the vitality of the global
economy and whether the heavily-indebted countries can continue
to carry the burden of their growing debt without vast new
assistance.
    Monetary and diplomatic sources said there are no signs
any new debt initiative of the sort that Treasury Secretary
James Baker unveiled 18 months ago in Seoul is in the works.
    The strategy has drawn a serious challenge from Brazil,
which suspended interest payments on 67 billion dlrs of
commercial bank debt last month. The Banks have responded by
laying the groundwork for writing down Brazilian loans.
    Separately, French Prime Minister Jacques Chirac, in a
visit earlier this week with President Reagan, sounded out the
administration on a plan to funnel worldwide grain surpluses to
the very poorest states.
    The French plan is certain to be discussed by the ministers
in detail during next week's meetings and will undoubtedly be
embraced by the developing countries.
    "There's interest on the part of some countries for looking
at the support of the special problems of the very poorest
countries, because their position is so extreme," a Reagan
administration official said.
    He suggested Washington was open to disussing the issue.
    The meetings will also assess the success of the Baker debt
initiative, which called for new funding to help debtor
countries grow out of their problems.
    The largest industrial countries have been attempting to
coordinate economic policy in the hope of controlling the
decline of the dollar, U.S. trade and budget deficits and other
problems.
    At the same time, the industrial countries see little
evidence of a strengthening of economic activity and the Fund
forecasts they will grow 2.5 pct.
    The United States sees 3.2 pct growth for itself, 
continuing its expansion for a fifth year, and has asked other
industrial countries to stimulate their economies.
    These issues directly affect the debt problem and the
ability of the debtor countries to grow out of their
difficulties.
    In recent years, U.S. markets have absorbed the exports of
developing country, allowing them to earn critical foreign
exchange. But the United States wants to cut its trade deficit,
running at a record 169.8 billion dlrs, and is pressing others
to import more from developing countries.
    The discussions, from April six to 10, will be
wide-ranging, touching everything from interest rates to the
impact of development loans on the environment, according to
monetary sources.
    The talks will include an examination of trade
protectionist pressures in the wake of a decision by the Reagan
administration to place some 300 mln dlrs in tariffs on
microchip products from Japan, the sources said.
    The move accelerated the dollar's decline as financial
markets grew alarmed that trade war was in the offing.
    There is concern that the action, prompted by U.S. charges
that Japan has been selling computer chip products below fair
market value and has kept its own market closed to imports,
further undermining the international trading system.
    At the same time, the ministers will discuss the
fundamental price weakness in basic commodities, the export
mainstay of many developing countries.
    The so-called Group of Five industrial countries -- the
United States, Japan, West Germany, France and Britain -- will
gather for the first time since their February talks in Paris,
where they agreed to keep the dollar from sliding further.
    The Five will be joined later by Italy and Canada for
further debate on economic policy coordination.
    As part of the Paris accord, surplus countries such as
Japan agreed to stimulate their economies, while America
said it would reduce its federal budget deficit.
    Other major issues of the meetings include a U.S. bid to to
have a larger say in approving loans of the Inter-American
Development Bank, strengthening the link between loans and
economic policy changes in debtor nations.
    Washington is also pressing the World Bank to take more
account of the environment when making loan for dams and other
projects.
    The new head of the Bank, Barber Conable, has said this
issue is being reviewed and will be part of a reorganization
plan for the Bank, now being prepared.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13039>
U.S. and Japanese officials meet
tomorrow to try to settle a dispute over semiconductor trade
and to cut short the 300 mln dlr penalty tariffs President
Reagan has ordered imposed on Japanese exports.
    But U.S. officials held out little hope that any accord
could be reached before the tariffs of 100 per cent - up from
about five per cent - are to take effect on April 17.
    The Customs Bureau last week started to levy a bond on the
Japanese goods that Reagan ordered penalized. The penalties
would be retroactive to March 31.
    Reagan said on March 27 when ordering the tariffs that he
hoped the Japanese would soon end their unfair practices in
semiconductor trade and that sanctions could be lifted.
    Technical meetings are to be held today and tomorrow, with
meetings at a more senior level scheduled for Thursday and
Friday. Public hearings on the sanctions are set for April 13.
    The Japanese aides here for the technical talks include
Shigeru Muraoka, director-general of international trade policy
of the Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI), and
Masashi Yamamoto, deputy director-general of the information
and machinery bureau.
    Meeting with them will Glen Fukushima, director of the
Japan office of the U.S. Trade Representative's Office, and Jim
Gradoville, of trade representative's office of industry and
services.
    The two sides in the Thursday and Friday talks will be
headed by Deputy U.S. Trade Representative Michael Smith and
MITI vice minister Makoto Kuroda.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13045>
The U.K. government hopes for a
breakthrough on the deadlock with Japan over trade policies
during next week's visit to Tokyo by Corporate Affairs Minister
Michael Howard, political sources said.
    Howard, who leaves for Japan tomorrow, told Reuters he will
try to promote understanding on trade issues during his visit.
    Meanwhile, Britain will re-examine a letter from Japanese
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone promising personal help in
solving the row over a U.K. firm's bid to win a significant
role in Japan's telecommunications market, government sources
said.
    Tensions have risen following Britain's decision to arm
itself early with new statutory powers which it says could be
used against certain Japanese financial institutions.
    Britain reacted optimistically at first to the letter from
Nakasone to Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher, seeing it as a
signal that he would work towards ensuring a satisfactory
outcome to the bid launched by Cable and Wireless Plc,
government officials said.
    But this view has since been clouded by reports from Tokyo
that Nakasone's assurances really constituted little more than
politeness in the face of British anger, they added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13046>
World Bank President Barber Conable
expressed concern that trade protectionism, at the heart of a
new showdown between the United States and Japan, might spread
throughout the industrial world.
    But in an interview with Reuters, Conable said the action
by the United States to slap tariffs on certain electronic
goods from Japan did not mean the countries were heading for a
full-scale trade war.
    Conable said the World Bank has been pressing developing
countries to open their markets, arguing that a free trading
environment increased the possibility of global economic
growth.
    "We have, in fact, been making adjustment loans to many
countries in the developing world which have encouraged the
opening of their markets and we want to be sure that the
developed world doesn't close at the same time," he said.
    He said the U.S. action against Japan was "a significant
retaliatory step but it did not constitute a basic change in
trade policy."
    The interview came just before next week's semi-annual
meetings of the Bank and the International Monetary Fund.
    Referring to Brazil's recent interest payments moratorium,
Conable also said the global debt situation was very serious
and must be closely watched.
    He said the Bank, which in the past has concentrated on
making loans that assist the basic underpinnings in the
developing world such as dams, roads and sewers, will
increasingly make assistance available for economic reform.
    The Bank has increased these loans, in part because of the
debt crisis that has found countries desperately in need of new
funds for balance of payments adjustment and economic reforms
aimed at opening their markets, encouraging foreign investment
and reducing government's role in the economy.
    "We're comfortable with adjustment lending, we expect,
however, that it will never reach a majority of our portfolio,"
Conable said.
    He made clear, however, that adjustment lending would
continue to increase as a proportion of overall Bank lending
for some time.
    He noted, "the problem of debt was a severe one and many
countries are asking for adjustment assistance because of the
problem of debt."
    Conable, is a a former Republican Congressman from New York
chosen by President Reagan for the Bank position last year. He
is an associate of Treasury Secertary James Baker who launched
the U.S. strategy for shoring up indebted nations in October,
1985 which included a call for increased adjustment lending by
the World Bank.
    Conable also said that he expected the result of a major
study of the Bank's organization to be completed in the next
several weeks.
    He said the decision to seek a reorganization was based, in
part, on the fact that the Bank had come under fire from the
poorest countries for not doing enough to help and from the
richest countries because of inefficiency.
    the reorganization is considered a major initiative by
Conable, and is being closely-watched by the agency's 151
member-countries as an indication of his management style and
priorities.
    "I want to be sure this institution is viewed by those who
must support it as soundly constituted so that it will be
permitted to grow," Conable said.
    However, he said "I don't believe there is anything
basically wrong with this institution and I don't believe it
has to have any redefinition of its purpose."
    He said, however, that it was apparent that the debt
initiative proposed by Baker has given the Bank a central role
in dealing with the debt crisis.
    Conable added that cooperation between the Bank and its
sister agency, the International Monetary Fund, was good and
that he talked often with IMF Managing Director Michel
Camdessus on a variety of issues.
    On a personal level, Conable said that he not feel a need
to put his personal stamp on the Bank noting that "I don't have
a particular mission here except to be useful to the
institution and to the process of development."
    He added, "so I don't feel a great calling to personalize
the institution."
    On the development needs of sub-Sahara Africa, Conable said
that the Bank was constantly reviewing new ways for assisting
the region, noting that half of the recently agreed financing
of 12.4 billion dlrs for Bank's International Development
Association was earmarked for Africa.
    Leading industrial nations are expected to consider new
forms of debt relief for the very poorest nations, like those
in the Sub-Sahara, during next week's meetings.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13482>
Taiwan's trade surplus widened to 4.18
billion U.S. Dlrs in the first quarter of 1987 from 3.05
billion a year ago, the government statistics department said.
    First quarter exports rose to 11.25 billion U.S. Dlrs from
8.38 billion in the same period in 1986. Imports rose to 7.08
billion from 5.33 billion last year.
    The March trade surplus was 1.45 billion dlrs compared with
1.32 billion in February and 1.02 billion in March 1986.
Exports rose to 4.07 billion U.S. Dlrs from 3.85 billion in
February and 2.99 billion in March last year. Imports were 2.61
billion dlrs against 2.53 billion in February and 1.96 billion
in March 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13649>
British corporate affairs minister Michael
Howard told Japan to resolve the row over the U.K. Firm Cable
and Wireless Plc's &lt;CAWL.L> shareholding in a new Japanese
telecommunications company or face an abrupt deterioration in
trade relations.
    In meetings with both the foreign and telecommunications
ministers Howard said he expressed deep concern about the way
Tokyo had handled the dispute and about the continuing trade
imbalance between the two countries.
    "I put it to the (post and telecommunications) minister that
I was sure he did not want to be responsible for an abrupt
deterioration in the trading relations of our countries which
would have widespread reverberations elsewhere in the world,"
Howard told reporters.
    "He listened very carefully and I have little doubt the
message got home," he added.
    British frustration over the lopsided trade balance -
nearly six billion dlrs in Japan's favour last year - has
reached boiling point over the telecommunications issue, Howard
said.
    Howard has accused Japan of trying to shut out Cable and
Wireless from having a major role in the international
telephone market in Japan.
    "I want a fair crack of the whip for Cable and Wireless as I
want a fair crack of the whip for Britain generally in trading
relations," Howard said. "We simply aren't prepared to continue
to accept the imbalance which has been the position for such a
long time."
    Post and Telecommunications Ministry officials were unable
to comment on Howard's meeting with their minister.
    But Foreign Ministry officials said Foreign Minister
Tadashi Kuranari said that British exports to Japan are
increasing, but acknowledged the continuing imbalance in trade.
    Kuranari said he wants everyone in the telecommunications
dispute, including Cable and Wireless, to be satisfied.
    Howard told reporters that Britain was actively considering
possible retaliatory measures if it did not get its way on the
telecommunications issue.
    "There are measures which are under consideration if we
continue to suffer from the imbalance in our trading relations,"
he added, but gave no details.
    He said he had received a reassuring response from the
Japanese he has spoken with.
    "But of course we've had reassuring signs from the Japanese
for quite some time," he added. "What I've made plain is we
expect to see action."
    Howard ruled out using powers in Britain's Financial
Services bill to retaliate against unfair trade practices.
Those powers, which allow London to ban foreign financial firms
like banks from Britain, are designed to ensure U.K. Firms
equal access to overseas financial markets.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13869>
Shifts in domestic economic policy,
not a further fall in the dollar or trade restrictions, are the
key to reducing imbalances in trade and payments, Dutch Finance
Miniister H. Onno Ruding said.
    Ruding told a meeting of the World Trade Forum here that
protectionism would naturally lead to retaliation and aggravate
the problems of heavily indebted developing countries.
    "The main contribution towards resolving the still enourmous
U.S. trade deficit is not repeat not a further fall in the
dollar, is not still more protectionism in your country."
    "No, it is - like in other countries - changes in domestic
economic and financial policies," Ruding said.
    Ruding said he was less worried about a crisis of the
weakening dollar than he was in January before the Paris accord
to stabilize foreign exchange rates.
    He said the highest priority should be given to policy
changes in the United States, especially reducing the budget
deficit and encouraging domestic savings.
    But he said other countries, such as Japan and West
Germany, also needed to take greater steps toward reducing
their trade surpluses.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13903>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said a further large drop in the value of the dollar
could be counterproductive for world economic growth.
    Testifying before the Senate Banking Committee, Volcker
said that Europe and Japan were slowing exports and that growth
in those countries was also decreasing.
    "In that kind of situation, further sizeable depreciation
of the dollar could well be counterproductive," he said.
    Domestic expansion in foreign industrial countries has not
been enough to offset the effects of slower exports, Volcker
said.
    On the value of the dollar, Volcker said he could not say
whether it should be higher or lower to restore balance in
trade.
    "What we do know is that a substantial exchange rate
adjustment has already been made," he said.
    "That adjustment should be large enough, in a context of a
growing world economy and fiscal restraint in the United
States, to support the widespread expectations of a narrowing
in the real trade deficit in the period ahead," he said.
    Volcker said U.S. exports were now growing substantially
while import growth should slow.
    Volcker said that to improve the trade deficit with a
minimum of inflationary pressure, the United States would have
to slow its spending growth.
    It would also have to achieve a better balance between
investment and domestic savings if it wants to be able to
dispense with foreign capital.
    "The constructive way to work in the needed direction would
be to reduce our budget deficit, year by year, paving the way
for improvements in our trade accounts," he said.
    Relying on depreciation of the dollar alone would risk
renewed inflation, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13908>
The United States has appealed for
stronger powers for the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
(GATT) to enforce world trade rules.
    The call by U.S. Deputy Trade Representative Michael Smith
at a special committee meeting into the future of GATT follows
a series of bilateral trade rows which have clouded efforts by
the 93-nation body to promote fair trade.
    Today's meeting was part of the Uruguay trade round
launched by ministers last September. The round, which covers
13 areas of trade in agriculture, manufactured goods and
services will take four years to negotiate.
    Smith called for boosting GATT's links with financial
institutions such as the International Monetary Fund and World
Bank. He also urged greater involvement of trade ministers to
ensure the success of the Uruguay Round.
    "The GATT as an institution needs to be strengthened to
assure that the GATT plays its proper role in management of the
world trading system and the global economy," Smith said.
    "Rules can and will be ignored if the institution is weak,
or perceived as unable to adapt to the changing world economy."
    He also also urged that member states be accountable to
each other for their trade policies.
    Smith, who flies to Brussels today for talks with European
Community (EC) officials, told Reuters the committee wanted to
stress GATT's importance and did not discuss specifics.
    "We are interested in more periodic ministerial
involvement...Whether in formal or informal meetings," he said.
    GATT's ruling council is due to hear a complaint from the
12-nation EC on April 15 about the U.S.-Japanese accord on
semiconductors. The EC charges the accord breached GATT trade
rules by allowing Tokyo to set minimum prices for Japanese
chips sold in third countries and is requesting a GATT dispute
panel be set up to review the agreement.
    President Reagan, who strongly supported the Uruguay trade
round to promote freer trade, has said Washington will impose
tariffs against Japanese electronic goods.
    He said Tokyo had not shown willingness to open its markets
to U.S. Exports.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=13946>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said that debtor nations have made much progress in
laying the groundwork for economic growth, but a solution to
world debt difficulties was endangered by inaction on new
financing.
    "There is clearly a danger that adequate financing
arrangements are not being negotiated and put in place in a
timely way," Volcker told the Senate Banking Committee.
    The borrowing countries need to be able to proceed with
confidence that the necessary funds will be available to them,
he said.
    Brazil has the potential for becoming a leading world
economic power, but it is in a difficult position today,
Volcker said.
    He said it will take a concerted effort to regularize
Brazil's external payments.
    "The key prerequisite is clearly in the hands of Brazilian
authorities," he said.
    Both Brazil and its creditors have a strong incentive to
work together, Volcker said.
    Regarding trade imbalances, Volcker said that it was
critically important that markets be kept open by the
industrial nations.
    In addition, the United States must reduce its budget
deficit and foreign nations need to provide stimulus to their
domestic economies, Volcker said.
    "We need time for those actions and the earlier
depreciation to work their effects," he said.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14012>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said reducing the federal budget deficit was a more
important goal for Congress than drafting trade legislation.
    "Reduce the budget deficit," Volcker responded when asked by
a member of the Senate Banking Committee about trade
legislation priorities.
    "If you don't deal with the budget deficit, everything else
you do is going to be counterproductive," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14109>
The inflow of long-term capital into
West Germany slumped to 606 mln marks in February from
January's record 11.91 billion, with foreign purchases of
German bonds and shares declining sharply, the Bundesbank said.
    While foreigners bought only four billion marks worth of
German bonds in February after 13 billion in January, they sold
a net 500 mln marks in shares and promissory notes of public
authorities after sales worth 300 mln in January.
    With German investors' purchases of foreign securities
steady around 1.3 billion marks, only 2.2 billion marks were
imported through securities transactions, after 11.2 billion.
    Direct investment abroad led to a capital outflow of 1.60
billion marks in February after 2.83 billion in January.
    There was a deficit of 8.14 billion marks in the short-term
capital account after a surplus of 194 mln in January.
    Banks alone exported some 8.6 billion marks in funds while
domestic companies increased their short-term financial assets
abroad by 700 mln. But public authorities received some one
billion marks from abroad, the Bundesbank said in a statement.
    Combining long and short term capital outflows, West
Germany recorded a net outflow of 7.53 billion marks in
February against a net inflow of 11.91 billion in January.
    The Bundesbank confirmed the German trade surplus widened
to 10.45 billion marks in February from January's 7.20 billion.
    Taking the two months together the seasonally adjusted
surplus was slightly below the figure for the previous two. In
terms of current as well as constant prices, the narrowing of
the surplus was progressing, the bank said.
    Germany's current account surplus widened to 6.63 billion
marks in February from 4.79 billion in January, but was down on
the 7.26 billion figure for February 1986. Seasonally adjusted,
the February current account surplus narrowed against January.
    While exports in February fell a half pct against the same
month last year, imports fell 10-1/2 pct largely due to the
drop in prices. Exports grew three pct in volume and imports
two pct.
    In the balance of services, a fall in net investment income
led to a 300 mln mark deficit in February after a 300 mln mark
surplus in January.
    The deficit in transfer payments widened to 3.70 billion
marks from 2.69 billion, largely due to a sharp jump to 2.3
billion marks from 200 mln in payments to the European
Community budget.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14199>
Japan is attempting to cut back
semiconductor production to forstall the 300 mln dlrs in U.S.
tariffs on Japanese electronic goods set to take effect April
17, industry analysts said.
    The move is likely to create a sharp price rise and a
possible shortage of the key computer components in the next
few weeks, the analysts said.
    "Prices have gone up for memory components, the mainstay of
the Japanese semiconductor industry," analyst Drew Peck of
Donaldson Lufkin and Jenrette said.
    But analysts said the price rises have been slight so far,
and some questioned whether Japan would be successful in
forcing Japanese companies to cut production in the long run.
    Others, however, were more optimistic, saying evidence was
already in hand that Japan has cut back prodution and halted
sales to the grey market, the third country brokers that sell
chips at below production costs.
    "We've seen the grey market begin to dry up for D-RAMS, and
it has virtually dried up for EPROMS," said Merrill Lynch
analyst Thomas Kurlack of the two key memory chips used in
computers.
    "Prices are inching up and lead times on deliveries are
stretching," Kurlack added.
    Industry analysts said Japan's Ministry of International
Trade and Industry, or MITI, had requested the cut backs in
production to meet the terms of last year's semiconductor
accord with the U.S.
    The Reagan adminsitration recently proposed tariffs on
Japanese electronic goods, alleging that Japan had failed to
live up to the accord and continued to dump the computer
components in the U.S. market.
    But some analysts said Japan's attempt to mollify the U.S.
was a double edged sword, and might be read at a subtle form of
trade retaliation for the tariffs proposed by the U.S.
    As production in Japan is cut, these analysts argue, prices
will rise in the U.S. and few American semiconductor
manufactures will be able to take up the slack since most long
ago exited the market for memory chips. U.S. computer makers
that use the chips in their machines will then be pressured.
    "The Japanese are looking for ways to reduce trade
pressures from Washington, but at the same time they're
demonstating their muscle," analyst Peck said.
    The cut backs in Japanese production are expected to
benefit U.S. chip makers.
    "I think this could be a very important factor for U.S.
semiconductor manufacturers," industry analyst Elliot Levine of
Ladenburg Thalmann Co said.
    But analyst Peck said, "it will take a few weeks to see
whether Japan has genuinely cut production."
    He said Japanese manufactures were likely to view MITI's
request unfavorably because chip capacity was still high and
production cut backs would lead to significant write-offs in
plant and equipment.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14220>
Leading industrial nations will be
reviewing the Paris agreement to stabilize exchange rates,
foster increased worldwide growth and reduce trade imbalances
but the U.S. thinks the accord has been successful so far, a
senior U.S. Treasury official said.
    "The Paris accord will be reviewed at this meeting. It has
been successful and continues to be succesfull," a senior U.S.
Treasury official told reporters.
    In a briefing ahead of this week's semiannual IMF and World
Bank meetings, he also said the U.S. was looking to West
Germany and Japan to bolster their economic growth.
    The official said both surplus countries, like West Germany
and Japan, and deficit countries, like the U.S., agreed to play
a role in bringing about more balanced economic growth.
    He reaffirmed the U.S. would press ahead with efforts to
reduce its budget deficit, resist protectionism and boost U.S.
competitiveness.
    The official also said that he expected trade issues, like
the dispute between the U.S. and Japan over microchips, to be
included in the discussions.
    The official made no direct comment on the content or
schedule of forthcoming Group of Five and Group of Seven
discussions. He said that industrial countries are concerned
that the large external imbalances remain a threat to the
international monetary system.
    He added that the meetings will also provide an opportunity
to discuss economic policy coordination efforts.
    The official said indicators would be used to measure
policy objectives of industrial countries and their economic
projections.
    They would also be used to assess progress of policy goals.
    Asked whether the U.S. was proposing a new initiative
regarding the indicators, the official said the issue would be
reported to the Venice Summit in June. Monetary sources said
the U.S. proposal envisages using the indicators to make policy
coordination agreements, like the Paris Accord, more binding.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14739>
A group of Canadian lawmakers from
Ontario today asked their U.S. counterparts to exempt Canada
from the mandatory trade retaliation provisions in a major
trade bill being considered by the U.S. Congress.
    At a meeting of the Northeast-Midwest Coalition, an
organization of U.S. legislators, David Cooke, chairman of the
Ontario Parliament's Select Committee on Economic Affairs, said
the exemption would help trade relations.
    The trade legislation to be considered by the full House in
late April would require President Reagan to retaliate against
foreign unfair trade practices unless the trade actions would
harm the U.S. economy.
    Currently, Reagan can reject trade sanctions on any
grounds.
    Cooke, a member of the Liberal party, told the U.S.
congressmen, "I can understand (the trade bill). I think it has
to do with concerns you have with the other parts of the world."
    "I would suggest to you that we are your best friends. You
do not have those concerns with Canada and you should sincerely
consider exempting our country from that bill," he added.
    Canada is the United States' largest trading partner, with
two-way trade more than 113 billion dlrs in 1985, according to
the coalition. But the U.S. ran up a 23 billion dlr deficit in
manufactured goods that year compared to a 14 billion dlr
surplus in services trade with its neighbour.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=14770>
Bundesbank President Karl Otto Poehl
said a weaker dollar would be risky and a further appreciation
of the mark would damage prospects for sustained West German
economic growth.
    In a speech to the Institute of Contempory German Affairs
here, Poehl said "It would be an extremely risky policy to aim
for a further substantial decline in the value of the dollar to
correct the trade deficit."
    He said the United States could face a vicious circle of
depreciation, inflation and more depreciation if it took that
route.
    Poehl noted West Germany had already taken steps to meet
U.S. Demands for greater stimulation of its domestic economy,
accelerating tax cuts, cutting interest rates and tolerating
above-target money supply growth.
    He said he would have been happy to have brought forward
five billion marks of tax cuts now planned for January 1988 to
the beginning of this year, but he said the government faced
political constraints getting such measures through the upper
house of the West German parliament.
    But there were also limits to the impact West Germany could
accept on exports from a rising mark, he said.
    Poehl said West Germany relied on exports for about
one-third of its gross national product, so a substantial
erosion of export markets could not be offset by increasing
demand at home.
    "A further appreciation of the mark could even be an
obstacle to further growth," he said.
    Poehl said the Bundesbank had tolerated rapid money supply
growth last year because the country enjoyed low inflation and
because external factors, including low oil prices and
favourable terms of trade, had given some extra leeway.
    But Poehl said West Germany now faced a difficult dilemma
over monetary policy.
    The underlying rate of inflation was now two pct, not the
reported negative inflation rates last year, and West Germany
was affected more than before by exchange rate developments.
    "For the time being, we will have to focus our policy more
on the external side, and we can live with a more expansionary
money supply. But we must be very careful," he said.
    He said he shared some of the U.S. Concern about Japan's
trade surpluses, which affected European countries as well as
the United States.
    Poehl welcomed the so-called Louvre accord of monetary
officials of major industrialized countries, saying the
importance of the February 22 agreement to stabilize exchange
rates had been underestimated.
    All partners had agreed that the dollar was at about the
right level, and that further changes would damage growth, he
said.
    "This was a remarkable change in attitude, especially on the
part of our American colleagues," he said.
    But he said there was still a danger that the correction of
the dollar's value could overshoot.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2278>
Federal Reserve Board Vice Chairman
Manuel Johnson said that maintaining price stability was
critical to achieving non-inflationary economic growth in the
world and said that progress was being made.
    "It is worth reiterating that the Federal Reserve's
promotion of price stability is critical to the successful
implementation of virtually all of the important ingredients
for growth," he told the Eastern Economic Association.
    Johnson said initial progress has been made on a variety of
fronts. "Federal Reserve monetary policy, the
Gramm-Rudman-Hollings legislation, the G-6 agreement, and the
Baker debt initiative for example all have moved us in the
right direction," he said. G-6 is comprised of U.S., Britain,
France, Japan, West Germany and Canada.
    On the budget deficit, Johnson said meeting precise
numerical goals was less important than a continuing commitment
toward slowing the growth of federal spending.
    There was evidence deficits as a pct of Gross National
Product were declining and would continue to drop, he said.
    But Johnson warned against reliance on inflow of foreign
capital to finance investment and the budget deficit and keep
interest rates stable.
    "This situation, however, cannot continue indefinitely.
Sooner or later progress must be made in controlling excessive
federal spending," he said.
    A disinflationary monetary policy should continue to be the
main objective of the Fed, Johnson said.
    He also said a more stable and sustainable alignment of
exchange rates was needed for long-term growth.
    On the trade deficit, Johnson warned against "quick fix"
solutions, which he identified as excessive dollar depreciation
or protectionist trade legislation.
    "What is important is that we attempt to maintain healthy
returns to capital and adopt policies encouraging genuine
economic growth," he said.
    Such an approach would finance the trade deficit but allow
for its gradual resolution over time.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2352>
A reduction of the U.S. federal budget
deficit will be needed to help eliminate the nation's huge
trade deficit, U.S. trade representative Clayton Yeutter said.
    Speaking to the New York Chamber of Commerce and Industry,
Yeutter said "Capital and trade flows are clearly
inter-releated now.
    "Unless we get the budget deficit down, we will not get the
trade deficit down."
    He did not elaborate on his views of the linkages between
the two deficits.
    Private analysts have said that the financing of large U.S.
budget deficits requires heavy capital inflows from overseas
investors through purchases of U.S. Treasury and, to a lesser
extent, other U.S. securities as well.
    "We'll make some progress in reducing the 170 billion dlr
trade deficit in 1987, but there's still a long way to go,"
Yeutter said.
    He said the problem must be approached on many fronts and
focus most strongly on U.S. and overseas fiscal and monetary
policies to foster economic growth, U.S. competitiveness and
the establishment of a "level playing field" for trade.
    The U.S. trade representative said the Federal Reserve
under Chairman Paul Volcker has done its part to improve the
trade situation by getting interest rates down.
    On the fiscal side, Yeutter said "the budget deficit is
still our biggest problem" and there has not been enough
progress toward reducing that deficit.
    In the international area, he said that "our major trading
partners could still do more to stimulate domestic growth."
Commenting on Japan, which is running around a 80 billion dlr
trade surplus with the United States, Yeutter said "Japan is
just not doing the job on the import side."
    Yeutter declined to comment on statements relating to the
dollar made earlier today by Commerce Dept undersecretary of
Economic Affairs Robert Ortner.
    In a Washington address to an Export-Import Bank sponsored
meeting, Ortner said he believed the dollar at current levels
was fairly priced against most European currencies, but that
the yen is 10 or 15 pct undervalued.
    "The market will determine the dollar's proper value in the
end," Yeutter said. However, he added that, if the U.S. and
other nations do not take the necessary steps to cut the U.S.
trade deficit, "the dollar will be the equalizer."
    Yeutter said there is no quick fix to the trade problem and
any resort to such tactics as protectionist trade legislation
or trade restrictions poses real dangers.
    He said "there's relatively little that Congress can do to
legislate a solution to the trade problem."
    Protectionist legislation will only provoke retaliation by
U.S. trading partners, Yeutter said.
    "There is no doubt in my mind about the willingness of our
trading partners to retaliate against unfair trade
legislation," Yeutter said, adding that policy flexibility is
essential in solving international trade problems.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2359>
Australia accused the U.S. of increasing
protectionism on agricultural products and called for an end to
Washington's special 32-year exemption from certain GATT rules
on agricultural trade.
    Robert Arnott, Australia's delegate to the General
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), made the appeal at a
special annual meeting which reviews the 1955 U.S. waiver.
    "Australia today said the United States' goals of reducing
U.S. barriers to agricultural trade were being contradicted by
actions which in fact increased protection in trade in
agriculture," the Australian delegation said in a statement.
    "The United States section 22 waiver is one of the basic
flaws in the GATT coverage of agriculture," Arnott told the
meeting.
    Arnott said the waiver had continually been used as a
justification for "dubious protective measures" by the U.S. He
listed a recent Dairy Export Incentive Program and steps to
close the U.S. sugar market to imports.
    He also told Reuters the waiver allowed Washington to
impose quotas on imports of farm products where it had domestic
support programs. This covered imports of dairy products,
peanuts, cotton and sugar.
    Asked to comment, Michael Samuels, U.S. ambassador to the
GATT, told Reuters: "These charges have been made since the very
beginning. The waiver is part of domestic U.S. agricultural
policy, part of our law when we joined the GATT".
    "We have agreed to put the waiver on the table during the
Uruguay Round and invite other countries to do the same with
their programs. We can negotiate them all," Samuels added.
    Ninety-two nations are taking part in the four-year Uruguay
round of talks launched in Punta del Este last September.
Bargaining in agricultural goods and services (banking,
tourism, insurance) is included for the first time as well as
manufactured goods.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2417>
Top U.S. and European farm trade and
government representatives called for a sweeping reform of
world agriculture to redress a critical demand and supply
imbalance.
    Speakers at a conference on world agricultural markets here
demonstrated a growing U.S.-European consensus on the need for
an urgent and collective overhaul of world farm trade and
production.
    "It is vital that we work together to bring more freedom and
harmony into the world agricultural trade...(if not) the
disruptions in markets may grow even more severe, the walls of
protection climb higher and the level of possible retaliation
become more harmful," U.S. Department of Agriculture Deputy
Administrator William Bailey said.
    Bailey said his attendance at the two-day meeting, which
ends tomorrow, demonstrated the U.S. recognises the need to
adjust its policies to the changing market environment.
    The need for urgent reforms is justified by the "imbalance
and tensions of the world economy," the secretary general of the
Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development
Jean-Claude Paye said.
    And the forum for such a reform is the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade, he noted.
    Paye stressed the need for a progressive and joint
reduction of agricultural subsidies as well as social measures
to help farmers in unprofitable areas.
    Another possible solution would be to stop supporting farm
prices, allowing them to be fixed by supply and demand, and
instead help farmers through income support and adjustment
aids, proposed James Howard, Executive Vice-president of
Cargill (USA), one of the world's largest cereal houses.
    Franz-Josef Feiter, agricultural adviser to West German
Chancellor Helmut Kohl, agreed the European Community must take
greater heed of market constraints in fixing farm prices.
    However, "differentiated policy treatment is required" to
take account of large disparities in the situation around the
EC, he said.
    "Agriculture is an efficient sector of the European economy
and will remain so if the right policy is pursued within the
Community," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2499>
France and Yugoslavia agreed to set up a
joint economic commission as part of efforts to promote
commercial links and industrial cooperation between the two
countries.
    The French Finance Ministry said the commission, to be
composed of businessmen, was agreed during talks between
Foreign Trade Minister Michel Noir and Yugoslavian minister
without portfolio Egon Padovan.
    A ministry statement said both sides had agreed on the need
to boost trade links in keeping with an accord signed last year
calling for a 50 pct rise in commercial exchanges between the
two countries over the next six years.
    French trade with Yugoslavia has grown little over the past
two years.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2511>
The Reagan administration wants to
encourage expanded trade with the Soviet Union but does not
believe Moscow yet warrants most-favored-nation treatment,
Deputy Secretary of State John Whitehead said.
    "It seems to me that more trade between us is better than
less trade," he told a forum on U.S.-Soviet trade relations.
    To that end, the administration in January allowed foreign
policy controls on the export of oil and gas equipment to the
Soviet Union to lapse, he said.
    Also, Washington and its allies are reviewing remaining
export controls in hopes of simplifying the list of prohibited
items and speeding up the licensing process, he said.
    Whitehead said, however, the prefential treatment that
comes with most-favored-nation status is out for the moment.
    U.S. law prohibits most-favored-nation status for countries
that restrict emigration and other rights.
    "What we have seen so far (in improved rights under Soviet
Leader Mikhail Gorbachev) are promising trends," he said.
    But, he added: "We don't know if they will continue, we
don't know how significant they will be."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2521>
Brazil's recent announcement of a
suspension in interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of foreign
debt gave the banking system the jitters and confirmed views
among many international economists and commodities analysts
that Brazil will continue to flex its trading muscles in 1987.
    The developing world's most indebted nation is also its
most prolific exporter of agricultural commodities such as
coffee and soybeans, and might maximize foreign exchange
revenue by selling hard on world markets, economists said.
    "That sounds like a reasonable strategy. But there is no
way they can trade their way out of this situation," Aldo
Roldan, Vice President for International Services at Chase
Econometrics, said.
    Roldan told Reuters that Brazil not only had to tackle the
problems of satisfying domestic demand and competing on glutted
world markets, but also had to work to make its position on
foreign exchange markets more profitable.
    "Domestic costs have increased (due to inflation) and
exporters have not had the same offsetting movement in exchange
rates," Roldan said.
    The Chase economist also said commodities markets were
depressed and generally did not appear very promising for a
country like Brazil, where pure commodities account for some 50
pct of exports and in 1986 had a total value of around 23
billion dlrs.
    But he added: "They are always pretty aggressive and they
have good foreign marketing channels."
    Analysts said a key factor in Brazilian trade will be
coffee, and even without background pressure from foreign
creditors the world's largest producer was expected to hit the
market this year with a vengeance.
    Negotiations between International Coffee Organization
(ICO) members to re-establish producer export quotas broke up
earlier this week with major producers and consumers accusing
each other of intransigence.
    "Brazil would not tolerate a change in ICO regulations,
which others wanted changed," one senior coffee dealer said.
    The dealer, who declined to be named, said Brazil wanted to
preserve its market share. At the end of the talks, he said
Brazil hinted it could sell more than anyone else and others
would suffer.
    Brazil will be an aggressive seller under any scenario but
as yet there is no sign of unusually heavy Brazilian sales, the
dealer said.
    "If they do come into the market at this level it will go
lower and you could breach a dollar, ninety or eighty cents,"
he said.
    New York coffee futures for May delivery settled 2.29 cents
lower Thursday at 104.68 cents a lb, while more distant
deliveries fell the six-cent maximum trading limit.
    President of the Brazilian Coffee Institute, Jorio Dauster
told a press conference in Rio de Janeiro today that Brazil has
no set target for its coffee exports following the breakdown of
the ICO talks on export quotas.
    Many economists and analysts believe soybeans could be the
focus of possible stepped-up Brazilian marketing efforts. "They
will be more aggressive this year than they have ever been,"
according to Richard Loewy, analyst for Prudential-Bache
Securities Inc.
    Loewy believes the foreign debt problem, a good crop, plus
difficulties with storage would help motivate selling of the
Brazil soybean crop. "Brazilian farmers also need cash flow and
they can't afford to store the crops," he said.
    The Chicago soybean complex has been nervous for some time
about large South American crops developing under near ideal
conditions towards record yields.
    "We are going to see a very rapid decline, earlier than
usual, this year in our (U.S.) exports," Loewy said.
    Tommy Eshleman, economist for the American Soybean
Association (ASA), said this year's Brazilian soybean harvest
could total 18 mln tonnes, versus 13.7 mln last year.
    Marketings will be very aggressive this summer when prices
are usually high relative to the rest of the year due to the
vulnerability of the U.S. crop to bad growing weather.
    Another incentive to sell might be trade anticipation of a
reduction in the U.S. government soybean loan rate, offered to
farmers who give crops as collateral, Eshleman said.
    He said there has been some uncertainty this year about the
soybean loan rate, which acts as an effective floor for prices
by keeping supplies away from the free market. Farmers can
forfeit their beans to the government rather than repay the
loan.
    "We're getting into a period when they (Brazil) are
starting to harvest and starting to export," Eshleman said. But
he added it will be a while before U.S. exports fall to below
10 mln bushels a week from around 20 mln bushels currently.
    Jose Melicias from the research department of Drexel
Burnham Lambert said Brazil would be trying to export as much
as it can this year because of its economic situation.
    He said the debt situation was a major consideration. "The
Brazilian government also does not have enough money to pay for
storage," he added.
    Asked if a return to an inflationary environment in Brazil
would make farmers inclined to hold onto crops, Melicias said
it would not make a big difference.
    On other commodity markets, Brazil's selling impact may be
muted no matter its need to generate capital.
    Brazil is faced with a poor 1986/87 sugar harvest, which
could limit exports to the world market, analysts said. The
country may have oversold and be unable to honor export
commitments, and this plus higher domestic demand caused by
consumer price subsidies on ethanol and refined sugar, will
give it little room to stretch exports, they said.
    Brazil's other major crop, cocoa, is in its third year of
surplus. "Cocoa consumption is basically flat and last year it
fell, so I don't think they can start throwing out cocoa and
find many more markets for it," one analyst said.
    "If they come out as aggressive sellers, the market would
collapse and they can't afford to do that," she added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2535>
Trade between Argentina and Brazil
jumped 90 pct in 1986 versus 1985, Foreign Minister Dante
Caputo said.
    Speaking to reporters, Caputo said the near doubling in
trade showed the "tangible and immediate results" of a wide-
ranging economic integration accord signed by the presidents of
both countries last July.
    He said trade last year totalled 1.3 billion dlrs versus
700 mln dlrs in 1985.
    The accord provided for capital goods trade between the two
countries to rise to 2.0 billion dlrs over four years.
    Argentine wheat exports to Brazil will increase from
1,375,000 tonnes in 1987 to 2.0 mln tonnes in 1991, the accord
said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2618>
Momentum in th U.S. economy may be
picking up given solid across-the board increases in the
February U.S. employment report, economists said.
    U.S. non-farm payroll employment rose 337,000 in February,
twice what the financial markets expected. This follows a
319,000 gain in January, revised down from a previously
reported 448,000 increase.
    "Even if you look at January and February together, this is
still a much stronger report than the consensus expectation in
the market," said Allan Leslie of Discount Corporation.
    Economists stressed that gains in hours worked signal much
larger gains in February U.S. production and income than
previously forecast.
    The average work week rose 0.2 hours to 35.0 hours from
34.8 hours in January. The average manufacturing work week rose
0.3 hours to 41.2 hours, the longest factory work week since
November 1966, the Commerce Department said.
    "The gains in manufacturing employment point to a very
large increase in industrial production of between 0.5 and 0.7
pct," said Joe Carson of Chemical Bank. This compares to a 0.4
pct  gain in January U.S. industrial production.
    Peter Greenbaum of Smith Barney Harris Upham and Co Inc
noted that the average wage rate increased to 8.87 dlrs an hour
in February from 8.83 dlrs in January.
    "Combined with the increase in hours worked, this means
we'll get a pretty healthy gain in personal income vis-a-vis
the wage and salary disbursement," he said.
    Greenbaum said that February U.S. personal income should
rise at least 0.5 pct after being flat in January.
    He said the February employment gains are consistent with
his firm's first quarter U.S. real gross national product
growth forecast of 3.7 pct.
    Economists agreed that the employment data were negative
for the credit markets in that they signal a healthier economy
and no easing in the Federal Reserve's monetary policy. But
most said that the market need not fear tighter policy either.
    "This report is another reason for the Fed to not consider
easing," said Ray Stone of Merrill Lynch Capital Markets Inc.  
  "It gives them more room to address the dollar situation," he
said. "If they had to nudge policy tighter, they could do so,
but it's most likely they'll sit and wait."
    "The data have not been uniform," Stone added. "Durable
goods were weak in January and now employment is strong."
    In January, U.S. durable goods orders dropped 7.5 pct,
followed by a 4.0 pct drop in U.S. factory goods orders. U.S.
retail sales fell 5.8 pct, and the U.S. merchandise trade gap
widened to 14.8 billion dlrs.
    "Things just aren't adding up," said Steve Slifer of Lehman
Goverment Securities Inc. "Consumer spending, capital spending,
goverment spending, and net exports data show very weak first
quarter GNP growth of one pct," he said.
    "The employment and production data point to a big
inventory build-up, but that's what we thought in the fourth
quarter and we only got 1.3 pct GNP growth."
    Manufacturing employment gained 50,000 after falling 15,000
in January. Economists estimated that 30,000 of the gain was
accounted for by striking workers in the steel and machinery
industries returning to work.
    Even so, some economists said that the manufacturing gains
have resulted from an improving trade outlook.
    Jason Benderly of Goldman, Sachs and Co noted that the U.S.
trade picture improved in the fourth quarter as net exports
grew at a 20 pct annual rate while the rate of increase in
imports fell to only six pct, and that it continues to improve
in the first quarter.
    "Not only the official statistics for the fourth quarter,
but evidence of a pick up in orders from overseas for paper
products, chemicals, high-tech goods, and capital goods show
that trade is improving," Benderley said.
    "The economy is moving between extremes," he said. "Some
reports are going to look bad and some good, but first quarter
GNP is going to grow in the middle at about three pct."
    A 287,000 gain in services employment comprised the greater
part of February's employment gain. Retail services employment
rose 129,000 in February, compared to a gain of 117,000 in
January, previously reported at 166,000.
    Construction employment rose a slim 2,000 in February. But
this follows a robust 113,000 gain in January, revised down
from a previously reported 142,000 gain.
    The U.S. civilian unemployment rate was unchanged in
February at 6.7 pct. This means the jobless rate has stayed at
6.7 pct for three consecutive months, the lowest reading since
March 1980, the Commerce Department noted.
    "The Federal Reserve has to be pleased with this report,"
Carson said. "This takes away the Fed's flexibility to ease,
but there's no reason to tighten. It's way too early for that."
      
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2620>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
the agreement among industrial nations in Paris last month is
only a start in Washington's drive to intensify economic
cooperation among leading countries.
    In a speech to the National Newspaper Association, Baker
said "the six steps beginning with the Plaza Agreement and
culminating in the Paris Accord, are only a start."
    He added "we see our role as a steward of a process in which
we sit down with our industrial allies to find ways to promote
more balanced international growth."
    The Paris agreements called trade surplus countries to
strengthen their growth and on the U.S. to reduce its budget
deficit. Under such circumstances, the countries agreed their
currencies were within ranges broadly consistent with economic
fundamentals.
    Baker also said he still sees "ominous" signs of pressure for
protectionist trade legislation "and this pressure for
protectionism is coming from new areas of society."
    But he also said he believed a coalition was forming that
supported free trade.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2648>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
said the Japanese trade surplus would begin to decline this
year.
    He told the National Newspaper Association "You're going to
see a reduction in the Japanese trade surplus -- some of it
this year".
    But he said the reduction would be due principally to the
exchange rate shifts since the Plaza Agreement, and these
shifts would take a long time to work their way through the
system.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2862>
President Reagan formally ended
preferential duty-free trade treatment for exports from
Nicaragua, Romania and Paraguay under the Generalized System of
Preferences (GSP).
    He took the action after determining that the three
countries are not taking steps to give their workers
internationally recognized rights.
    U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter had announced the
intended action on January 2. The United States conducts no
trade with Nicaragua and very little trade with Romania and
Paraguay.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=2985>
The Bangladesh trade deficit narrowed to
1.91 billion Taka in October from 5.64 billion in September and
2.43 billion in October 1985, the Central Bank said.
    Imports dropped to 4.31 billion Taka in October from 8.22
billion in September and 4.72 billion in October 1985.
    Exports totalled 2.4 billion Taka in October, as against
2.58 billion in September and 2.29 billion in October 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3019>
The 24 nations of the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), hampered by
sluggish industrial output and trade, face slower economic
growth, and their joint balance of payments will swing into
deficit in 1987, the Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said.
    The EIU said in its World Trade Forecast it revised OECD
economic growth downwards to 2.5 pct this year, compared with a
2.8 pct growth forecast in December.
    It said the new areas of weakness are West Germany and the
smaller European countries it influences, and Japan, hardest
hit by currency appreciation this year.
    The independent research organisation cut its 1987 growth
rate forecasts for West Germany to 2.2 pct from 3.2 pct in
December and to 2.3 pct from three pct for Japan.
    It said it expected the OECD to post a current account
deficit of some 13 billion dlrs in both 1987 and 1988, due in
large part to a 1.50 dlrs a barrel rise in 1987 oil prices.
    It said the U.S. Current account deficit looked likely to
fall even more slowly than forecast, to 125 billion dlrs in
1987 and 115 billion in 1988 from 130 billion in 1986.
    It said it expected West Germany to post a 31 billion dlr
payments surplus and Japan a 76 billion dlr surplus this year.
    The EIU said it saw oil prices dropping to around 16.50
dlrs a barrel by end-1987 and 15.50 dlrs in 1988 from about 18
dlrs last year, as adherence to OPEC output policy becomes
increasingly ragged.
    It said the dollar is poised to resume its decline in
foreign exchange markets, and will lose a further 13 pct on its
trade-weighted index this year and five pct in 1988 after last
year's 18.4 pct drop. The average mark/dollar rate is put at
1.80 marks this year and 1.70 in 1988 while the yen/dollar rate
is expected to break through the 150 yen barrier with an
average value of 150 yen in 1987 and 146 yen in 1988, it said.
    "This is not a crash scenario but the dollar's steeper
angle of descent increases the risk of ending with a fireball
rather than a three-point landing," the EIU said.
    "Talking will not stop the dollar's slide for long and the
February meeting (of finance ministers of the Group of Five and
Canada) produced scant promise of either a decisive shift to
more expansive policies in West Germany and Japan, or a tighter
U.S. Fsical policy," it said.
    It said the key to the dollar's fortunes was the
willingness of Japanese institutions to buy U.S. Government
assets despite prospects of sustaining a currency loss.
    "Thus far they have been willing," the EIC said, adding
that if Japan was deterred from buying U.S. bonds the dollar
would collapse.
    To contain such a currency crisis, dollar interest rates
would have to soar, bringing recession and a Third World debt
crisis, it said.
    On trade, the EIU said prospects for 1987 look
"increasingly sick."
    Import growth, forecast in December at 4.5 pct, is now seen
slowing down to around 3.8 pct in 1987 with a recovery only to
4.2 pct in 1988, it said.
    The weakness of the West German economy is the biggest
single factor, with import growth there expected to feature a
sluggish 3.5 pct growth in 1987 against the 6.5 pct forecast in
December, the EIU said.
    On the export side, it said it saw weak demand in West
Germany affecting export prospects elsewhere in Europe, while
Japan's exports in 1987 would remain flat and sales by U.S.
Exporters would respond only marginally to a lower, more
competitively-priced dollar.
    It said in most of Europe and in Japan, raw materials and
oil will cost less in domestic currency in 1987 than in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3065>
The 24 nations of the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD), hampered by
sluggish industrial output and trade, face slower economic
growth, and their joint balance of payments will swing into
deficit in 1987, the Economist Intelligence Unit (EIU ) said.
    The EIU said in its World Trade Forecast it revised OECD
economic growth downwards to 2.5 pct this year, compared with a
2.8 pct growth forecast in December.
    It said the new areas of weakness are West Germany and the
smaller European countries it influences, and Japan, hardest
hit by currency appreciation this year.
    The independent research organisation cut its 1987 growth
rate forecasts for West Germany to 2.2 pct from 3.2 pct in
December and to 2.3 pct from three pct for Japan.
    It said it expected the OECD to post a current account
deficit of some 13 billion dlrs in both 1987 and 1988, due in
large part to a 1.50 dlrs a barrel rise in 1987 oil prices.
    It said the U.S. Current account deficit looked likely to
fall even more slowly than forecast, to 125 billion dlrs in
1987 and 115 billion in 1988 from 130 billion in 1986.
    It said it expected West Germany to post a 31 billion dlr
payments surplus and Japan a 76 billion dlr surplus this year.
    The EIU said it saw oil prices dropping to around 16.50
dlrs a barrel by end-1987 and 15.50 dlrs in 1988 from about 18
dlrs last year, as adherence to OPEC output policy becomes
increasingly ragged.
    It said the dollar is poised to resume its decline in
foreign exchange markets, and will lose a further 13 pct on its
trade-weighted index this year and five pct in 1988 after last
year's 18.4 pct drop.
    The average mark/dollar rate is put at 1.80 marks this year
and 1.70 in 1988 while the yen/dollar rate is expected to break
through the 150 yen barrier with an average value of 150 yen in
1987 and 146 yen in 1988, it said.
    "This is not a crash scenario but the dollar's steeper angle
of descent increases the risk of ending with a fireball rather
than a three-point landing," the EIU said.
    "Talking will not stop the dollar's slide for long and the
February meeting (of finance ministers of the Group of Five and
Canada) produced scant promise of either a decisive shift to
more expansive policies in West Germany and Japan, or a tighter
U.S. Fiscal policy," it said.
    It said the key to the dollar's fortunes was the
willingness of Japanese institutions to buy U.S. Government
assets despite prospects of sustaining a currency loss.
    "Thus far they have been willing," the EIC said, adding that
if Japan was deterred from buying U.S. Bonds the dollar would
collapse.
    To contain such a currency crisis, dollar interest rates
would have to soar, bringing recession and a Third World debt
crisis, it said.
    On trade, the EIU said prospects for 1987 look "increasingly
sick."
    Import growth, forecast in December at 4.5 pct, is now seen
slowing down to around 3.8 pct in 1987 with a recovery only to
4.2 pct in 1988, it said.
    The weakness of the West German economy is the biggest
single factor, with import growth there expected to feature a
sluggish 3.5 pct growth in 1987 against the 6.5 pct forecast in
December, the EIU said.
    On the export side, it said it saw weak demand in West
Germany affecting export prospects elsewhere in Europe, while
Japan's exports in 1987 would remain flat and sales by U.S.
Exporters would respond only marginally to a lower, more
competitively-priced dollar.
    It said in most of Europe and in Japan, raw materials and
oil will cost less in domestic currency in 1987 than in 1986.
    However, rates of inflation will edge up in 1988 to over
the current OECD average of three pct. Non-oil commodity prices
will show a modest dollar price increase in 1988 for the first
time since 1984, the EIU said.
    After a rise of 18 pct in 1986, the dollar price of
internationally traded manufactures will go up by 8.5 pct in
1987 and by five pct in 1988, it said.
    It said OECD industrial production would rise by only 1.6
pct in 1987 after a weak 1.5 pct increase in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3078>
A free trade pact between the United
States and Canada could spur the economies of both sides
substantially, according to a study released by the Institute
for International Economics.
    The study, by Paul Wonnacott, said a successful conclusion
to the free trade talks now under way could raise Canada's
gross national product by more than five pct and expand U.S.
export's by about seven pct.
    He said the pact could resolve the knotty issue of
government subsidies, end curbs on trade in services and
investments and pave the way for new global talks under the 
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade.
    The United States and Canada - the world's two biggest
trading partners with cross border shipments of about 150
billion dlrs a year - opened free trade talks last June. They
are aiming for a pact by next October.
    Wonnacott, an economics professor at the Univerity of
Maryland, said an agreement should include:
    - Elimination of tariffs between the two countries, phased
in over a five to 10-year period;
    - Equal access to federal government procurement in the two
countries, replacing current "Buy America" and "Buy Canada"
provisions with a "Buy North America" provision;
    - Fewer restrictions in trade in services, chiefly finance
and transportation;
    - A commitment not to screen foreign investments in favor
domestic producers;
    - A commission to resolve bilateral trade disputes.
     Wonnacott said that to resolve the subsidy problem, the
two sides should permit export subsidies of exports of up to
2.0 or 2.5 pct without imposing coutervailing duties.
    The limit on subsidies is now 0.5 pct.
    He proposed that any attempt to impose new duties to offset
subsidies should go first a special disputes commission for
resolution at an early stage.
    Wonnacott said "bilateral free trade would contribute to the
efficiency of the North American economies and to their
competitiveness in facing overseas producers.
    He said it would it would open U.S. markets to Canadian
goods and enable them to benefit from the economies of mass
production.
    Benefits to the United States would be fewer than those to
Canada proportionately, he said, because of the already large
U.S. gross national product.
    Wonnacott said also that a U.S.-Canada pact in such areas
as export subsidies and the creation of a dispute commission
could set an example for the current attempt by GATT to write
new and more liberal global trading regulations.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3199>
South Korean Foreign Trade Minister
Rah Woon Bae said his country's firms have agreed to buy 1.8
billion dlrs worth of U.S. goods during his two-week buying
trip to the United States.
    Rah said most of the purchases represented shifts from
Japanese firms to U.S. firms as part of South Korea's effort to
reduce its seven billion dlr trade surplus with the United
States.
    South Korea has a five billion dlr trade deficit with
Japan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3267>
USX Corp chairman David Roderick called
for a lower value for the U.S. dollar against other currencies
to help speed a correction in the U.S. trade deficit, which
last year reached 170 billion dlrs.
    In remarks prepared for a speech before the Economic Club
of Detroit, Roderick said, "There should be total resolve that
the dollar versus other major currencies, as well as the
currencies of other nations having a substantial trade surplus
with us, must continue to decline so that the correction in our
trade deficit starts on the road to recovery."
    Roderick said the U.S. should be understanding of the
"economic pain" our trading partners experience as a result of
a falling dollar.
    But, he added, "As painful as the correction may be to our
trading partners, it is less painful than leaving the problem
uncorrected because that would lead us into an inevitable,
lengthy and steep world recession."
    Roderick said between February 1985 and December 1986 the
dollar fell by more than 40 pct in real terms against major
industrial currencies and by 30 to 35 pct against a broader
group of currencies of nearly all developing nations.
    At the end of 1986, he said, the value of foreign assets in
the U.S. exceeded the value of U.S. assets abroad by 240
billion dlrs, compared to five years ago when the U.S. had a
surplus in assets of 141 billion. A company spokesman said the
data were provided by economic consultants to USX.
    The primary reason for the trade imbalance was the 70 pct
rise of the dollar between 1980 and 1985, although other
factors were involved, Roderick said. But it is wrong, he said,
"to attribute the massive trade deficit to a fundmental
deterioration of U.S. productivity or of American product
quality."
    These areas need to be improved but they are not the root
cause of the trade gap problem, Roderick said. He urged
American manufacturers to become more competitive so they can
compete in global markets.
    In the speech, the USX chairman also called for changes in
securities laws to curb what he called abuses by corporate
raiders and speculators.
    Among his proposals, which he presented to the Senate
Banking Committee in testimony last week, were a requirement
that raiders give 24-hour notice for every one pct of stock
they acquire in a company.
    Roderick proposed that tender offers must be made for all
cash to all stockholders on equal terms and that raiders be
required to have financing in place before a tender is made.
    Further, raiders should be required to make an all-cash
tender offer once they acquire 10 pct of a target company's
stock, he said. And payment of greenmail, or a preferential
price by a target company to buy back a raider's stake, should
be prohibited under the revised laws.
    Roderick said changes were necessary to curb abuses but
that he did not want laws that would hurt the financial markets
or discourage "fair price to all" takeovers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3338>
The dollar will decline over the next
two to three years, but this is unlikely to result in a
complete reduction of the U.S. current account deficit, said
Anthony Solomon, chairman of S.G. Warburg (USA) Inc and former
president of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York.
    In a presentation to the Japan Society, Solomon said
without elaboration that he expects a "significant decline in
the dollar," within the next three years.
    "The dollar will fall more, but the current account deficit
will stop being reduced when it reaches its structural core,"
he said.
    Solomon described the structural core as about one-half of
the current 150 billion dlr annual deficit. He cited several
factors which will prevent an elimination of the deficit.
    For one thing, it is unlikely that there will be any new
investment in those manufacturing industries that shrank when
the dollar was at uncompetitive levels, he said.
    In addition, he said that the U.S. has an increased
propensity to import in order to satisify consumer tastes.
    Solomon forecast inflation at 4.5 pct by year-end, but said
it could be kept below five pct in the medium-term if oil
prices are stable and commodity values remain low.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3441>
There is little chance Soviet exports
to the United States will rise in 1987, but Moscow's current
trade reforms should result in more trade in manufactured goods
in future, a Soviet economist said.
    Sergey Frolov, chief economist at Amtorg Trading Corp, an
agent for Soviet trade organisations and industries, told a
U.S.-USSR business meeting the Soviet Union produces few items
that western nations want.
    But reforms, including upgrading the quality of goods and
allowing joint ventures with foreign firms, will encourage
modest export gains in future.
    Frolov said the Soviet Union exported 500 mln dlrs worth of
goods to the United States in 1986 and imported 1.5 billion
dlrs worth. He gave no trade forecast for 1987.
    But he said that even if all obstacles were removed, total
trade between the two countries would remain between two and
three billion dlrs a year.
    "The post-detente embargoes have taught the USSR to limit
its trading with the U.S.," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3446>
Japanese microchip makers are being
strong-armed into compliance with a U.S.-Japan pact on
semiconductors halting predatory pricing and opening Japan's
market to foreign chips, industry analysts said.
    But doubts remain over whether the Ministry of
International Trade and Industry (MITI), which is pressuring
the firms, can successfully battle market forces and whether
the U.S. Industry is geared up to take advantage of any
breathing space, they said.
    U.S. Threats to scrap the agreement signed last September
have pushed MITI to try harder to get recalcitrant Japanese
chipmakers to abide by the pact, the analysts said.
    "MITI has been moving hot and heavy throughout the industry
to get things done," said Bache Securities (Japan) associate
vice president Peter Wolffe.
    Last month, MITI told chipmakers to cut production for the
January to March period by 10 pct to help dry up inexpensive
chips that have escaped from Japan to grey markets not subject
to the pact's price controls.
    The ministry also asked electronics firms to provide
distributors with certificates designating them as authorised
exporters, in an effort to close loopholes through which grey
marketeers sneak chips out of Japan, market analysts said.
    U.S. Trade negotiators here last week said the pact was in
jeopardy because of continued dumping in non-American markets
and little sign of increased foreign sales in Japan.
    But major Japanese firms appear to have agreed to the
production cuts, several analysts said. Last week, NEC Corp
said it would cut production in line with MITI's request.
    "NEC has been the most aggressive in resisting MITI's
demands," said David Keller, analyst at James Capel and Co. "Once
NEC cuts production, it means they all have."
    Still, pressures remain to keep production high. Japanese
firms need high output to cut unit prices for U.S. Sales that
the Commerce Department assigns them under the pact.
    "The best way to lower cost is to produce more," said Salomon
Brothers Asia Ltd analyst Carole Ryavec.
    Preparations for a possible upturn in demand could also
spur higher production next quarter, Merrill Lynch analyst Matt
Aizawa said.
    Grey marketeers may also be able to outfox any new
restrictions, some industry officials said.
    "It's like tax avoidance schemes," said Steve Donovan, head
of MMI Japan K.K. "As soon as you close one route, another
opens."
    MITI's pressure has annoyed some makers, who had earlier
shrugged off MITI guidance.
    "It's getting to be like communism," said one.
    But analysts said output cuts could help by making it
easier to increase prices as planned on April 1 and forcing
firms to stop extending market share by selling at a loss.
    "They're going to have to start running their businesses
like businesses," Bache's Wolffe said.
    MITI has also been conducting a highly public campaign
urging chip users to buy foreign-made chips, but U.S. Industry
officials said response has been mixed at best.
    "There has been some change, but it's not across the board,"
said one U.S. Spokesman. "The companies have a varying degree of
urgency."
    The ultimate impact of all these efforts by MITI on the
troubled U.S. Industry remains in doubt, analysts added.
    Pressure to cut production of 256 kilobit DRAM (dynamic
random access memory) chips could merely speed the transition
to one megabit chips, where Japan now leads, analysts said.
    Whether U.S. Firms are able to stage a comeback in memory
chips, or interested in doing so, also remains unclear, they
said.
    Analysts are watching with interest the fate of a new U.S.
Consortium which hopes to challenge Japan by developing the
most advanced technology for microchip manufacturing.
    Even in the thorny area of access, much depends on U.S.
Commitment as well as on Japanese openness, some said.
    "The SIA (U.S. Semiconductor Industry Association) doesn't
even have an office here," a source close to the industry said.
"You could question just how committed they are."
    In addition, some industry analysts question the
effectiveness of a bilateral agreement that leaves out third
country chipmakers such as those in South Korea.
    "(South) Korea's gaining market share," said one analyst.
"They're the real winners from the agreement."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3512>
South Korea will further open its market
to help cut its trade surplus with the U.S. And to fight off
pressure to revalue the won against the dollar, a government
spokesman said.
    The spokesman said Korean trade minister Rha Woong-Bae's
stand in Washington yesterday against pressure from industrial
nations to revalue the won underlined the government's
determination to stand firm.
    Rha told the U.S. Chamber of Commerce "Demands that Korea
carry out a drastic and sudden currency revaluation of five or
10 pct are, I believe, extremely ill-advised."
    Deputy prime minister Kim Mahn-Je told a meeting of local
businessmen "The government's policy on the question of
revaluing the won is to maintain a steadfast position."
    Kim said South Korea was ready to move slowly to raise the
won's value because of its heavy foreign debt which stood at
44.5 billion dlrs at the end of 1986.
    Six industrialised nations agreed in Paris last month that
newly industrialising countries, such as South Korea and
Taiwan, should allow their currencies to appreciate.
    But local businessmen have said won/dollar parity has
already reached "a crisis level."
    An official of the Korea Traders' Association (KTA) said if
the won strengthened another five pct, this would mean the loss
of profitability for nearly half of all South Korean exporters.
    "We are determined not to go the way of Latin American
debtor nations which have suspended interest payments of their
debts," the spokesman said. "The only way to keep our good record
is to maintain our exports.+
    The trade minister said yesterday should Seoul revalue the
won suddenly Korea would run "a tremendous trade deficit and
could degenerate into a country, like many other developing
countries, which is reneging on its international obligations."
    The spokesman said South Korea had been gradually
appreciating its currency, ruling out a major revaluation. So
far this year, the won has gone up by 0.8 pct against the
dollar after a 3.34 pct revaluation in 1986.
    He said South Korea was selecting "many" of 122 items on
which Washington recently asked Seoul to lower tariffs to help
narrow its trade surplus with the U.S. No further details were
given.
    Seoul announced in January the lifting of bans on 158
items, including sensitive agricultural products and large
cars, effective from July.
    South Korea posted its first ever current account surplus
last year, due largely to a trade surplus with the U.S. Of 7.1
billion dlrs, against a 4.3 billion deficit in 1985. It earlier
forecast that its current account surplus could reach eight
billion dlrs this year.
    But the government official said the surplus would be held
at around five billion dlrs to avoid further pressure by
industrialised nations to push up the value of its currency.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3532>
Japan cannot bear a further rise of the
yen, Foreign Minister Tadashi Kuranari said.
    "A further stronger yen would be a misfortune for Japan and
the Japanese people would not be able to bear such a burden," he
told reporters.
    The minister said he wants to tell U.S. Political leaders
of the sacrifices Japan is making to cut its trade surplus.
    Kuranari was widely expected to fly to Washington tomorrow
for talks focussing on trade. But departure remains uncertain
because of the continuing parliamentary boycott by opposition
parties protesting plans for a new sales tax.
    If the boycott is lifted tomorrow, Kuranari would probably
have to remain in Japan to attend parliamentary discussions on
the government's 1987/88 budget, Japanese officials said.
    Kuranari said both the U.S. And Japan should approach the
trade imbalance in a calm, unemotional manner.
    But, he added, "If the issue of rice is to be raised...I
would mention the feelings of the Japanese people."
    Japanese politicians have said repeatedly the country
cannot bow to U.S. Pressure to liberalize rice imports because
the issue is too sensitive.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3553>
There is little chance Soviet exports
to the United States will rise in 1987, but Moscow's current
trade reforms should result in more trade in manufactured goods
in future, a Soviet economist said.
    Sergey Frolov, chief economist at Amtorg Trading Corp, an
agent for Soviet trade organisations and industries, told a
U.S.-USSR business meeting the Soviet Union produces few items
that western nations want.
    But reforms, including upgrading the quality of goods and
allowing joint ventures with foreign firms, will encourage
modest export gains in future.
    Frolov said the Soviet Union exported 500 mln dlrs worth of
goods to the United States in 1986 and imported 1.5 billion
dlrs worth. He gave no trade forecast for 1987.
    But he said that even if all obstacles were removed, total
trade between the two countries would remain between two and
three billion dlrs a year.
    "The post-detente embargoes have taught the USSR to limit
its trading with the U.S.," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3593>
National Bank of Hungary first
vice-president Janos Fekete said he hoped a planned eight pct
devaluation of the forint will spur exports and redress last
year's severe trade deficit with the West.
    Fekete told Reuters in an interview Hungary must achieve at
least equilibrium on its hard currency trade.
    "It is useful to have a devaluation," he said. "There is now a
real push to our exports and a bit of a curb to our imports."
    The official news agency MTI said today Hungary would
devalue by eight pct and it expected the new rates to be
announced later today. Fekete said the rates would come into
effect tomorrow.
    He said one reason for the devaluation was that Hungary had
a higher rate of inflation over the past two years than its
main partners (around eight pct in 1985 and between five and
5.5 pct in 1986).
    This was partly an after-effect of action Hungary took to
prevent inflation from soaring during the oil price shocks of
the 1970s, he added.
    Hungary devalued by a similar amount last September and by
between three and four pct early last year.
    But the country's hard currency trade balance nevertheless
fell into a deficit of 539.4 mln dlrs from a surplus of 295.3
mln in 1986 and 1.2 billion in 1985.
    Fekete said Hungary was hoping for a hard currency trade
surplus of between 200 and 300 mln dlrs this year, but that a
more likely outcome would be closer to equilibrium on total
hard currency trade of around 10 billion dlrs.
    One Western commercial attache here said: "Devaluation of
itself will not change anything. It will only be useful if they
also make efforts to restructure industry and improve the
quality of their export goods."
    Fekete said he hoped to raise credits on good terms this
year to invest in restructuring industry.
    It would be his role to persuade international banks to
cooperate in this process. He noted Hungary had been given an
AA rating enabling it to raise money on the Japanese Samurai
bond market.
    Hungary's net hard currency debt soared to 7.79 billion
dlrs last year from 5.01 billion in 1985, partly because of a
current account deficit of 1.42 billion dlrs and partly because
the fall in the dollar increased the dollar value of debt
denominated in marks or yen.
    He said he feared net debt would also rise slightly this
year, but he was in favour of borrowing for the purpose of
modernisation.
    "I am for credits to invest for that purpose," he said. "I am
against credits for consumption." He forecast gross domestic
product growth of two pct this year, from one pct in 1986.
   Fekete said Hungary would continue to restructure its debt
profile by prepaying high interest shorter and medium term
loans with cheaper long term money for which it was looking
more and more to the fixed interest rate bond market, where he
considered rates to be low.
    Hard currency foreign exchange reserves would stay at
around 3.5 billion dlrs, he said. On the budget deficit, which
tripled to a provisional 47 billion forints last year after
quadrupling in 1985, Fekete said the finance ministry was
working out measures to reduce an approved target deficit for
this year of 43.8 billion forints to between 30 and 35 billion
forints.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3615>
The U.S. merchandise trade deficit
on a balance of payments basis was a record 38.37 billion dlrs
in the October to December fourth quarter, the Commerce
Department said.
    The record trade shortfall came after a revised 37.15
billion dlr third quarter deficit. The department previously
reported the third quarter deficit was 37.67 billion dlrs.
    For the full year 1986, the merchandise trade deficit was a
record 147.7 billion dlrs, up from 124.4 billion dlrs in 1985,
the department said.
    During the final quarter last year imports rose 2.78
billion dlrs or three pct to 95.7 billion dlrs, while exports
rose 1.56 billion dlrs or three pct to 57.33 billion dlrs.
    The trade report on a balance of payments basis excludes
such factors as military sales and the costs of shipping and
insurance.
    The Commerce Department said non-petroleum imports in the
quarter were up 2.7 billion dlrs or three pct to 87.7 billion
dlrs, with the largest increases in consumer goods, which rose
1.2 billion dlrs, and in non-monetary gold and passenger cars
from Canada, up 900 mln dlrs each.
    Lumber imports from Canada fell 300 mln dlrs or 33 pct
because of a 15 pct duty on imports from Canada, the department
said. Passenger car imports fell 600 mln dlrs because of an 18
pct decrease in the number of South Korean-made imported cars
and a nine pct decrease from Japan.
    On the exports side, agricultural exports rose 600 mln dlrs
or nine pct to 7.1 billion dlrs, primarily because of a 104 pct
or 600 mln dlr increase in soybean exports.
    Soybean shipments to Western Europe rose sharply because
supplies from Brazil, a traditional major exporter, were
limited by drought.
    Commerce said the U.S. trade deficit with Latin America
rose 900 mln dlrs to 2.6 billion dlrs, with Japan increased 700
mln dlrs to 14.8 billion dlrs and with Western Europe rose 200
mln to 7.2 billion dlrs in the quarter.
    The deficit with newly industrialized Far East countries,
including Hong Kong, South Korea, Singapore and Taiwan, fell
500 mln dlrs to eight billion dlrs and with Canada the deficit
decreased 200 mln dlrs to 3.3 billion dlrs in the quarter.
    In the full year 1986, imports rose 30.6 billion dlrs or
nine pct to 369.5 billion dlrs. Exports increased by only 7.3
billion dlrs or three pct to 221.8 billion dlrs.
    Commerce said petroleum imports during 1986 fell 16.6
billion dlrs or 33 pct to 33.9 billion dlrs because of lower
prices. The average price per barrel decreased to 14.72 dlrs
from 26.41 dlrs.
    Agricultural exports fell by 2.6 billion dlrs or nine pct
to 26.9 billion during the year. The average price of rice fell
27 pct, cotton was down 22 pct, corn 18 pct, wheat 16 pct and
soybeans nine pct.
    The trade deficit with Japan for all of 1986 rose 11.1
billion dlrs to 54.6 billion dlrs and with Western Europe
increased 7.2 billion dlrs to 28.6 billion dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3690>
West German sugar statistician F.O.
Licht estimates European beet plantings this year at 7.22 mln
hectares compared with a revised 1986 figure of 7.21 mln,
traders said.
    In its first estimate for 1987, it puts EC plantings at
1.85 mln hectares compared with 1.89 mln in 1986, while it
estimates sowings in Western Europe (including EC) at 2.49 mln
hectares compared with 2.50 mln in 1986.
    Traders said Licht forecasts Eastern Europe plantings at
4.73 mln hectares against 4.72 mln in 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3770>
The European Community (EC) expressed
disquiet over protectionist moves in the United States to limit
imports of textiles and said it would retaliate immediately if
EC exports were hit.
    A spokeswoman for the EC Commission said EC External Trade
Commissioner Willy De Clercq had written to his U.S.
Counterpart, special U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter,
outlining the concerns of the 12-nation Community.
    The draft legislation under consideration by Congress would
impose permanent quotas on products entering the U.S. and seek
to limit any increase to a growth in the overall trade.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3902>
South Korean Trade Minister Rha
Woong Bae said his nation would maintain a trading surplus for
three to five years as a way to cut its foreign debt.
    He said in an interview with Reuter that after a few years
it was likely South Korea would drop barriers to foreign goods
and move toward a more balanced trade position.
    He said the present trade surplus was vital if his nation
was to reduce its 44.5 billion dlr foreign debt.
    Rha said that 1986 was the first year South Korea had a
trade surplus - 4.5 billion dlrs, against a 1985 deficit of 
900 mln dlrs.
    Rha made his remarks at the end of a two-week trade mission
here during which a team he led agreed to buy U.S. products
valued at 1.8 billion dlrs.
    About 800 mln dlrs of the purchases here were in goods of
the type South Korea normally bought from Japan.
    Rha leaves today for Ottawa for trade talks with Canadian
officials and businessmen.
    Asked if South Korea would retaliate against U.S. goods if
Congress closed U.S. markets to its products, he said "at this
moment, we have no thought of retaliation."
    South Korea is a major exporter to the U.S. of textiles and
apparel and electronic goods, such as television sets, video
cassette records and personal computers.
    Its purchases from the United States include electronic
testing equipment, grains and cotton.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=3931>
South Korean Trade Minister Rha
Woong Bae said his nation would maintain a trading surplus for
three to five years as a way to cut its foreign debt.
    He said in an interview with Reuters that after a few years
it was likely South Korea would drop barriers to foreign goods
and move toward a more balanced trade position.
    He said the present trade surplus was vital if his nation
was to reduce its 44.5 billion dlr foreign debt.
    Rha said that 1986 was the first year South Korea had a
trade surplus - 4.5 billion dlrs, against a 1985 deficit of 900
mln dlrs.
    Asked if South Korea would drop its trade barriers once its
foreign debt was substantially reduced, he said "yes, I think
so."
    Rha made his remarks at the end of a two-week trade mission
here during which a team he led agreed to buy U.S. products
valued at 1.8 billion dlrs.
    About 800 mln dlrs of the purchases are in goods of the
type South Korea normally bought from Japan.
    Rha was to leave later today for Ottawa for trade talks
with Canadian officials and businessmen.
    He said in the interview the U.S. purchases were to reduce
his country's 7.1 billion dlr surplus with the United States
and also to cut its 5.6 billion dlr shortfall with Japan.
    Rha said it was also due to a shift in exchange rates
between the U.S. dollar and the yen that made it cheaper to buy
U.S. goods than Japanese goods.
    He said South Korea heavily relied on foreign trade and he
hoped the leaders of major trading nations could find a way to
resolve the growing trend toward protectionist legislation.
    Rha said "I hope the leaders can get together to find a
solution by making some mutually satisfactory concessions."
    But he added "the leaders seem hesitant to make concessions
because of domestic political reasons."
    Speaking of his own country, he said "We have made a lot of
concessions already."
    He cited regulations permitting foreign investment in
industrial firms, allowing increased foreign banking activity
and cracking down on piracy of intellectual property by
strengthening protection of copyrights and patents.
    Rha said South Korea had also lowered many of its tariffs.
    Asked if South Korea would retaliate against U.S. goods if
Congress closed U.S. markets to its products, he said "at this
moment, we have no thought of retaliation."
    South Korea is a major exporter to the United States of
textiles and apparel and electronic goods, such as television
sets, video cassette records and personal computers.
    Its puchases from the United States include electronic
testing equipment and grains and cotton.
    The trade mission's purchases here included three Boeing
passenger planes for 400 mln dlrs, four McDonnell Douglas
planes for 300 mln dlrs; and machinery worth 725 mln dlrs.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4026>
House trade lawmakers took their
first votes on measures designed to toughen U.S. trade laws but
held over until tomorrow the most difficult votes on
controversial plans to protect American industries.
    Meeting in closed session, the House Ways and Means Trade
Subcommittee failed to resolve one of the most sensitive issues
in the bill--whether they will force major foreign trading
partners to severely cut their trade surpluses with the United
States.
    The subcommittee is considering a toned-down version of
Democratic-sponsored trade legislation that aims to open
foreign markets but which drops last year's effort to force
President Reagan to retaliate with quotas or tariffs.
    Congressional aides who asked not to be identified said the
lawmakers intend to wrap up their proposals tomorrow and will
consider a proposal to mandate retaliation without setting
specific trade penalties.
    The legislation faces another hurdle in the full Ways and
Means Committee next week before the full House votes on it.
    Rep. Richard Gephardt, a Missouri Democrat who is seeking
his party's 1988 presidential nomination, said he may offer an
amendment to call for reductions in the trade surpluses of
those countries with barriers to imports of U.S. goods.
    This would be a moderated version of his earlier plan to
force a mandatory ten per cent annual cut in the trade surplus
with the United States by Japan, South Korea, Taiwan, West
Germany and other countries with the largest trade imbalances.
    "My criteria for a good amendment sets a standard for
getting the trade deficit down," he told reporters.
    The trade law changes are to become part of a major
congressional and administration effort to turn around the
record U.S. trade deficit of 169 billion dlrs last year by
opening up foreign markets and making U.S. products more
competitive.
    House Speaker James Wright, a Texas Democrat, said again
today he expects the full House will approve the trade bill by
May and that Reagan will accept the final congressional bill.
    "I expect whatever is reported (by the Ways and Means
Committee) will pass. We will have a good bill and an effective
bill," he told reporters.
    The comprehensive trade bill will include work by other
committees to ease export controls on high technology, to aid
U.S. workers displaced by foreign competition, to stimulate
research and development, to remove foreign trade barriers and
to improve education and worker training.
    The lawmakers agreed that for the first time a U.S.
industry could charge foreign producers with unfair competition
if they deny basic worker rights such as collective bargaining,
safety rules and payment of a minimum wage appropriate to the
country's economic development.
    They transferred to U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter the powers now held by Reagan to decide whether to
retaliate against foreign violations of fair trade rules and
whether an injured industry deserves import relief.
    They agreed to make it easier for a company to get
temporary relief from import competition but agreed the
industry should provide a plan to become competitive.
    The administration has not announced its support but
Yeutter said yesterday, "I am cautiously optimistic," that the
Democratic-led House will come up with an acceptable bill.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4027>
Soviet first deputy prime minister
Vsevolod Murakhovsky said at the end of a brief visit here his
country wanted to boost joint business with France, but that a
reduction of France's trade deficit with the Soviet Union
depended on the French.
    Murakhovsky, who is also chairman of the State
Agro-Industrial Committee (GOSAGROPROM), told a news conference
he had discussed a variety of possible deals with French
companies Rhone-Poulenc, Pechiney and Imec.
    Declining to put figures on possible contracts he said he
had discussed plant protection and the processing of highly
sulphuric gas with Rhone-Poulenc, packaging technology for
agricultural products with Pechiney, and fruit and vegetable
juice processing with Imec.
    An official for Pechiney said an agreement of intent on
packaging could be signed soon, but could not give any other
details. The other two companies were not immediately available
for comment.
    Asked whether he foresaw a reduction this year of France's
trade shortfall, at 7.6 billion francs in the first 11 months
of 1986 against 5.1 billion for the whole of 1985, Murakhovsky
told Reuters: "It all depends on France."
    At a meeting in Paris last January French and Soviet
foreign trade ministers said they were committed to increased
efforts to reduce the deficit. Estimates at the time showed a
French 190 mln franc surplus for December 1986.
    Murakhovsky said the Soviet Union was prepared to talk with
anybody with "interesting" proposals offering latest technology
and assuring "a mutual advantage."
    He said the Soviet Union had many tasks ahead of it and
would deal rapidly with proposals it considered interesting.
    He encouraged companies to take advantage of new laws
guaranteeing "the interests of foreign partners" in joint
ventures.
    But he said no agreements had yet been finalised under the
new joint venture laws.
    He said concrete deals had not yet been finalised as a
result of a one billion dollar accord signed in Moscow last
month with French businessman Jean-Baptiste Doumeng.
    He said Doumeng's Interagra company was preparing proposals
for further examination by the Soviet Union. Doumeng last month
said the agreement was to exchange one billion dollars worth of
goods.
    Murakhovsky said the agreement was one of intent, and
designed primarily to renew and increase the Soviet Union's
food production capacity.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4031>
Britain today called on Japan to
increase foreign imports or risk the rise of protectionism and
the harm it would bring to it and other trading nations.
    British Trade and Industry Secretary Paul Channon said
Japan must heed a report issued by a Japanese government
advisory body in December calling for faster domestic demand to
help cut its trade surplus and restructure its economy.
    "I recognise that the strong yen has brought problems to
Japan's domestic economy," he told a group of Japanese
businessmen in London.
    "But these short term difficulties should not be allowed to
deflect Japan from the fundamental reforms necessary," he said.
    "It is not just a domestic issue for Japan. If import
propensity does not expand very soon there is a real risk from
protectionist lobbies, particularly in the U.S. With whom Japan
has so massive a surplus," he said.
    "They may well succeed in securing action by governments
which would be highly injurious to trading nations like Japan
and the U.K."
    Channon said there had been substantial growth in the
volume of trade between Japan and Britain, amounting to 6.2
billion sterling (9.8 billion dlrs) last year.
    But he added: "Regrettably too much of it was in one
direction, with the Japanese selling us 3.7 billion sterling
(5.8 billion dlrs) more than we sold them."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4048>
Taiwan said it would soon relax import
controls on some 400 foreign items, including stationery and
books, in a further effort to allow trading partners,
especially the U.S., Greater access to its markets.
    Taiwan announced the easing of import curbs on some 600
farm and industrial products last month, a Council for Economic
Planning and Development spokesman told Reuters.
    He said the new move was intended to balance trade between
Taiwan and its trading partners. The island's trade surplus
reached a record 15.6 billion U.S. Dlrs last year, up from
10.62 billion in 1985.
    In January, Taiwan cut import tariffs on some 1,700 foreign
products and allowed imports of U.S. Wine, beer and cigarettes.
    "We hope the measures will help reduce our trade surplus
this year, especially with that of the U.S.," the spokesman
said.
    Washington is pressing Taiwan to open its markets wider as
a way of cutting its trade deficit with the island, which rose
to 2.35 billion U.S. Dlrs in the first two months of 1987 from
1.87 billion in the year-earlier period.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4078>
The French 1986 current account balance
of payments surplus has been revised slightly upwards to 25.8
billion francs from the 25.4 billion franc figure announced
last month, the Finance Ministry said.
    This compares with a 1.5 billion deficit in 1985, and while
it is the first surplus since 1979, is substantially lower than
the 50 billion surplus forecast by the previous socialist
government before they lost office in March last year.
    Net long-term capital outflows rose sharply to 70.5 billion
francs last year from 8.8 billion in 1985, largely due to a
major program of foreign debt repayment, the ministry said.
    In the fourth quarter alone the unadjusted surplus rose to
14.1 billion francs from 6.6 billion the previous quarter, but
the adjusted surplus fell to 7.4 billion from 9.1 billion.
    Fourth quarter medium and long-term foreign debt repayments
exceeded new credits by 11 billion francs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4084>
China's trade deficit in January fell to
310 mln dlrs from 460 mln in January 1986, the China Daily
Business Weekly said.
    Quoting customs figures, the paper said exports fell to
1.75 billion dlrs from 1.84 billion and imports fell to 2.06
billion from 2.3 billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4115>
Canada had a trade surplus of 533 mln dlrs
in January compared with an upward revised 965 mln dlrs surplus
in December, Statistics Canada said.
    The December surplus originally was reported at 964 mln
dlrs. The January surplus last year was 1.19 billion dlrs.
    January exports, seasonally adjusted, were 9.72 billion
dlrs against 10.39 billion in December and 10.89 billion in
January, 1986.
    January imports were 9.19 billion dlrs against 9.43 billion
in December and 9.71 billion in January 1986.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4156>
Prime Minister Brian Mulroney said he
held "frank" discussions with the Canadian province premiers on
the pace of free trade talks with the United States, but the
longstanding issue of provincial ratification remains to be
settled.
    Speaking to reporters after nearly five hours of meetings
with the 10 premiers, Mulroney said further discussions would
be held in June and September to discuss the role of the
provinces in approving any new trade deal.
    But he maintained progress was being made in the sweeping
talks with the Unites States that got under nearly two years
ago.
    "It appears reasonable progress is being made (in the
talks)," Mulroney said.
    Alberta Premier Don Getty agreed, "Things are running pretty
quickly now."
    The talks, launched by Mulroney's Progressive Conservative
government after concerns about protectionist sentiment in the
U.S., are aimed reducing the remaining barriers between the
world's largest trading partnership.
    But the provinces are expected to play a major role in any
new trading arrangement, and some of the provincial leaders
complained of a lack of progress on reaching a ratification
formula.
    "It's my view that we should be thinking about these things
right now, along with the questions of the substance of the
agreement," commented Ontario Premier David Peterson, who has
been highly critical of the talks in the past.
    But Newfoundland Premier Brian Peckford said an agreement
was more likely to emerge by consensus and there would be no
need for a "hard and fast formula."
    Peckford said it appears Canada is prepared to make
concessions to the United States on financial services in order
to make inroads on other bargaining areas, such as agriculture.
    Canadian published reports, quoting government sources, say
the two countries are close to reaching a trade deal and it
will involve eliminating border tariffs and many non-tariff
barriers over the next 10 to 12 years.
    A rough draft of the accord is expected to be presented to
the premiers at the June meeting while the finished document is
hoped to be presented to Congress in October.
    "It's a very tight time frame," Ontario's Peterson said last
night. "But at this moment it is tough to say what will
transpire."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4158>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
has asked the White House to consider blocking the planned
Japanese acquisition of a major U.S. supercomputer and
semiconductor manufacturer for national security reasons, U.S.
officials said.
    The officials, who asked not to be named, said yesterday
that Baldrige has "serious concerns" about the sale of Fairchild
Semiconductor Corp. to Fujitsu Ltd., another major electronics
firm.
    The officials told Reuters that if the sale went through it
could leave the U.S. military overly dependent on a foreign
/ompany for vital high technology equipment used in its
advanced missiles, aircraft electronics and intelligence
gathering.
    In addition, they said, the sale would also worsen the
already strained trade relations between the U.S. and Japan
stemming from the huge Japanese surplus.
    The White House Economic Policy Council would consider the
sale in the coming weeks, they said.
    Defense Secretary Caspar Weinberger's position was not
immediately known but in the past he has opposed the transfer
of high technology to foreign governments and companies.
    Supercomputers made by Fairchild and other U.S.
manufacturers are widely used throughout the world, but none
have been sold to the Japanese government or to Japanese
government-run agencies and universities.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4172>
Taiwan will relax import controls on
more foreign goods, a government spokesman said today.
    The move was to allow greater access to Taiwan markets by
overseas trading partners, especially the United States, an
official of the Council for Economic Planning and Development
told Reuters.
    Import curbs on about 400 foreign goods, including
stationery and books, would soon be relaxed, he said.
    Taiwan announced it would ease curbs on some 600 farming
and industrial products last month.
    The official said the moves were intended to balance trade
between Taiwan and the United States and other trading
partners. Taiwan's trade surplus reached a record 15.6 billion
dlrs last year, up from 10.62 billion in 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4238>
Pakistan's trade deficit narrowed to
2.64 billion rupees (provisional) in February 1987 from 2.85
billion (final) in January and compared with 2.94 billion in
February 1986, the Federal Bureau of Statistics figures show.
    Exports fell to 5.04 billion rupees (provisional) in
February from 5.34 billion (final) in January and compared with
3.90 billion in February 1986.
    Imports fell to 7.68 billion rupees (provisional) in
February from 8.19 billion (final) in January and compared with
6.84 billion in February 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4259>
Sweden announced its promised program
of unilateral economic sanctions against South Africa and gave
firms an October deadline to cut trading links.
    Foreign Trade Minister Anita Gradin said a trade boycott of
South Africa and neighbouring Namibia would take effect from
July 1, followed by a three-month period of grace to give
companies time to wind down their operations.
    From October 1, no direct trade would be allowed in either
direction, with certain exceptions covering medical supplies
and printed matter, Gradin told a news conference.
    She said exceptions would also be granted in cases where a
Swedish trade boycott would benefit South African firms and
disadvantage South Africa's black-ruled neighbours, the
front-line states.
    Gradin cautioned that legislation upon which the boycott
would be based was not impossible to get round. She said a
parliamentary committee would investigate ways of closing some
of the bigger loopholes, including indirect trade with South
Africa via Swedish subsidiaries in third countries.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4513>
Federal Reserve Board Chairman Paul
Volcker said current data does not give a clear sign that the
deterioration in the U.S. trade balance has yet been reversed.
    "The data we have in hand do not provide clearcut evidence
that the deterioration in the trade balance has yet been
reversed," Volcker said in remarks prepared for delivery to a
luncheon for community leaders here.
    However, Volcker said there are encouraging signs,
particularly the rising volume of exports over the past year,
achieved despite relatively slow growth abroad.
    Volcker warned it is not sustainable from an economic
perspective to pile up foreign debt while failing to make the
investment needed to generate growth and earn the money to
service the debt.
    He said the process of restoring external balance to the
U.S. economy requires dealing with the budget deficit. He said
needed economic adjustment will require a relative shift of
financial and real resources into internationally competitive
industry. "More of our growth will need to be reflected in net
exports and business investment and less in consumption,"
Volcker said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4552>
The House Ways and Means Trade 
Subcommittee unanimously approved a toned-down version of
legislation designed to toughen U.S. trade laws and wedge open
foreign markets to more U.S. goods.
    The measure now goes to the full House Ways and Means
Committee next week, but major changes are not expected,
congressional sources said.
    "This product could very well be toughening our trade policy
and doing it in a manner that opens markets without this
frightening word 'protectionism'," Ways and Means chairman Dan
Rostenkowski, an Illinois Democrat said.
    The trade subcommittee backed away from mandating specific
retaliation against foreign countries for unfair foreign trade
practices as the House had approved in a trade bill last year.
    But it held over for the full Ways and Means Committee
debate on a controversial plan by Rep. Richard Gephardt to
mandate a reduction in trade surpluses with the U.S. by
countries such as Japan, South Korea and Taiwan.
    Gephardt, a Missouri Democrat, has not decided the exact
form of his amendment, an aide said. Last year the House
approved his idea to force an annual ten pct trade surplus cut
by those countries. 
    The trade bill will be wrapped in with legislation from
other committees dealing with relaxation of export controls,
incentives for research, expanded worker training and education
and other efforts to increase U.S. competitiveness.
    The comprehensive trade bill is to be considered by the
full House in late April and then will be considered by Senate
committees.
    It requires President Reagan to retaliate against foreign
unfair trade practices but do not mandate quotas or tariffs and
allow an exemption if U.S. economic security would be harmed by
U.S. actions against other countries.
    The bill would make it easier for U.S. industries to win
relief from surges of imports of competitive products.
    It extends until January 1993, the administration's
authority to negotiate trade agreements as part of the new
round of multilateral talks under the General Agreements on
Tariffs and Trade.
    And, it includes provisions to tighten trade rules on
copyrights, patents and telecommunications goods.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4595>
The U.S. House Ways and Means Trade
Subcommittee unanimously approved a toned-down version of
legislation designed to toughen U.S. trade laws and wedge open
foreign markets to more U.S. goods.
    The measure now goes to the full House Ways and Means
Committee next week, but major changes are not expected,
congressional sources said.
    "This product could very well be toughening our trade policy
and doing it in a manner that opens markets without this
frightening word 'protectionism'," Ways and Means chairman Dan
Rostenkowski, an Illinois Democrat said.
    The trade subcommittee backed away from mandating specific
retaliation against foreign countries for unfair foreign trade
practices as the House had approved in a trade bill last year.
    But it held over for the full Ways and Means Committee
debate on a controversial plan by Rep. Richard Gephardt to
mandate a reduction in trade surpluses with the U.S. by
countries such as Japan, South Korea and Taiwan.
    Gephardt, a Missouri Democrat, has not decided the exact
form of his amendment, an aide said. Last year the House
approved his idea to force an annual 10 pct trade surplus cut
by those countries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4629>
Australia's terms of trade fell by a
further 3.5 pct in the fourth quarter of 1986 after declining
0.8 pct in the third quarter and 2.7 pct a year earlier, the
Statistics Bureau said.
    It said the seasonally adjusted current account deficit of
3.22 billion dlrs in the quarter would have dropped to 912 mln
if not for the terms of trade decline.
    The fourth quarter decline followed a 1.1 pct fall in
export prices and a 2.4 pct rise in import prices, it said.
    The Bureau noted Australia's terms of trade had fallen by
19.9 pct since the fourth quarter of 1983.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4632>
Japan denied breaking a pact with the
U.S. On semiconductor trade but said prices set out in the pact
were too high and acknowledged difficulties in implementing the
accord.
    "We are faithfully abiding by the ... Agreement but of
course there are some problems," a spokesman for the
International Trade and Industry Ministry told Reuters.
    He said the high semiconductor prices recommended by the
agreement were leaving Japanese manufacturers piling up stocks
of unsellable products. "We are aiming to reduce production in
Japan but of course this takes time," he said.
    The spokesman said some Japanese companies were selling
chips in Europe and Asia below stipulated prices, but added: "It
is only a matter of time before we solve this problem."
    The eight month old pact aims to stop Japan selling large
quantities of chips at knock-down prices to the United States
and other countries and to increase U.S. Semiconductor sales in
Japan.
    The U.S. Senate Finance Committee this week called on
President Reagan in a non-binding resolution to retaliate
against Japan for violating the agreement.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4638>
Switzerland had a trade deficit of 629.7
mln Swiss francs in February compared with a revised 209.4 mln
deficit in January and 723.2 mln shortfall in February 1986,
the Federal Customs Office said.
    February imports were 6.00 billion francs against exports
of 5.37 billion.
    Imports rose in real terms by 5.1 pct against February 1986
while exports rose by a real 4.6 pct, the office said.
    But a further improvement in the terms of trade left the
deficit smaller than last year.
    Last February's figure had also been hit by the import of
two passenger aircraft.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4654>
The short-term effect of foreign exchange
rate movements in correcting international trade imbalances
appears to be waning, and long-term efforts are required to cut
Japan's chronic dependence on external demand, the Bank of
Japan said in a monthly report.
    Japan's trade surplus in nominal terms is likely to remain
high in the near future, the central bank said.
    Fundamental adjustments will be needed as long as Japan
hopes to benefit from a better international allocation of
resources and maintain the free trade system, it added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4717>
The short-term effect of foreign exchange
rate movements in correcting international trade imbalances
appears to be waning, and long-term efforts are required to cut
Japan's chronic dependence on external demand, the Bank of
Japan said in a monthly report.
    Japan's trade surplus in nominal terms is likely to remain
high in the near future, the central bank said.
    Fundamental adjustments will be needed as long as Japan
hopes to benefit from a better international allocation of
resources and maintain the free trade system, it added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4835>
Soviet-West German trade is expected
to develop favourably due to Moscow's increasing openness to
East-West economic relations, Dresdner Bank AG's Moscow
representative Michael Stein said.
    He told a bank presentation the Soviet Union was last year
hit by the fall in world oil prices, which cut export revenue
from oil-related products and natural gas, and its overseas
buying power was also adversely affected by the lower dollar.
   Dresdner Bank economist Alfred Apholte said the Soviet
Union's large currency and gold reserves had softened the
impact of the dollar weakening and oil price drop.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4903>
White House spokesman Marlin
Fitzwater said the administration had some disagreements with
the trade bill that cleared a House subcommittee yesterday but
generally felt good about the bill.
    "Generally we feel very good about the bipartisan
consideration of the trade legislation. I think we are
progressing very well," he told reporters.
    "There are wide areas of agreement. There are some areas of
disagreement," he said.                 
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=4987>
The Netherlands recorded a flat trade
balance in January, with both exports and imports totaling 14.2
billion guilders, a modestly lower compared with December but
sharply down from January last year, an Economics Ministry
spokesman said, quoting official statistics.
    January 1986 exports compared with a December figure of
15.0 billion guilders and were 25 pct below last year's level
of 18.9 billion.
    January 1986 imports compared with 15.3 billion guilders in
December and fell 18 pct from 17.4 billion in January last
year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5057>
The House Ways and Means Committee
is moving toward passage of a trade bill that sponsors said was
intended to help open foreign markets to U.S. agricultural
goods and to modify some U.S. agricultural trade laws.
    The trade subcommittee voted to require President Reagan to
take into account the potential harm to U.S. agricultural
exports of any trade retaliation he might impose for foreign
unfair trade practices against other domestic industries.
    The bill would allow U.S. agricultural producers to seek
government monitoring of imports if there is a reasonable
chance the industry would be harmed by an import surge.
    The full Ways and Means Committee is to consider the bill
next week and congressional sources said they expect it will be
approved.
     In investigations involving a processed agricultural
product, trade associations of processors or producers would
have to petition for relief from foreign dumping or unfair
duties.
     The bill sets out U.S. trade negotiating objectives for
the Uruguay round of talks under the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade. It would seek fair trade in agriculture,
seek to discipline restrictive or trade distorting import and
export practices, to eliminate tariffs, subsidies, quotas and
non-tariff barriers.
     President Reagan's authority to negotiate a new GATT
agreement would be extended through January 1993 and authority
to negotiate a free trade zone with Canada would be extended
through January 3, 1991.
    The bill extends Reagan's authority to negotiate an
international coffee agreement through October 31, 1989.
    It allows a refund of import duties paid on raw sugar
imported from November 1, 1977 to March 31, 1985 for production
of sugar or products containing sugar and destined for
re-export. The export of the sugar or products must occur
before Octoer 1, 1991.
    Presently, to qualify for the refund the sugar must be
processed within three years after import and exported within
five years.
    Agriculture would also benefit from more rapid decisions in
complaints of unfair foreign trade practices or injury from
imports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5146>
Sweden's trade surplus rose to 3.6
billion crowns in February from 1.5 billion in January and 3.48
billion in February 1986, the Central Bureau of Statistics
said.
    The trade surplus for the first two months of the year rose
to 5.1 billion crowns from 4.9 billion in the corresponding
period of 1986.
    The report said February imports stood at 20.1 billion
crowns while exports were 23.7 billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5160>
U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm
Baldrige predicted Congress will pass a reasonable trade bill
this year and said tough protectionist legislation could prompt
a trade war.
    "The mood of the Congress right now is as tough on trade as
I've ever seen it in six years in Washington," Baldrige said in
a television interview.
    "I think we'll still be able to get a reasonable trade bill
out in spite of that because the whole Congress is trying to
work together with the administration, but there is a hardening
trade attitude," he said.
    President Reagan opposes protectionist legislation, but
agreed to support a trade bill when it became apparent that
opposition Democrats would pass such legislation.
    However, Baldrige warned measures that would penalise
trading partners such as Japan, South Korea and Taiwan for
failing to cut their trade surpluses with the U.S. Could lead
to retaliation and he said he would urge Reagan to veto any
such bill.
    When asked if there is a rising danger of a worldwide trade
war, Baldrige said: "Yes, I don't think there's any question
about that."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5169>
Tense trade relations with the U.S.
And Japan and concern about the foreign impact of a proposed
European Community (EC) tax on edible oils and fats are
expected to dominate talks by EC foreign ministers here
tomorrow.
    EC diplomats said Britain demanded the early debate on the
EC Executive Commission's proposal to impose a hefty tax on
domestic and imported oils and fats in an attempt to head off a
proposal it sees as extremely damaging to EC foreign relations.
    The proposal was the most controversial part of a reform
package, due to be discussed by EC farm ministers later this
month, of the EC's Common Agricultural Policy -- widely seen as
the root cause of the EC's persistent financial problems and of
tensions with major trading partners.
    The proposal is described by its promoters as a
stabilisation program which would penalise a new sector going
into massive overproduction and complement proposals to cut
cereals and dairy production, rather than a straight forward
tax.
    They say it would not only curb the growth of oils and fats
production and prevent imports from filling any vaccum left by
a fall in EC output, but would also save the EC some two
billion European Currency Units, over two billion dlrs, in farm
costs.
    It has provoked strong protests from domestic producers as
well as foreign exporters, led by the United States.
    The diplomats said the protests had been received from most
corners of the developing and developed world, ranging from
Senegal, Malaysia and Indonesia, to Brazil, Argentina, Canada,
Iceland and Norway.
    The proposal had little chance of approval by EC
governments, with West Germany as strongly opposed to it as
Britain, and Denmark, the Netherlands and Portugal also
unconvinced of its political or economic wisdom.
    Even Mediterranean countries such as Italy, France and
Greece, which backed similar proposals in the past, did not
seem as enthusiastic now because olive oil had been added to
the list of products affected.
    But the diplomats said a protectionist lobby in the U.S.
And elsewhere was using the proposal as an excuse to promote
anti-EC action, and the foreign ministers' debate should
demonstrate the strength of feeling against the proposal within
the EC and deprive its oponents of this argument.
    The ministers were also due to discuss proposals in the
U.S. Congress for a range of protecionist legislation such as a
bill that would curb EC textile exports.
    The diplomats said the ministers were expected to strongly
back a Commission warning to Washington that such a bill, if
enacted, would provoke swift EC retaliation.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5189>
Australia's current account deficit for
February is expected to narrow to a range of between 700 mln
and one billion dlrs, from the unrevised January level of 1.29
billion, market economists polled by Reuters said.
    Statistics Bureau February figures are out tomorrow.
    The economists said a key element in the narrowing would be
a reversal of the drop in exports which took place in January,
after a sharp rise in December when the deficit was only 598
mln dlrs.
    As an example they quoted wheat export volume, which rose
about 30 pct in February after dropping as much in January.
    A lack of aircraft imports in February should also
contribute on the trade account although it is still likely to
remain in deficit, the economists said.
    Other positive influences on the current account balance
should be a decline in the invisibles deficit following a
seasonal fall in interest payments and the dropping out of
certain official aid payments, they said.
    They said the Australian dollar, which last week touched an
eight-month high of 0.6900 U.S. Dlrs but is now around the
0.6800 level, should not react adversely to the figures unless
the current account shortfall tops one billion dlrs.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5220>
China's trade deficit totalled 700 mln
dlrs in the first two months of this year, according to figures
released by the State Statistics Bureau.
    The New China News Agency quoted the Bureau as saying
foreign trade totalled 9.3 billion dlrs in the period, of which
exports were worth 4.3 billion dlrs.
    The bureau said total trade volume was up 2.5 pct on the
same 1986 period, with exports up 18.1 pct, but it gave no
other comparative figures.
    China's 1986 trade deficit totalled 12 billion dlrs,
official figures show.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5236>
Norway's trade deficit widened in February
to 957 mln crowns from 80 mln crowns in January and 492 mln
crowns in February last year, the Central Bureau of Statistics
said.
    Exports dropped to 10.66 billion crowns last month,
compared with 11.11 billion in January and 10.85 billion in
February 1986, it added.
    Crude oil and natural gas exports totalled 4.56 billion
crowns in February, against 5.10 billion in January and 5.36
billion a year ago.
  REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5274>
Turkey's trade deficit rose to 3.65
billion dlrs in 1986 from 3.39 billion in 1985 following
increased imports from Western countries, figures from the
State Statistics Institute show.
    Exports were down 6.3 pct at 7.45 billion dlrs, compared
with 7.95 billion in 1985, while imports were down 2.1 pct at
11.10 billion dlrs from 11.34 billion.
    Total trade with Mid-East Gulf states fell some 40 pct due
to lower oil prices, with imports at 1.55 billion dlrs,
compared with 2.74 billion, and exports at 1.65 billion after
2.72 billion.
    Exports to Organisation for Economic Cooperation and
Development countries rose to 4.29 billion dlrs from 4.11
billion in 1985, while imports were 4.56 billion after 3.55
billion.
    Turkey's trade deficit in December narrowed to 216 mln dlrs
from 340 mln in November, and compared with 277 mln in December
1985.
    
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5278>
Egypt and the Soviet Union are expected
to sign an agreement in Moscow next week settling Cairo's three
billion dlr military debt, Egyptian officials said.
    One official, who asked to remain anonymous, told Reuters a
draft agreement would reduce to zero from two pct future
interest payable on the 10 year-old debt, and set a 25 year
repayment term.
    Talks are due to begin in Moscow on Wednesday.
    Economy Minister Youssri Mustapha, who leaves for Moscow on
Tuesday, met President Hosni Mubarak and Egyptian ambassador to
Moscow Salah Bassiouni to discuss the issue.
    One official said Egypt would propose a new exchange rate
for trade with the Soviet Union. Current commerce is based on a
rate set in the 1960s of 0.38 Egyptian pounds to the dollar
which Moscow sees as unreasonable. The fluctuating official
rate is about 1.36 pounds to the dollar.
    The officials said part of the debt would be paid in
exports of goods such as textiles, leather and furniture.
    Egypt wants to settle the debt problem partly to open the
door for new cooperation, mainly in modernising Soviet-built
steel, aluminium and fertiliser plants under a five-year
development plan ending June 30 1992.
    Egypt, which already imports Soviet coal, wood, newsprint
and glass, also wanted a debt deal to allow purchases of
currently blocked spare parts for its ageing Soviet military
hardware, the officials said.
    An estimated 65 pct of Egypt's arsenal is still made up of
Soviet-supplied equipment, one official said.
    Cairo stopped repaying Moscow for arms purchases in 1977
when then-president Anwar Sadat broke with its long-standing
ally and turned to the U.S..
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5280>
The United States wants Taiwan's
currency to appreciate faster to reduce Taiwan's trade surplus
with the U.S., A senior trade official said.
    Board of Foreign Trade director Vincent Siew told reporters
on Saturday U.S. Officials told him in Washington last week
that unless Taiwan allowed its dollar to rise faster it would
face retaliation.
    Siew returned from Washington on Friday after the U.S
responded to Taiwan's request to increase its textile export
quotas by promising further talks in May. Taiwan's surplus with
the U.S. Hit a record 13.6 billion U.S. Dlrs in 1986.
    Washington signed a three-year accord with Taipei last year
limiting textile export growth to 0.5 pct a year.
    Siew said the Taiwan dollar had risen by about 15 pct
against the U.S. Dollar since September 1985.
    It surged last week amid indications Washington was seeking
a major rise in its value. It rose four cents against the U.S.
Dollar on Saturday to close at 34.59.
    Western trade sources told Reuters Taiwan and the U.S. Have
been holding talks on the currency issue but added it is not
clear how far Washington wants to see the Taiwan dollar rise.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5285>
Britain and West Germany told their
European Community partners they would strongly oppose major
elements of proposals to rid the EC of its farm surpluses.
    At a meeting of EC foreign ministers, Britain called for a
full debate on a proposed tax on edible oils and fats that has
already angered EC consumer groups and unleashed Washington-led
protests from exporters to the EC, diplomats said.
    West Germany, also opposed to the oils and fats tax, will
advise the meeting formally later today it cannot countenance
other proposals that could hit German farmers, they added.
    They said West Germany's objections were put in a letter
this weekend from Chancellor Helmut Kohl to Jacques Delors, the
president of the EC's Executive Commission which had put
forward the proposals last month in a bid to avoid a new EC
cash crisis.
    Kohl reiterated German objections to proposed cereals
production curbs but reserved his harshest criticism for a
proposed dismantling of Monetary Compensatory Amounts (MCAs) -
a system of cross-border subsidies and taxes which level out
foreign exchange fluctuations for farm exports.
    Kohl made clear the dismantling would mainly hit German
farmers who, without MCAs, would find it much more difficult to
export to weaker currency states, which means virtually all
other 11 EC states, diplomats said.
    Britain initiated the discussion on the proposal to impose
a hefty tax on domestic and imported oils and fats because it
could seriously damage EC trade relations.
    The diplomats said the United States had been the most
outspoken among foreign critics of the proposal, describing it
as a breach of the EC's obligations under the world trade body
GATT.
    But protests had also come from other exporters to the EC,
such as Senegal, Malaysia, Indonesia, Brazil, Argentina,
Iceland and Norway, they added.
    Britain has often lined up against West Germany on the farm
reform issue in the past but is keen to avoid measures that
could spark a damaging trade war with the U.S.
    Foreign ministers were unlikely to take a decision on
either the oils and fats tax or the MCA proposals today,
diplomats said. But their discussion should make clear that
neither has a chance of surviving when it comes up for
substantive consideration by EC farm ministers later this
month, they added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5288>
U.S. Commerce Secretary Malcolm
Baldrige predicted Congress will pass a reasonable trade bill
this year and said tough protectionist legislation could prompt
a trade war.
    "The mood of the Congress right now is as tough on trade as
I've ever seen it in six years in Washington," Baldrige said in
a weekend television interview.
    "I think we'll still be able to get a reasonable trade bill
out in spite of that because the whole Congress is trying to
work together with the administration, but there is a hardening
trade attitude," he said.
    President Reagan opposes protectionist legislation but
agreed to support a trade bill when it became apparent that
opposition Democrats would pass such legislation.
    However, Baldrige warned measures that would penalize
trading partners such as Japan, South Korea and Taiwan for
failing to cut their trade surpluses with the U.S. could lead
to retaliation and he said he would urge Reagan to veto any
such bill.
    When asked if there is a rising danger of a worldwide trade
war, Baldrige said: "Yes, I don't think there's any question
about that."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5371>
West German exports to the United
States fell below four billion marks worth in January for the
first time since mid-1984, provisional Bundesbank data showed.
    The figures showed exports were 3.85 billion marks in
January, sharply down from December's 4.40 billion and the
lowest since the 3.56 billion exported to the U.S. In July
1984. This compared with 4.86 billion marks in January 1986.
    Total West German exports to Western industrialised
countries also fell in January to 34.76 billion marks from
December's 36.45 billion, also posting the lowest monthly total
since July 1984.
    West German exports to the European Community were 21.60
billion marks in January, down from 22.14 billion in December
and 22.94 billion in January last year, the figures showed.
    Exports to developing nations and centrally-planned
economies also slackened.
    Separately, Commerzbank AG said in a report that the focus
of West German exports this year was likely to shift to Europe
because of an expected downturn in growth in the dollar area.
    This was one of the strengths of West German exports
compared with Japan, which depended in large part on the U.S.,
OPEC and developing country markets, it added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5376>
U.S. lawmakers are gearing up for a
showdown between protectionists and free traders as a major
trade bill winds its way through committees to a vote by the
full House of Representatives in late April.
    In a move to toughen U.S. enforcement of trade laws, a key
House subcommittee last week approved a toned down version of
legislation to require President Reagan to retaliate against
foreign countries that follow unfair trade practices.
    This bill will be the cornerstone of congressional efforts
to restore competitiveness of American industries and turn
around last year's record 169 billion dlrs trade deficit.
    Several lawmakers have argued the new trade bill made too
many concessions to Reagan and said they intend to back
amendments to "get tough" with countries that violate trade
agreements or keep out U.S. products.
     On the other hand, congressmen known for their allegiance
to free trade, said the bill ties Reagan's hands too much in
trade disputes and they will seek to restore his negotiating
powers.
    Republican Bill Frenzel of Michigan said the subcommittee's
bill was not one "that a free trader like me could endorse in
all respects," but he emphasized there was a consensus among
trade lawmakers to work toward a bill Reagan and Republicans
would ultimately endorse.
    Frenzel said the goal of trade legislation was, "to make our
trade policy stronger without violating our international trade
agreements. You'll find a lot of people who think we have not
done the former enough. You'll find poeple who think we haven't
avoided violating agreements."
    In a key concession made at the urging of the powerful
chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, the trade
subcommittee backed off a requirement that would have forced
Reagan to automatically impose quotas or tariffs on imports
from countries that engage in unfair trade practices.
    It also agreed he may waive any retaliation if it would
hurt the U.S. economy.
    Ways and Means chairman Dan Rostenkowski, an Illinois
Democrat, insisted the more moderate approach was necessary if
the House wanted to pass a bill Reagan would sign into law.
    Reagan last year had blocked Senate consideration of a
tough House trade bill he branded as protectionist and this
year only reluctantly agreed to support a trade bill when he
saw Democratic leaders were determined to pass a bill.
    As an indication of his success, White House spokesman
Marlin Fitzwater told reporters Friday the administration still
did not like some provisions. But he added, "Generally we feel
very good about the bipartisan consideration of the trade
legislation. I think we are progressing very well."
    The first battle will take place next week when the full
House Ways and Means Committee considers an amendment by Rep.
Richard Gephardt, a Missouri Democrat, to force countries such
as Japan, South Korea and Taiwan to cut their trade surpluses
with the United States.
    The subcommittee limited the Gephardt plan to provide only
that the existence of a large trade surplus with the United
States will trigger an investigation of unfair trade practices,
but would not automatically set off retaliation.
    Rep. Phil Crane, an Illinois Republican and staunch free
trader, said he will try to further weaken the Gephardt plan.
    Organized labor has pressed lawmakers for more relief from
imports where jobs have been lost to foreign competition.
AFL-CIO president Lane Kirkland this year angered the
administration in a statement that any trade bill Reagan would
sign would not be worth passage in Congress.
    But Rostenkowski set the tone of the trade debate in a
statement, "I'm not trying to write legislation to please Lane
Kirkland. I'm trying to write legislation that will be signed
by the president."
    In writing the bill, the subcommittee rejected calls for
trade relief for specific industries such as textiles.
    Rep. Ed Jenkins, a Democrat from Georgia, agreed to hold
off his fight. He intends to push separately a bill to protect
the domestic textile and shoe industry, an aide said. Reagan
vetoed a similar measure last year.
    House Speaker Jim Wright, a Texas Democrat, is one of the
most influential proponents of aid for specific industries
beset by low priced foreign competition.
    Wright Thursday renewed his call for import relief for the
domestic oil industry and announced his support for a Senate
plan to trigger a temporary oil import tariff when imports
reach half of domestic consumption.
    For the most part, the trade bill's provisions toughen U.S.
enforcement of trade laws. The bill forces the administration
to act rapidly on complaints of unfair trade practices such as
dumping products in the United States at prices below the cost
of production.
    It also forces the administration to act rapidly when an
industry complains that a surge in imports threatens its
existence. Congressmen said the change would have required the
U.S. International Trade Commission to impose limits on car
imports in 1981.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5458>
Brazilian Finance Minister
Dilson Funaro said his country's foreign debt crisis could only
be solved by changes in the international financial system.
    Speaking to a business conference he said "It is not Brazil
that has to make adjustments with the IMF (International
Monetary Fund). It is the international financial community
that is taking away resources from the developing countries."
    "The crisis is not in Brazil, a country that has had the
third biggest trade surplus ...In the past two years Brazil had
remitted 24 billion dlrs in debt servicing and received only
two billion in fresh funds," he added.
    Funaro said that during his recent trip to the U.S., Europe
and Japan to explain Brazil's decision last month to suspend
interest payments on 68 billion dlrs of commercial debt, he
stressed the country's commitment to growth.
    "We need to and will make the effort (to solve the debt
problem) but we cannot make an effort that means we stop
growing," he said, adding that political and not purely
commercial solutions were needed to the debt crisis.
    Brazil, whose 108 billion dlr foreign debt is the largest
in the developing world, has been under pressure from official
and private creditors to work out an economic adjustment
program with the IMF to combat rocketing inflation and foreign
payments problems.
    President Jose Sarney's government has repeatedly refused
to approach the Fund, arguing that an IMF programme would lead
to recession. Funaro said that in his talks with creditors he
had tried to restore credibility in the country in the hope of
finding a lasting solution to the debt problem.
    "We are negotiating so that the debt question should not be
one of continuous crisis."
    To sustain internal growth Brazil would have to import more
machinery and equipment this year and export fewer raw
materials. The country was thus targetting a fall in this
year's trade surplus to 8.0 billion dlrs from 1986's 9.5
billion.
    Domestically, Funaro said economies had led to a reduction
in the public sector deficit to 2.7 pct of gross domestic
product in 1986, the lowest for many years and that this should
fall to 1.5 pct this year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5507>
Prime Minister Brian Mulroney said
"significant progress" was being made in trade talks with the
United States and a profile of a major deal was emerging.
    Opening a debate on free trade in the House of Commons,
Mulroney said an accord would create thousands of jobs in
Canada and bring greater economic prosperity to both countries.
    Mulroney, who offered few new details of the talks, said
that while the negotiations were risky and difficult, "a
profile of a major trade deal is now emerging."
  In a 50-minute address, Mulroney made an often passionate
defense of the initiative that he said would give poorer areas
of the country a major economic boost.
    "Because of our trading patterns over a period of decades,
we are in the process of building two Canadas -- one that is
rich and promising, one that is under-developed and
under-employed," said Mulroney.
    "What we want is to make sure Newfoundlanders and British
Columbians and Albertans and others, that they get their
chance. They must be given the opportunity to trade their way
to prosperity."
    Few detials have been released on the trade talks which
were launched nearly two years ago between the two nations that
are each others most important trading partners.
    Recent published reports in Canada, quoting senior trade
sources, said the countries were close to reaching a trade deal
and it will involve eliminating border trariffs and many
non-tariff barriers over the next 10 to 12 years.
    It has been reported a key stumbling block in the talks is
a Canadian proposal to find a new way to settle trade disputes,
something that would give Canada protection from Washington's
tough trade remedy laws.
    But Mulroney, sharply critical of protectionist sentiment
in the U.S, said Canada was a "fair trader" and denied the
government was pursuing the deal to win unfair access to the
American market.
    He said a trade deal must bring benefits to both sides.
    "We recognize a good deal must be a fair deal, one that is
fair to both sides," Mulroney said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5508>
France posted a seasonally adjusted trade
deficit of 400 mln francs in February after a 2.5 billion franc
deficit in January, the Finance Ministry said.
    For the first two months of this year the trade deficit, on
a seasonally adjusted basis, was 2.9 billion francs.
    Unadjusted, the February deficit was 2.4 billion francs and
the two-month cumulative deficit 8.1 billion, the ministry said
in a statement.
    The Ministry said February exports totalled 73.8 billion
francs, an 8.9 pct increase on January, while imports totalled
74.3 billion francs, an increase of 5.8 pct.
    Farm and food trade showed a two billion franc surplus
after a surplus of 2.4 billion in January.
    The energy deficit was reduced to 6.5 billion francs from
eight billion in January, while industrial trade showed a
surplus of 1.4 billion francs against only 800 mln francs in
January.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5542>
Norway's parliament has approved an
extensive trade ban against South Africa but left shipowners a
key loophole through which controversial oil shipments on
Norwegian tankers may continue, government officials said.
    The unilateral boycott, proposed by Norway's minority
Labour government, gives domestic companies until late
September to cut remaining trade ties with South Africa and
Namibia.
    "The legislation discussed today must not be seen as an
isolated measure, but as a step in an international process,"
Norway's foreign minister Thorvald Stoltenberg told parliament.
    Government officials said they hope the move will intensify
international pressure against the Pretoria regime's apartheid
policies. Sweden, in a similar move last week, promised to halt
all trade with South Africa by October.
    Norway's boycott, although forbidding crude oil shipments
to South Africa on Norwegian-owned tankers, makes an important
exception for ships whose final destination is decided while
they are at sea.
    Oil cargoes are often resold by trades after loading,
making it difficult for shipowners to know their ships' final
port at the start of a voyage.
    Critics said the bill leaves the door open for continued
oil shipments to South Africa. They called for stricter
sanctions to stop all Norwegian shipping to South Africa.
    Norwegian tankers supplied South Africa with about 30 pct
of its crude imports during the early 1980s, but the trade has
dropped sharply to just one cargo in the last three months,
trade ministry officials said.
    The latest trade figures show Norwegian imports from South
Africa dropped 36 pct to 160 mln crowns during the first eight
months of 1986, while exports plunged 52 pct to 265 mln crowns
from the year-ago figure.
    "Many would say that the law has already had its effect
because of the dramatic drop in trade between South African and
Norway," Foreign Ministry spokesman Per Paust told Reuters.
    "Norwegian business at an early stage started restructuring
its relations with South Africa in anticipation of the law.
    "No one has said the boycott will have a profound effect on
international trade with South Africa, but it is an important
political statement by the Norwegian government," he said.
    The Oslo government said it will review the effects of the
ban on Norwegian industry after two years and may propose
amendments if industry can show it is hurt by the law.
    Norwegian imports from South Africa are limited mainly to
high-grade manganese and coppernickle ores used in it
ferro-alloys and light metals industries.
    Metals manufacturers estimate some 2,000 jobs could be
affected by the boycott is suitable replacements for these ores
are not found.
    The legislation now goes on to the upper house for formal
ratification later this week, parliamentarians said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5561>
U.S. lawmakers are gearing up for a
showdown between protectionists and free traders as a major
trade bill winds its way through committees to a vote by the
full House of Representatives in late April.
    In a move to toughen U.S. enforcement of trade laws, a key
House subcommittee last week approved a toned-down version of
legislation to require President Reagan to retaliate against
foreign countries that follow unfair trade practices.
    The bill will be the cornerstone of congressional efforts
to restore competitiveness of American industries and turn
around last year's record 169 billion dlrs trade deficit.
    Generally, the bill's provisions toughen U.S. enforcement
of trade laws.
    The trade bill forces the administration to act rapidly on
complaints of unfair trade practices, such as dumping products
in the United States at prices below cost of production. It
also forces the administration to act rapidly when an industry
complains that a surge in imports threatens its existence.
    In writing the bill, the subcommittee rejected calls for
trade relief for specific industries such as textiles.
    Several lawmakers have argued the new trade bill made too
many concessions to Reagan and said they intend to back
amendments to "get tough" with countries that violate trade
agreements or keep out U.S. products.
    But congressmen known for their allegiance to free trade
said the bill ties Reagan's hands too much in trade disputes
and they will seek to restore his negotiating powers.
    Bill Frenzel, R-MI., said the subcommittee's bill was not
one "that a free trader like me could endorse in all respects,"
but he emphasized there was a consensus among lawmakers to work
toward a bill Reagan and Republicans would ultimately endorse.
    The goal of trade legislation was "to make our trade policy
stronger without violating our international trade agreements,"
he said.
    In a key concession made at the urging of Ways and Means
Committee chairman Dan Rostenkowski, D-IL., the trade
subcommittee backed off a requirement that would have forced
Reagan to impose automatically quotas or tariffs on imports
from countries that engage in unfair trade practices.
    It also agreed the president may waive any retaliation if
it would hurt the U.S. economy.
    Rostenkowski insisted the more moderate approach was
necessary if the House wanted to pass a bill Reagan would sign
into law.
    Reagan last year blocked Senate consideration of a tough
House trade bill he branded as protectionist and this year he
only reluctantly agreed to support a trade bill when he saw
Democratic leaders were determined to pass such legislation.
    White House spokesman Marlin Fitzwater told reporters late
last week that the administration still did not like some of
the bill's provisions, but he added, "Generally we feel very
good about the bipartisan consideration of the trade
legislation. I think we are progressing very well."
    The first battle will take place next week when the full
House Ways and Means Committee considers an amendment by Rep.
Richard Gephardt, D-MO., to force countries like Japan, South
Korea and Taiwan to cut their trade surpluses with the U.S.
    The subcommittee limited the Gephardt plan to provide only
that the existence of a large trade surplus with the United
States will trigger an investigation of unfair trade practices,
but would not automatically set off retaliation.
    Organized labor has pressed lawmakers for more relief from
imports where jobs have been lost to foreign competition.
    AFL-CIO president Lane Kirkland this year angered the
administration when he said any trade bill Reagan would sign
would not be worth passage in Congress.
    But Rostenkowski set the tone of the trade debate by
saying, "I'm not trying to write legislation to please Lane
Kirkland. I'm trying to write legislation that will be signed
by the president."
    Rep. Ed Jenkins (D-GA.) intends to push separately a bill
to protect the domestic textile and shoe industry, an aide
said. Reagan vetoed a similar measure last year.
    House Speaker Jim Wright of Texas, one of the most
influential proponents of aid for specific industries beset by
low-priced foreign competition, last week renewed his call for
import relief for the domestic oil industry and announced his
support for a Senate plan to trigger a temporary oil import
tariff when imports reach half of domestic consumption.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5570>
Africa may have to follow Brazil in
halting foreign debt payments unless industrialised nations are
prepared to be more flexible in trade and economic policy,
Ethiopian trade minister Tesfay Dinka said.
    Growing protectionism and declining commodity prices had
caused a major deterioration in the export earnings of all
developing countries, he said in an opening speech to a meeting
of African trade ministers in Addis Ababa.
    Unless there was an early improvement in developing
countries' terms of trade "the only choice is to follow the
route that Brazil appears to have taken," Tesfay said.
   The two-day meeting of delegates from 50 African states was
called to work out a consensus ahead of the Group of 77
ministerial meeting in Havana next month, when the developing
countries will debate their strategy in economic negotiations
with the West.
    Tesfay accused the West of intransigence in the negotiation
of recent commodity agreements.
    The failure of the International Coffee Organisation to
agree on the reintroduction of export quotas would mean "several
African countries will not have the foreign exchange to import
essential items," he said.
    Coffee accounts for 60 pct of Ethiopian exports and the
recent fall in world coffee prices has sharply reduced the
country's foreign exchange earnings.
    Adebayo Adedeji, the executive secretary of the U.N.
Economic Commission for Africa, told the meeting that there was
an increasing net outflow of resources from Africa.
    He blamed this on high interest rates, debt servicing and
the repatriation of profits by foreign investors.
    Africa paid 13 billion dlrs to service its total foreign
debt last year and by 1990 annual service payments are expected
to rise to between 16 and 24 billion, Adedeji said.
    He accused industrialised countries of failing to provide
more resources to implement the U.N. Program for Africa's
economic recovery and development, despite Africa's willingness
to raise two thirds of the capital from domestic sources.
    The U.N. Program, approved last year, calls for 128 billion
dlrs of economic investment in Africa over five years.
    Western donors were asked to contribute 46 billion dlrs,
with the rest being raised from local resources, but Adedeji
said the donors had not responded as hoped.
   In view of this poor response, he said "it is possible that
by the year 2,000 nearly all African countries, except a few,
will be categorised as least developed countries."
    At present, 27 of Africa's 50-odd states are officially
listed in this category.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5684>
The trade surplus doubled in
february to 261 mln dlrs from January's 129 mln, but was  below
the 628 mln of February 1986, official figures show.
    The director of the Banco do Brasil's foreign trade
department (CACEX), Roberto Fendt, told reporters the upturn in
February confirmed a rising trend in exports, which totalled
1.53 billion dlrs against 1.26 billion in January and, after
excluding coffee and oil derivitives, was only slightly below
the same month last year.
    Coffee earnings were down to 110 mln dlrs against 295 mln
in February 1986 because of lower prices, he added.
    Fendt said that although the February results were lower
than the average expected for the rest of the year, the
government's target of an eight-billion-dlr surplus for 1987
should be achieved. This would compare with a 1986 surplus of
9.5 billion dlrs.
    Exports this year are expected to total 22.5 billion dlrs
and imports 14.5 billion, he added. In 1986 exports totalled
22.4 billion dlrs and imports 12.9 billion.
    Fendt said the rise in imports in February to 1.27 billion
dlrs from 1.12 billion in February last year was in line with
government plans to foster economic growth.
    Fendt said that imports were running at levels well above
the traditional average for Brazil.
    In the first two months of the year imports, excluding oil
and wheat totalled, 1.8 billion dlrs against 1.47 billion in
the same 1986 period.
    This rise in import demand reflected the needs of Brazilian
industry to equip to raise production and is perfectly
compatible with the government's program for economic growth,
Fendt added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5692>
Brazil's trade surplus doubled
in February to 261 mln dlrs from January's 129 mln but was well
below the 628 mln dlrs of February last year, official figures
show.
    Director of the Banco do Brasil's foreign trade department
(CACEX), Roberto Fendt, told reporters the upturn in February
confirmed a rising trend in exports which totalled 1.53 billion
dlrs against 1.26 billion in January and, after excluding
coffee and oil derivatives, was only slightly below the same
month last year.
    Coffee earnings were down to 110 mln dlrs against 295 mln
in February, 1986, because of lower prices, he added.
    Fendt said although the February results were lower than
the average expected for the rest of the year, the government's
target of an eight billion dlr surplus for 1987 should be
achieved. This would compare with a 1986 surplus of 9.5 billion
dlrs.
    Exports this year are expected to total 22.5 billion dlrs
and imports 14.5 billion, he added. In 1986 exports totalled
22.4 billion dlrs and imports 12.9 billion.
    Fendt said the rise in imports in February to 1.27 billion
dlrs from 1.12 billion in February last year was in line with
government plans to foster economic growth.
    Fendt said imports were running at levels well above the
traditional average for Brazil.
    Imports in the first two months of the year, excluding oil
and wheat, totalled 1.8 billion dlrs against 1.47 billion in
the same 1986 period.
    This rise reflected industry's need for equipment to raise
production and is perfectly compatible with the government's
program for economic growth, Fendt added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5717>
Farm subsidies and protectionist
moves threaten healthy trade on both sides of the Atlantic,
Michael Jopling, British minister of Agriculture, Fisheries and
Food, warned.
    "It would not be sensible to provoke another dispute between
Europe and the United States," Jopling said in remarks prepared
for an evening speech.
    "But some things are clear and they apply on both sides of
the Atlantic. We cannot continue to pile up stocks while world
demand shrinks," he said.
    "Governments must not operate farm policies as if they were
purely domestic affairs with no impact on others. They also
have to recognize that they cannot in the long run develop a
healthy and stable farm sector on the basis of protectionism
and excessive subisdies.
    "And above all, Europe and the United States have too many
common interests to make it worthwhile to engage in trade wars
and competitive export subsidies which end by benefitting no
one." He added, "It is crucial that the United States and the
European Community remain friends."
    Jopling, who is a member of the EC agriculture committee,
was in Indiana to visit several farms prior to talks with U.S.
officials in Washington later this week.
    Jopling also criticized a recent proposal still under
consideration by the EC for a tax on vegetable and fish oils.
    He said his government would oppose such a move because "We
do not think it is correct that a shortage of funds to support
(EC) farmers should be alleviated by raising money at the
consumer's expense."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5752>
The European Community (EC) delivered
warnings to both Japan and the United States over trade
frictions which have hit relations between the Community and
its main trading partners.
    EC foreign ministers meeting here issued a statement
deploring Japan's continued trade imbalance and appealed for
greater effort by the country to open its markets.
    Ministers also issued a statement saying they were
disturbed by moves in the U.S. to limit imports of textiles and
warned that the Community would react to any such moves.
    EC External Trade Commissioner, Willy De Clercq has already
written to his U.S. counterpart, special U.S. Trade
Representative Clayton Yeutter, outlining the EC's concerns.
    The ministers' said they were "very disturbed" by the U.S.
moves, adding, "the adoption of such measures would not fail to
have a negative effect on the process of multilateral
negotiations just started as well as on bilateral relations."
    Any unilateral U.S. moves would leave the EC no option but
to react according to the laws of the world trade body, the
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT), they said.
    In a separate statement on Japan, the EC ministers said
they "deplore the continued aggravation of the imbalance in
trade ... (and) expect Japan to open up its market more."
    The statement added that the EC continued to insist that
the Japanese government must boost imports and stimulate
demand.
    Ministers also called on the European Commission to prepare
a report on U.S.-Japanese trade for July this year to enable
them to take action where necessary.
    One diplomat said the call for a report showed ministers
were determined not to let the Japanese question drop. "It wil
be back on the table again and again," the diplomat said.
    De Clercq told journalists, "There is a certain nervousness,
a growing impatience within the Community on trade relations
with Japan."
    But diplomats said the Community is keen to continue
talking with Tokyo to try and solve the problem rather than
embark on a costly and damaging trade war.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5779>
The Australian dollar rose more than 40
points and money market interest rates retreated on the better
than expected improvement in the February current account
deficit, but economists and dealers were cautious about
identifying it as the start of a downward trend.
    The current account deficit narrowed to 750 mln dlrs in
February from 1.23 billion in January. It hit 13.82 billion
dlrs in 1985/86 to end-June.
    The currency jumped to 0.6858/63 U.S. Dlrs and traded as
high as 0.6875 before retreating to around 0.6864/69.
    "It's got 69 cents written all over it," one dealer said.
    Foreign exchange dealers said some buyers had gone long on
the dollar expecting a lower figure and sold it down about 30
points to 0.6820 U.S. Dlrs before the release.
    The 750 mln dlr deficit was at the lower end of forecasts
and analysts said the market would welcome any figure below one
billion dlrs for March.
    Banque National de Paris &lt;BNPP.A> senior dealer Peter
Nicolls cautioned that in the long term the currency and
interest rates were too high for import substitution and export
industries.
    Nicolls said he expected the dollar to go as high as 0.6875
and perhaps to 69 cents tomorrow.
    &lt;Lloyds Bank NZA Ltd> chief economist Will Buttrose said
the 42 mln dlr trade surplus was encouraging as were imports at
2.77 billion dlrs, down from 2.99 billion in January.
    But he warned that the outlook for rural and iron and coal
exports remained poor. "We should remember we are paying
something like seven to eight billion dollars simply to service
our foreign debt and that is not going to go away in the near
term," Buttrose said.
    Buttrose said he expected a March deficit of around 900 mln
dlrs, and added "Any figure under a billion dollars will be
acceptable (to the markets)."
    ANZ Banking Group Ltd &lt;ANZA.S> senior economist Ian Little
said the big question was whether the improvement in exports
could be sustained. February FOB exports rose to 2.82 billion
dlrs from a revised 2.74 billion in January.
    Interest rates responded quickly to the deficit news, with
90-day bank bill yields falling to 16.42-16.45 pct from early
highs of 16.50 and yields yesterday as high as 16.65.
    Longer term yields fell with 10-year bonds at 13.66/68 pct
from 13.74 before the release and highs of 13.87 yesterday.
    The stock market was easier at midsession but brokers said
the current account data had little impact on trading.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5785>
Taiwan's balance of payments surplus
widened to a record 16.62 billion U.S. Dlrs in calendar 1986
from 9.35 billion in 1985, the central bank said.
    A bank official attributed the increase mainly to Taiwan's
growing trade surplus, which increased to a record 16.8 billion
U.S. Dlrs in 1986 from 11.2 billion in 1985.
    He said the deficit on invisible trade narrowed to 740 mln
U.S. Dlrs from 1.97 billion.
    Invisible earnings rose to 6.77 billion from 5.09 billion
while invisible spending climbed to 7.51 billion from 7.06
billion, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5786>
The European Community (EC) yesterday
warned Japan and the United States, its main trading partners,
that friction over trade issues is affecting the EC's relations
with both countries.
    EC foreign ministers issued a statement deploring Japan's
continued trade imbalance and appealed for the country to make
a greater effort to open up its markets. They also said they
were disturbed by a draft bill before the U.S. Congress that
would impose permanent quotas on textile imports and were
prepared to react. The U.S. Administration has already
distanced itself from the bill.
    EC External Trade Commissioner Willy De Clercq has written
to his U.S. Counterpart, Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter,
outlining the EC's concerns.
    The statement said ministers were very disturbed by U.S.
Moves towards protectionism. "The adoption of such measures
would not fail to have a negative effect on the process of
multilateral negotiations just started, as well as on bilateral
relations," it said.
    Any unilateral U.S. Moves would leave the EC no option but
to react according to the laws of the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade, it said.
    In a separate statement on Japan, the EC ministers said
they "deplore the continued aggravation of the imbalance in
trade (and) expect Japan to open up its market more."
    The statement said the EC would continue to insist that
Japan boost imports and stimulate domestic demand.
    Ministers also called on the EC Commission to prepare a
report on U.S.-Japanese trade for July this year to enable them
to take appropriate action where necessary.
    One diplomat said the call for a report showed ministers
were determined not to let the Japanese question drop. "It will
be back on the table again and again," the diplomat said.
    De Clercq, talking to journalists during the meeting, said,
"There is a certain nervousness, a growing impatience within the
Community concerning trade relations with Japan."
    The EC is not satisfied with Japan's inability to cut its
trade surplus, and the Commission has adopted a tough approach
on imports of goods such as Japanese photocopiers, where it has
imposed 20 pct anti-dumping duties.
    But diplomats said the EC is keen to negotiate with Tokyo
to solve the problem rather than embark on a costly and
damaging trade war, and the ministers called for more
cooperation with Japan in industry and research.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5810>
Japan has complained to the secretariat
of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) that South
Korea's five-year plan to cut its trade deficit with Japan
breaks GATT rules, Trade Ministry officials here said.
    They said Japan submitted a report earlier this month
alleging South Korea's plan to import less from Japan and more
from the U.S. And elsewhere was tantamount to creating
non-tariff trade barriers.
    South Korea unveiled the plan in November. It said it hoped
to narrow its trade deficit with Japan to two billion dlrs by
1991.
    South Korea's trade deficit with Japan was a record 5.45
billion dlrs in 1986, and rose to 752 mln dlrs in the first two
months of 1987 from 727 mln in the same 1986 period.
    The plan envisages giving incentives to importers not to
import Japanese goods, and to exporters to sell more to Japan.
    The officials said they believed the Japanese action, one
step short of filing a suit, was designed to bring South Korea
to the negotiating table and stop the plan.
    The Seoul government wants Tokyo to ease various import
restrictions and simplify customs inspections for South Korean
goods to help reduce the trade deficit.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5850>
Japanese officials sought to convince the
U.S. That a U.S.-Japan pact on microchip trade is working ahead
of an April 1 deadline set by the U.S. For them to prove their
case.
    "We are implementing the agreement in good faith and the
situation does not run counter to the pact," Osamu Watanabe,
Director of the Ministry of International Trade and Industry's
(MITI) Americas and Oceanic Division, told foreign reporters.
    "The effects of the measures we have taken and are taking
are emerging in the market place," he said.
    U.S. Trade officials have repeatedly accused Japanese
microchip makers of violating the pact by continuing to sell at
below cost in markets outside Japan and the United States.
    The agreement, signed last September, aimed at halting
predatory Japanese pricing policies and increasing U.S.
Semiconductor firms' access to the Japanese market.
    The comments by MITI officials followed a call by Prime
Minsiter Yasuhiro Nakasone to clear up any misunderstandings on
the U.S. Side about the pact, Watanabe said.
    Yukio Honda, director of MITI's Industrial Electronics
Division, denied that Japanese chipmakers were selling at below
cost in third countries.
    MITI's call to Japanese chip makers last month to cut
production of key memory chips in the first quarter of this
year has begun to dry up the source of cheap chips for sale in
the non-regulated grey market, Honda said.
    "The grey market exports from Japan are shrinking now, but
in contrast U.S. And South Korean companies are expanding
market share because of their cheaper prices," Honda said.
    MITI plans to take further steps to reduce the excess
supply of inexpensive chips which developed in Japan after the
pact was formed because of a slump in Japanese semiconductor
exports to the United States, he added.
    The ministry will soon release its supply-demand guidelines
for the second quarter and suggested production volumes are
likely to be lower than that for the first quarter, he said.
    Despite businessmen's ingenuity in finding ways around any
artificial controls, regulation of supply and demand should
bring positive results, Watanabe said. "I am optimistic," he
added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5852>
Norway's parliament has approved an
extensive trade ban against South Africa but left shipowners a
key loophole through which controversial oil shipments on
Norwegian tankers may continue, government officials said.
    The unilateral boycott gives domestic companies until late
September to cut trade ties with South Africa and Namibia.
    Although forbidding crude oil shipments to South Africa on
Norwegian-owned tankers, the boycott makes a crucial exception
for ships whose final destination is decided while at sea. As
oil cargoes are often resold after loading, critics said the
door will be left open for continued shipments to South Africa.
    Norwegian tankers supplied South Africa with about 30 pct
of its crude oil imports during the early 1980s, but the trade
has dropped sharply to just one cargo in the last three months,
trade ministry officials said.
    The latest trade figures show Norwegian imports from South
Africa dropped 36 pct to 160 mln crowns during the first eight
months of 1986, while exports plunged 52 pct to 265 mln crowns
from the year-ago figure.
    The boycott legislation now goes to the upper house for
formal ratification later this week, parliamentarians said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5895>
The European Community (EC) yesterday
warned Japan and the United States, its main trading partners,
that friction over trade issues is affecting the EC's relations
with both countries.
    EC foreign ministers issued a statement deploring Japan's
continued trade imbalance and appealed for the country to make
a greater effort to open up its markets. They also said they
were disturbed by a draft bill before the U.S. Congress that
would impose permanent quotas on textile imports and were
prepared to react. The U.S. Administration has already
distanced itself from the bill.
    EC External Trade Commissioner Willy De Clercq has written
to his U.S. Counterpart, Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter,
outlining the EC's concerns.
    The statement said ministers were very disturbed by U.S.
Moves towards protectionism. "The adoption of such measures
would not fail to have a negative effect on the process of
multilateral negotiations just started, as well as on bilateral
relations," it said.
    Any unilateral U.S. Moves would leave the EC no option but
to react according to the laws of the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade, it said.
    In a separate statement on Japan, the EC ministers said
they "deplore the continued aggravation of the imbalance in
trade (and) expect Japan to open up its market more."
    The statement said the EC would continue to insist that
Japan boost imports and stimulate domestic demand.
    Ministers also called on the EC Commission to prepare a
report on U.S.-Japanese trade for July this year to enable them
to take appropriate action where necessary.
    One diplomat said the call for a report showed ministers
were determined not to let the Japanese question drop. "It will
be back on the table again and again," the diplomat said.
    De Clercq, talking to journalists during the meeting, said,
"There is a certain nervousness, a growing impatience within the
Community concerning trade relations with Japan."
    But diplomats said the EC is keen to negotiate with Tokyo
to solve the problem rather than embark on a costly and
damaging trade war, and the ministers called for more
cooperation with Japan in industry and research.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5908>
Japan told the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade that South Korea's five-year import
diversification plan violated the spirit of the world trade
governing body, a Foreign Ministry spokesman said.
    The notification came in Japan's answer to a recent GATT
questionnaire on unfair trade practices, the spokesman said.
    In the five-year plan, which starts this year, South Korea
aims to reduce its dependency on Japan as a source of imported
goods and to increase imports from the U.S. And Europe.
    Japan's move came after several unsuccessful bilateral
negotiations on the plan, the spokesman said. "The notification
does not represent anything resembling a formal complaint, nor
is it intended to pressure South Korea. It is a routine
procedure followed by all other GATT member states."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5941>
The U.S. current account deficit
widened to a record 36.84 billion dlrs on a balance of payments
basis in the October-December fourth quarter of 1986 from a
revised 35.29 billion dlrs in the third quarter, the Commerce
Department said.
    Previously, the department said the third-quarter deficit
was 36.28 billion dlrs.
    For the full year 1986, the current account, a broad
measure of trade performance, was in deficit a record 140.57
billion dlrs after a 117.68 billion dlr deficit in 1985.
    The department said an increase in the merchandise trade
deficit during the fourth quarter to 38.4 billion dlrs from
37.1 billion dlrs in the third quarter was the main reason for
the worsening deficit.
    Net service receipts declined to 5.5 billion dlrs in the
final quarter from six billion dlrs in the third quarter.
    The current account includes trade in merchandise and
services as well as U.S. financial transactions with the rest
of the world.
    The department said the merchandise trade deficit for all
of 1986 grew to 147.7 billion from 124.4 billion dlrs in 1985.
    Net service receipts were 22.3 billion dlrs in 1986,
compared with 21.7 billion dlrs in 1985, the department said.
    Net unilateral transfers during the fourth quarter last
year, covering foreign aid and government pensions, were down
to 3.9 billion dlrs from 4.2 billion dlrs in the third quarter
because of fewer U.S. government grants to Mideast countries.
    Liabilities to foreigners reported by U.S. banks rose 35.3
billion dlrs between October and December after increasing 30.1
billion dlrs in the third quarter.
    For the full year, these liabilities grew 77.4 billion dlrs
after rising by 40.4 billion dlrs in 1985.
    The department said inflows were boosted in the fourth
quarter by international activities of Japanese banks and
strong demand within the United States to finance acquisitions.
    Net foreign sales of U.S. Treasury securities by foreigners
were 2.7 billion dlrs in the quarter after purchases of 500 mln
dlrs in the third quarter.
    Net foreign purchases of securities other than U.S.
Treasury securities in the fourth quarter were 11.8 billion
dlrs, compared with 17.2 billion dlrs in the third quarter.
    For all 1986, foreign purchases of securities excluding
U.S. Treasury securities were a record 70.7 billion dlrs,
surpassing the previous record 50.9 billion dlr total in 1985.
   Claims on foreigners reported by U.S. banks in the fourth
quarter rose 29.9 billion dlrs after a 19.3 billion dlr
third-quarter increase.
    U.S. sales of foreign securities rose to 2.7 billion dlrs
from 300 mln dlrs in the third quarter because of a sharp
selloff of foreign stocks and bonds, the department said.
    Outflows for U.S. direct investment abroad fell to 5.7
billion dlrs from eight billion dlrs in the third quarter.
    Foreign direct investment in the United States increased
14.4 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter, compared with 5.6
billion dlrs in the previous quarter, because of stepped-up
acquisitions, the department said.
    Foreign official assets in the United States increased 800
mln dlrs between October and December after rising 15.4 billion
dlrs in the third quarter.
    For the full year 1986, foreign official assets grew 33.4
billion dlrs after a 1985 decrease of 1.9 billion dlrs as
foreign monetary authorities intervened heavily in exchange
markets late in the year as the dollar fell, commerce said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5954>
Already strained relations between
the U.S. And the European Community (EC) are likely to get
worse before they get better, director general of the Dutch
Economics Ministry's foreign affairs division Frans Engering
said.
    Speaking at an American Chamber of Commerce lunch in The
Hague, Engering noted the developing history of crises over
steel, citrus and pasta, and warned of more to come.
    "I consider the strident tone of US declarations on Airbus
ill-advised, and the EC fats and oils tax proposal a dangerous
provocation," he said. "I feel that we shall probably have to
deal with quite a few more crises in the foreseeable future."
    Not only is the US Congress clearly very determined to get
the American balance of payments into better shape, but the
risks of brinkmanship are all the greater because the EC has
its own constraints in meeting outside pressure, Engering
noted.
    "If we ask ourselves whether it is perhaps inevitable that
we keep pushing each other to the brink of actual trade war,
then I think the answer is probably yes," he said.
    In order to reduce these tensions, decision-making in the
EC must become less self-centred, and the US Administration
will have to exercise the authority to convince Congress and
pressure groups of the need for accommodation, he added.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5964>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
said an agreement has been reached by members of the
Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD) to
control the unfair trade practice of using tied aid to promote
trade.
    He said in a statement the agreement culminates the Reagan
administration's effot to negotiate a virtual end to export
credit subsidies.
    The practice of other governments using tied aid or mixed
credits to promote exports has cost the United States lost jobs
and lost exports, the Treasury said.
    The agreement to be implemented in two stages by July, 1988
would ban tied aid credit among industrialized countries and
place limits on permitted aid by developing countries.
    It would also reduce export credits that do not involve aid
and reduce credit subsidies permitted for relatively poor
countries, the Treasury said.
    Baker said the agreement imposes particular sacrifices on
Japan and praised Japan's willingness to accept the pact as a
demonstration of the Japanese government's willingness to take
concrete steps to resolve important trade issues.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=5973>
The western industrialised nations have
agreed reforms in rules by which they provide credit for
exports to developing countries, the Organisation for Economic
Cooperation and Development said.
    The reforms tighten the rules for the use of foreign aid to
subsidise export credits in so-called "mixed credits," the OECD
said.
    The agreement, to be implemented in two stages in July this
year and July 1988, means the minimum aid component in mixed
credits will be raised to 35 pct from 25 pct, and to 50 pct for
credits covering exports to the world's least developed
nations.
    Additionally, a new formula will be used for calculating
the aid element in mixed credits, to take account of different
interest rates in the exporting countries, the 24-nation OECD,
which hosted the reform negotiations, said.
    Minimum interest rates for officially subsidised trade
loans have also been revised with the aim of cutting the
subsidies, and ending them completely on loans to relatively
rich developing countries by July next year.
    The reforms follow several years of pressure by the U.S. To
stop competitors, notably France and Japan, using foreign aid
to subsidise exports, putting U.S. Firms at a disadvantage.
    OECD officials said the agreement was based on a
provisional accord reached in January subject to ratification
by member governments. Some governments, including Austria, had
linked their final approval to other trade credit issues which
would be discussed at a meeting here in mid-April, they added.
    By raising the minimum amount of aid required in mixed
credits the agreement aims to make such hidden subsidies too
costly for frequent use.
    "A major loophole in the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade has been closed today," a senior U.S. Official here
commented.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6253>
The European Community may decide to
increase the cereals co-responsibility levy and extend its
scope to cover cereal substitutes if the Commission's 1987/88
farm price package is opposed by member states, Edgar Pye,
vice-president of the British agricultural merchants'
association UKASTA, said.
    At the moment the Commission is proposing the rate of levy
remain unchanged at three pct - but Pye, addressing a feed
manufacturers' dinner in Glasgow, said this could change if its
controversial plans to cut cereal prices and introduce an oils
and fats tax are blocked
    Pye said UKASTA would continue to fight the cereals levy
"tooth and nail."
    However, a test case in the European Court of Justice
contesting the legality of the current regulation applying the
levy, which is being backed by the EC feed manufacturers'
organisation FEFAC, was not now expected to be heard until the
end of 1987, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6406>
New Zealand's inflation and interest
rates should decline and the balance of payments improve
significantly in the fiscal year to the end of March 1988, the
Institute of Economic Research (NZIER) said.
    The independent institute said in its quarterly March issue
that it was also revising its fiscal 1987 real gross domestic
product (GDP) forecast to a fall of 0.5 pct against the one pct
drop forecast in December.
    Government figures show GDP grew at an annual 1.8 pct in
the quarter to September and 3.4 pct in the June quarter.
    The NZIER said the sharp improvement in the June and
September quarters was due mainly to a new tax structure and
the introduction of a 10 pct value-added goods and services tax
and is not expected to continue in the second half of 1986/87.
    The government's tight fiscal position is not expected to
change, it said.
    Annual inflation, measured by the consumer price index, is
forecast to fall to nine pct by next March from 18.2 pct in
calendar 1986, it said.
    "Falling inflation is likely to give significant scope for
reductions in nominal interest rates; real interest rates are
also expected to ease (albeit slightly) as the balance of
payments deficit and hence the call on overseas capital, falls
away," the NZIER said.
    Short-term interest rates are forecast to remain between 20
and 25 pct until the June quarter, but will decline over the
second half of 1987/88 to between 16 and 18 pct. Long-term
rates are expected to fall to between 14 and 16 pct.
    Five year government bond rates are currently 18.40 pct and
the key indicator 30-day bank bills 26.53 pct.
    The local dollar is expected to depreciate steadily in the
early part of the coming year and, by next March, reach 57.5 on
the Reserve Bank's trade weighted index, which is based on a
basket of currencies. The index now stands at around 66.4.
    "A marked improvement in the balance of payments is
forecast," the NZIER said. "The current account deficit is
expected to fall from 7.5 pct of GDP in 1985/86 to 4.5 pct in
1986/87 and 2.5 pct in 1987/88."
    The current account deficit is forecast to shrink to 1.32
billion N.Z. Dlrs in 1987/88 from 2.40 billion in 1986/87 and
3.33 billion in 1985/86.
    The 1987/88 budget deficit is forecast to be 2.8 billion
dlrs against an expected 2.9 billion dlrs in 1986/87 and 1.87
billion in 1985/86.
    This compares with the government's 1986/87 deficit figure
of 2.92 billion against an earlier forecast of 2.45 billion.
    "Conditions in the coming year are sufficiently subdued to
contribute to marked improvements in both the balance of
payments and the rate of inflation ...," the NZIER said.
    "Overall, these are significant gains for the New Zealand
economy and, if they continue to be improved upon, bode well
for future prospects."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6450>
The city of Rotterdam today signed an
agreement in principle to cooperate with the AOMI Cargo
Distribution Centre in Tokyo.
    Acting Mayor Roel den Dunnen said that cooperation between
private and public entities in the Tokyo and Rotterdam area,
and a fruitful exchange of information have a favourable
influence on the flow of goods and services between the two
countries.
    The AOMI Cargo Distribution Center, which will start
operating in October this year, signed a similar agreement with
Rotterdam's twinned-port of Seattle last September.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6464>
Thailand's trade deficit widened to an
estimated 4.7 billion baht in February from 2.1 billion in
January and 2.8 billion a year ago, the Bank of Thailand said.
    Exports fell to around 18.9 billion baht from 20.4 billion
in January compared with 17.4 billion a year ago, the bank
said.
    Imports rose to 23.6 billion baht from 22.5 billion in
January. They were 20.2 billion in February 1986.
    The bank said the trade deficit for the two months widened
to an estimated 6.8 billion baht from 5.2 billion a year ago.
    February's current account showed a 1.2 billion baht
deficit compared with 1.7 billion in January and 263 mln a year
ago.
    The current account for the two months posted an estimated
500 mln baht surplus, down from 1.2 billion a year ago.
    A surplus in the country's balance of payments narrowed to
3.2 billion baht in February from 4.6 billion the previous
month but was higher than 1.5 billion a year ago.
    The bank said the balance of payments surplus for the first
two months of 1987 widened to 7.8 billion baht from 4.6 billion
from the same period in 1986, while the net capital inflow rose
to five billion baht from 3.1 billion.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6535>
Pakistan and Sweden have signed a
commodity exchange agreement for 88 mln dlrs each way, the
Pakistan government announced.
    Pakistan's exports under the agreement will include raw
cotton, cotton products, cotton textiles, steel products,
molasses, naphtha and fresh and dried fruits.
    Swedish exports to Pakistan will include medical and
laboratory equipment, electrical telecommunication equipment,
diesel engine spares, mining and security equipment,
road-building and construction machinery, fertilisers and palm
oil.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6593>
The DIW economic research institute
said West German economic growth in 1987 is unlikely to reach
the 1.5 pct rate it had forecast earlier this year.
    The institute, whose forecasts are more pessimistic than
those of the other four leading German institutes, said the
economy had passed its peak in the summer of 1986, and its
prospects had dimmed significantly since the autumn.
    The DIW repeated earlier predictions that gross national
product (GNP) in the first quarter of 1987 would contract in
real, seasonally adjusted terms against the weak final quarter
of last year. 
    The DIW said that even if the economy recovers in the
remaining three quarters, it was unlikely that demand and
production would rise strongly enough to bring GNP growth up to
1.5 pct.
    Other institutes and economists have recently revised their
forecasts for German 1987 growth to around two pct.
    In a report DIW disputed arguments by other economists that
the economy was showing mixed development, with domestic demand
healthy but foreign demand weak.
    DIW said the crucial split was between weak demand for
capital goods, and strong demand for buildings and consumer
goods, not between foreign and domestic demand.
    It noted that domestic demand for capital goods had been
hit in recent months by the weakness of exports, which had
caused West German firms to scale back investment plans.
    Service industries, unlike manufacturing industry, were
continuing to do well because they relied on consumer demand,
it said.
    In a separate report the HWWA economic research institute
in Hamburg said West Germany's real trade surplus would fall
markedly this year.
    However, the nominal trade surplus would show little change
from 1986's record 112.2 billion marks because of a further
improvement in the terms of trade on average in 1987 compared
with 1986, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6596>
Peru registered a 16 mln dlr trade deficit
in 1986, its first trade shortfall in four years, a central
bank statement said.
    The figure compared with a surpluses of 1.17 billion dlrs
in 1985, 1.01 billion in 1984 and 293 mln in 1983. The last
trade deficit was a 428 mln shortfall in 1982.
    Peru's exports fell to 2.51 billion dlrs last year from
2.98 billion in 1985. Last year's imports were 2.53 billion
dlrs against 1.81 billion dlrs in 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6637>
Peru registered a 16 mln dlr trade deficit
in 1986, its first trade shortfall in four years, a central
bank statement said.
    The figure compared with a surpluses of 1.17 billion dlrs
in 1985, 1.01 billion in 1984 and 293 mln in 1983. The last
trade deficit was a 428 mln shortfall in 1982.
    Peru's exports fell to 2.51 billion dlrs last year from
2.98 billion in 1985. Last year's imports were 2.53 billion
dlrs against 1.81 billion dlrs in 1985.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6716>
The European Community (EC) has
warned the U.S. House of Representatives that tough trade
legislation it is considering could prompt retaliation by U.S.
trading partners.
    The warning was sent in a letter from Sir Roy Denman, head
of the EC delegation in Washington, to Dan Rostenkowski,
chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee.
    A copy of the letter was made available to Reuters.
    Denman told Rostenkowski, an Illinois Democrat, he backed
aspects of the bill, such as one backing new talks under the
GATT and one excluding protection for the textile industry.
    But Denman disagreed with other provisions which would
require President Reagan to take retaliatory trade action
against nations with large trade surpluses with the U.S. and
would set new standards for judging unfair foreign trade
practices.
    Denman told Rostenkowski that GATT regulations prohibit
member nations from taking unilateral retaliatory action in
trade disputes unless the action is GATT-approved.
    He said "If the Congress makes retaliatory action mandatory,
then the United States would be in violation of its
international legal obligations and on a collision course with
its major trading partners."
    Denman added that a president should have flexibility in
enforcing trade laws, saying "in the last resort, any
administration must take its decision in light of the overall
national interest."
    Otherwise, he said, "the risk would be counter-reaction by
trading partners of the United States, i.e., retaliation or
enactment of mirror image legislation to be employed against
imports from the United States."
    Denman also said Congress could prompt retaliation if it
reduced the threshhold of unfair trade by making it easier for
firms to file unfair trade practice claims.
    Retaliation could also be prompted by relaxing standards
for findings that imports were injuring U.S. firms.
    "Changes in these standards must be agreed upon
multilaterally. They cannot be imposed by the United States
alone on the world trading system," he said.
    House leaders have rejected a plan by textile-state
legislators to add to the trade bill a provision to curb
imports of cloth and clothing, similar to a measure passed two
years ago but vetoed by President Reagan.
    There was concern by the leaders that Reagan would veto the
entire trade bill because of the textile amendment.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6757>
peru's short-term foreign trade credit
lines have more than doubled to 430 mln dlrs under president
alan garcia's 20-month administration.
    Central bank general manager hector neyra told reporters 
that many of the credits were for 90-day terms and could be
used several times a year.
    The trade credits stood at 210 million dollars when garcia
took office on july 28, 1985, and announced foreign debt
payments would be limited to 10 pct of export earnngs.
    Neyra told reuters that peru was current on interest
payments on short-term debt, including the trade credit lines
and on about 750 million dollars in so-called  "working capital"
credits.
    Neyra did not specify the source of the trade credit lines.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6866>
Peru's short-term foreign trade credit
lines, regarded as vital to ensure smooth foreign commercial
transactions, have more than doubled to 430 mln dollars under
the 20-month government of president Alan Garcia.
    Central bank general manager Hector Neyra told reporters
many of the credits were 90-day.
    Trade credits were 210 mln dlrs when Garcia took office in
1985 announcing a tough stance limiting foreign debt repayments
to 10 pct of export earnings.
    Neyra told Reuters Peru was current on interest payments on
short-term debt, including trade credit lines and on about 750
mln dlrs in so-called  "working capital" credits.
    Trade credit lines were 880 mln dlrs in 1982, but fell in
1984 when Peru stopped some payments to private foreign banks.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6926>
A key House panel voted to greatly
ease government controls on exports as several House committees
moved rapidly toward approval of major changes in trade laws
they hope will help solve U.S. trade woes.
    The House Foreign Affairs Subcommittee on International
Economic Policy voted to direct the administration to cut the
list of controlled exports by 40 per cent by removing items no
longer considered important to U.S. military security.
    Industries had complained they were losing sales to foreign
competitors who were allowed to export freely products U.S.
companies could not sell abroad.
    The issue has been the subject of administration debate.
The Commerce Department had held that unnecessary restrictions
impeded U.S. exports while the Defense Department said current
controls should be retained but better administered.
    Four congressional panels met today to consider portions of
a wideranging trade bill that intends to help U.S. companies
sell more products abroad and to fight unfair foreign trade
practices.
    Their separate proposals, some of them conflicting, will be
woven by House Democratic leaders into a final trade bill for a
vote by the full House in late April.
    Sparked by the proposal of Fujitsu Ltd. to take controlling
interest in Schlumberger Ltd's Fairchild Semiconductor Corp.,
the House Energy and Commerce subcommittee on Commerce voted to
expand Reagan's authority to block foreign takeovers of U.S.
companies.
    Reagan would be able to block any takeover found to be
damaging to U.S. economic or national security interests.
    "We are losing our semiconductors which are at the heart of
our national security," subcommittee chairman James Florio, a
New Jersey Democrat said.
    The subcommittee also called for the administration to
consider retaliation against Japan for its restrictive
government procurement practices.
    The retaliation could be triggered by a requirement that
the administration investigate whether U.S. companies were
treated unfairly and whether they have been barred from bids on
lucrative public works projects such as the eight billion dlr
Kansai airport construction. U.S. firms have complained they
were not allowed to bid on its construction.
    At the urging of the U.S. recording industry, the
subcommittee agreed to bar imports of a new Japanese
product--digital audio recorders.
    Meeting in closed session, the House Ways and Means
Committee agreed to allow President Reagan to retaliate against
foreign countries that refuse to open their markets to U.S.
telecommunications products.
     Congressional aides said the committee also agreed U.S.
companies would be allowed to press for relief from imports of
counterfeit products made in violation of U.S. copyright and
patent laws.
                                         
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6952>
Japan's customs-cleared trade surplus
fell to 1.89 billion dlrs in the first 10 days of March from a
1.91 billion surplus a year earlier, the Ministry of Finance
said.
     The March interim surplus compared with a 1.70 billion dlr
surplus in the same February period.
     FOB exports in the first 10 days of March rose 5.8 pct
from a year earlier to 5.50 billion dlrs and CIF imports rose
9.7 pct to 3.61 billion.
     The average yen/dollar rate used for the statistics was
153.67 yen against 181.23 a year earlier.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6954>
Indonesia cannot spend its way out of
recession and has very limited economic options due to lower
world oil prices, Central Bank governor Arifin Siregar was
quoted as saying by the official Antara news agency.
    "If Indonesia spurs its economic growth too much, such as
through expansionary monetary and budgetary policies, it might
create negative effects not only on price increases, but also
on the balance of payments," he told bankers and businessmen in
the North Sumatran city of Medan.
    Antara quoted him as saying Indonesia is relying on its
export drive to help narrow its trade deficit.
    Antara reported that Siregar said the government wanted to
help boost exports from the rubber and palm oil industries,
which are centered in Sumatra.
    "I see Sumatra has great potential, as in the plantation
sector in which family units are employed in great number," he
said, according to the agency.
    Indonesia relied on oil and gas exports for 70 pct of its
export revenue until last year's fall in crude prices.
    It has projected its current account deficit will widen to
over four billion dlrs in the current financial year ending
March 31 from 1.8 billion in 1985/86.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6959>
The strong contribution of exports to
the growth in Australia's gross domestic product (GDP) in the
fourth quarter of 1986 was a significant and welcome feature of
the data, private economists polled by Reuters said.
    Real GDP rose 1.1 pct in the fourth quarter of 1986, after
rising 0.2 pct in the third quarter and falling 1.1 pct a year
earlier.
    Equally significant was the decline in both private and
government spending, they said.
    Exports of goods and services rose 13 pct in the fourth
quarter, while imports rose only 2.9 pct, Statistics Bureau
figures show. Consumer spending declined 0.6 pct and government
spending by 0.2.
    Bob Edgar of the Australia and New Zealand Banking Group
Ltd said the government's aim of reducing the current account
deficit by boosting exports and lowering consumption to cut
imports appeared to be working.
    However, he cautioned that care must be taken to keep
growth restrained because if it accelerated too fast imports
would increase and worsen the balance of payments.
    Andre Morony of Bankers Trust Australia Ltd added the
result was positive because growth was export-driven.
    But he said the GDP rise came as no surprise given the
growth in exports disclosed in other statistics.
    The economists' comments were echoed by Treasurer Paul
Keating in a statement issued in Canberra.
    Keating said the figures showed encouraging trends for a
reduction in the current account deficit, notably the decline
in domestic demand and the strong increase in exports.
    A further 3.5 pct fall in the terms of trade in the quarter
underscored the need to continue restraint in wages, prices and
public sector spending and borrowing to improve Australia's
competitiveness, he said.
    "It is clear that through the continued application of that
strategy Australia will make the necessary adjustments in its
external accounts and return to a more sustainable growth
pattern," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6964>
India's trade deficit is
provisionally estimated at 58.34 billion rupees in the first 10
months of fiscal 1986/87 ending March, compared with 70.62
billion in the year ago period, the Commerce Ministry said.
 Exports rose in the latest period to 100.75 billion rupees
from the a year earlier 86.09 billion and imports to 159.09
billion from 156.71 billion in the period, the figures show.
    The trade deficit for all of 1986/87 is provisionally
estimated at around 70 billion rupees from an estimated record
87.47 billion in 1985/86 and actual 53.18 billion in 1984/85,
Commerce Minister P. Shiv Shanker told reporters last month .
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=6976>
The value of trade between China and
Taiwan via Hong Kong fell 13 pct to 7.45 billion H.K. Dlrs in
1986 from 8.59 billion dlrs in 1985, Hong Kong's Census and
Statistics Department said.
    Taiwan's exports to China through Hong Kong fell to 6.33
billion dlrs last year from 7.69 billion in 1985, while China's
exports rose to 1.12 billion dlrs from 904 mln dlrs.
    Economists in Hong Kong told Reuters that China's controls
on scarce foreign currency hurt its imports of Taiwanese
consumer goods, such as electric fans and television sets.
    Herbal medicine and textiles were among China's chief
exports to Taiwan.
    Taiwan does not allow direct trade with China and indirect
trade is routed mainly through Hong Kong.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7011>
The Ministry of International Trade and
Industry will ask Japanese computer microchip makers to further
slash output in the second quarter in an effort to save its
semiconductor pact with the United States, MITI officials said.
    The United States has accused Japan of reneging on the
semiconductor pact by failing to stop the flow of cut-price
Japanese chips to Asian markets. Washington has threatened to
take retaliatory action after April 1.
    The pact, agreed last year, calls on Japan to stop selling
cut-price chips in world markets and to increase its imports of
American chips to reduce some of its huge trade surplus.
    MITI, anxious to salvage the bilateral agreement, has been
pressing chip makers to limit production in the hope that will
boost domestic chip prices and reduce the incentive to export.
    Last month, the ministry asked Japanese chip makers to
reduce first quarter output by 10 pct. To meet that request,
they had to slash production by 20 pct over the final six weeks
of the first quarter.
    If that reduced production level were maintained through to
the end of June, second quarter output would come in 10 pct
below that of the first three months of the year.
    MITI officials, who declined to be identified, said the
ministry has not yet decided on the extent of the second
quarter cutback.
    One said that Japanese chip makers are losing ground in
Asia to South Korean and U.S. Competition just as markets there
are picking up.
    MITI has been criticized privately by some Japanese
semiconductor makers for what they see as heavy-handed attempts
to ensure the success of the Japan/U.S. Chip pact.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7087>
Jordan and Sudan signed a barter trade
agreement under which they will exchange 100 mln dlrs' worth of
goods a year, Sudanese officials said.
    They said Sudan will export corn, sesame, peanuts, spices
and cow hides, while Jordan will export cement, tomato puree,
chemicals and pharmaceuticals.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7135>
The U.S. trade deficit with Taiwan and
Korea is expected to widen this year, despite some economic and
currency adjustments by the two newly industrialized countries,
economists said.
    "The surpluses that Taiwan and Korea ran with the U.S. in
1986 will get bigger. This time next year, the U.S. will be
screaming at those countries about their exports," said Steve
Cerier of Manufacturers Hanover Trust Co.
    Taiwan is currently the third biggest exporter to the U.S.
after Japan and Canada, while Korea is the seventh largest.
    Faced with heightened protectionist sentiment in Congress,
the Reagan administration has been stepping up the rhetoric
against Taiwan and Korea, urging those countries to allow their
currencies to appreciate and lift impediments to free trade.
    The thrust has shifted to those newly industrialized
countries (NICs) amid signs the dollar's steep drop against the
currencies of Japan and most EC nations -- previously the main
focus of the U.S. drive to cut its trade gap -- is beginning to
close the competiveness gap for American goods.
    U.S. Treasury secretary James Baker said recently that he
expects a reduction in Japan's trade surplus this year.
    But U.S. manufacturers still are losing markets on their
own doorstep to Taiwan and Korea, whose currencies have not
risen as much as the yen and the mark. As major beneficiaries
of soft oil prices and with low labor costs, Taiwanese and
Korean exporters are well-placed to take up the slack.
    "In 1986, the fashionable comment in Washington was
Japan-bashing. Now it's NIC-bashing," said Robert Chandross, of
Lloyds Bank PLC.
    Asia's four main NICs -- Hong Kong, South Korea, Singapore
and Taiwan -- accounted for almost one-fifth of the overall 170
billion dlr U.S. merchandise trade deficit for 1986.
    The U.S. trade gap with Taiwan rose to 15.7 billion dlrs in
1986 from 13.1 billion in 1985, while the bilateral trade
deficit with South Korea grew to 7.1 billion from 4.8 billion.
    And preliminary U.S. data show that the growth trend is
continuing. The U.S. trade shortfall with Taiwan was 1.6
billion dlrs in January, up 24.4 pct from a year earlier. The
gap with Korea was 700 mln dlrs, up 24.8 pct from a year ago.
    Lately both nations have said they will take steps to
defuse incipient trade tensions. Korea said it is choosing many
of the 122 items on which the U.S. wants it to cut import
tariffs in order to deflect pressure for currency revaluation.
    Still, South Korean trade minister Rha Woong Bae said last
week that Korea would maintain a trade surplus for three to
five years as a way to cut its 44.5 billion dlr foreign debt.
    For its part, Taiwan said in January that it will cut
tariffs on 1,700 goods sometime in the second half of 1987 and
try to diversify exports. But vice economic minister Wang
Chien-Shien said last month that he still does not expect
Taiwan's trade surplus with the U.S. will fall in 1987.
    The NICs have made deep inroads into markets for textiles
and electronic goods. But Korea is raising its profile in the
area of "big-ticket" manufactured goods, notably cars.
    Korea expects its auto exports -- mostly for North America
-- to balloon to 675,000 units in 1987 from zero in 1985.
    "The NICs' exports are almost all manufactured goods. When
their exports rise it hits the heart of the U.S. manufacturing
base. It cuts directly to us and to our customers," said Bob
Wendt, manager for economic studies at Bethlehem Steel Corp.
    The U.S. takes 90 pct of Korea's computer products exports,
72 pct of its electrical appliances and 65 pct of its
telecommunications equipment.
    A recent study by Morgan Guaranty Trust Co says Taiwan and
South Korea are the most pressing trade issue for the U.S.
    While Hong Kong and Singapore run trade surpluses with the
U.S., these are offset by their deficits with other countries.
    But Taiwan and, to a lesser extent, South Korea, stand in
marked contrast. Both of these nations have moved rapidly into
large bilateral surplus with the U.S. and major overrall trade
and current account surpluses, the Morgan study says.
    Morgan expects Taiwan's overall trade surplus to grow to
18.5 billion dlrs in 1987 from 15.2 billion last year, and
Korea's to increase to 6.5 billion dlrs from 3.5 billion.
    Concern about the NICs is not confined to the U.S.
    "A lot of Korea and Taiwan's exports to the U.S. have been
at Japan's expense," said Richard Koss at General Motors Corp.
    February's Paris meeting of six major industrial powers
exorted NICs to lower trade barriers and revalue currencies.
    But this two-pronged approach has drawn little response
from the two nations so far and, in any case, will only work
with a sizeable lag, economists say.
    The U.S. has not said how much it thinks the Taiwan's and
Korea's currencies should climb. The Taiwan dollar, which is
pegged to the U.S. dollar, has risen about 15 pct since
September 1985 while the Korean won has risen about five pct.
    But in real terms the Taiwan dollar has been flat against
the U.S. unit and the won has lost seven pct, economists say.
    "We've not seen any lessening of competition from those
countries that we can attribute to currency changes," said
Bethlehem Steel's Wendt.
    And so far, U.S. pleas for Taiwan and Korea to use their
hefty export earnings to import more have had little effect.
    Moreover, it is uncertain how far U.S. protectionism will
get given the administration's free-trade stance. "It's hard to
see that anything will be passed much before year-end. And then
the question is, will it have teeth?" one economist said.
   
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7375>
Beryl Sprinkel, chairman of
the president's council of economic advisors, said stronger
domestic demand growth in Japan and Western Europe is needed to
help stimulate U.S. exports without having to rely on futher
dollar declines.
    "Stronger domestic demand growth in the major foreign
industrial countries is needed to engender the much needed
expansion of U.S. export markets without having to rely on
further dollar depreciation," he told the Futures Industry
Association.
    Sprinkel said the recent recovery of domestic demand in
Japan and Europe has been one of the weakest in the post-war
period.
    "Stronger domestic demand growth in the major industrial
countries would help give balance to the current world
recovery," he said.
    Asked if Japan was not living up to commitments made last
month to trading partners, he said recent figures showed
Japan's economy grew by about 0.5 pct in the fourth quarter of
1986, "Not enough to sustain employment growth."
    However, Sprinkel said Japan had not reneged on its pledges
and was moving toward more stimulative policies, including tax
reform. "I suspect there will be further moves," he said.
    Sprinkel repeated his call for further cuts in U.S.
government spending and for resistance to tax increases.
    "Reducing the federal government budget deficit by
expenditure restraint is needed to preserve the low marginal
tax rates achieved by tax reform," he said, adding that "a vote
to increase to government expenditures is a vote against tax
reform."
    Sprinkel said the fall of the dollar had substantially
restored U.S. cost competitiveness and that the deterioration
of the U.S. trade balance appeared to have abated.
    However, he said that "sole reliance on dollar depreciation
to reduce our trade deficit is not desirable," as it risks
inflation in the United States and recession abroad.
    "I am confident that further improvements in our trade
performance will contribute significantly to growth in 1987," he
said. Improvements in the U.S. trade balance, he said, will
come about largely from a swing in manufactures trade and
present "serious adjustment problems for U.S. trading partners."
    Western Europe, where manufactures output and employment
have been weak, promises to be especially hard hit by the
improvement in the U.S. trade balance, Sprinkel said.
    He defended flexible exchange rates saying wide swings in
rates were not a fault of the system but of the undesirable
policies that produced them.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7477>
Sir Roy Denman, Head of the EC
Delegation in Washington, said pending U.S. trade legislation
is a misguided attempt to deal with the nation's trade deficit
and will spark retaliation if passed in its present form.
    "To think that you can deal with a trade deficit by
legislation is a mistake," he told the Foreign Trade
Association here.
    Denman told reporters that possible retaliation, which he
warned of in a letter to House Ways and Means Committee
Chairman Dan Rostenkowski, would not necessarily be on a
product-for-product basis.
    "Retaliation does not have to be matched product to
product," Denman said.
    He said in the case of textiles import restrictions,
however, retaliation would be against U.S. textile exports.
    "Certainly, if restrictions were imposed on European
exports of textiles to the U.S., the Community would be likely
to retaliate with restrictions on U.S. textile exports to
Europe," Denman said.
    He also took exception to U.S. proposals to require
countries with large current account surpluses with the U.S. to
cut those surpluses or face special tariffs.
    "This would conflict with international obligations, throw
a large wrench into the current round of trade negotiations and
could easily boomerang," he warned of the tariff proposals.
    Denman also took exception to U.S. efforts to seek
reciprocity in specific trade sectors.
    "Forcing reciprocity in one sector by imposing barriers
would simply lead to retaliation from the other party," he
said, adding that overall reciprocity can only be achieved by
trading off disadvantages in one sector for advantages in
another.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7521>
The U.S. Senate has unanimously
called for President Reagan immediately to force Japan to live
up to a pledge to stop dumping its microchips and open its
markets to U.S. Chipmakers.
    The Senate voted 93 to 0 to urge Reagan to impose penalties
on Japanese high-technology products containing semiconductors
in retaliation for what it sees as Japan's violations of the
semiconductor pact.
    While the measure does not bind Reagan to any action,
Senate leaders said its adoption would warn Japan stiffer
legislation would be considered if the violations continue.
    "We want to send a message to Japan to let it know how the
Senate feels about this matter," Senate Democratic Leader Robert
Byrd told the Senate.
    Senate Finance Committee chairman Lloyd Bentsen told the
Senate the measure was not aimed at retaliation but at
correcting Japan's unfair trade practices.
    A key House trade lawmaker, Representative Richard Gephardt
also announced he would seek to force Japan and other countries
with huge trade surpluses to slash their surplus by 10 pct a
year for three years.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7531>
Export orders for Taiwanese products
fell 1.37 pct to 3.58 billion U.S. Dlrs in February from 3.63
billion in January, but rose nearly 43 pct from 2.51 billion a
year earlier, an Economic Ministry official said.
    He attributed the fall to the rising Taiwan dollar.
    February orders for electric and electronic goods were 619
mln U.S. Dlrs, up from 574 mln in January and 370 mln in
February 1986. Garment orders were 324 mln dlrs against 383 mln
and 283 mln while footwear orders were 297 mln compared with
333 mln and 200 mln.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7537>
Federal Reserve Board
Chairman Paul Volcker said the U.S. Trade deficit is a
challenge for the U.S. Equal to the Soviet Union launching of
Sputnik.
    "The international challenge implicit in our huge trade
deficit has become the 1980s equivalent to the launch of
Sputnik by the Russians in the 1950s, when we suddenly feared
we were to be left in the wake of Soviet technological
achievement," he said in an address to Florida educators.
     He said the trade problem underscored the need to reform
the U.S. Educational system to improve economic performance.
    The Commerce Department reported last week that the
nation's trade gap, calculated on a balance-of-payments basis,
swelled to a record 38.37 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter,
bringing the 1986 deficit to a record 147.71 billion dlrs.
    Volcker called on educators to stress the development of
basic reading, writing and mathematics skills and urged them to
help students adapt to the fast-changing economic climate.
    Volcker said the challenge was greatest in the education of
low-income minority groups such as blacks and Hispanics.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7543>
South Korea's current account surplus
narrowed to 419 mln dlrs in February from 679 mln in January
compared with a deficit of 112 mln dlrs in February last year,
provisional Bank of Korea figures show.
    The current account in the two months of January and
February swung to a surplus of 1.1 billion dlrs from a deficit
of 494 mln dlrs in the same 1986 period.
    The February trade surplus narrowed to 235 mln dlrs from
582 mln in January compared with a deficit of 98 mln dlrs a
year ago.
    The overall balance of payments surplus rose to 840 mln
dlrs in February from 716 mln in January and 76 mln in February
1986.
    Exports were 2.86 billion dlrs in February against 2.83
billion in January and 2.23 billion in February last year.
Imports were 2.63 billion against 2.25 billion and 2.32
billion.
    The February invisible trade surplus rose to 109 mln dlrs
from 24 mln in January and compared with a deficit of 74 mln a
year ago.
    The transfer payments surplus widened to 75 mln dlrs in
February from 73 mln in January and 60 mln a year ago.
    The long-term capital account surplus was 198 mln dlrs in
February against 211 mln in January and 55 mln in February last
year. The short-term capital account surplus was 87 mln dlrs
against 46 mln and 158 mln.
    The errors and omissions account left a surplus of 840 mln
dlrs in February against deficits of 220 mln in January and 25
mln in February 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7600>
Taiwan's leading industrial organisation
said it will send its first buying mission to the U.S. Later
this year in an effort to reduce the country's trade surplus
with Washington.
    A spokesman for the Chinese National Federation of
Industries told Reuters the mission was part of a broader plan
to switch large purchases to the U.S. From Japan.
    The Federation groups all of Taiwan's major industrial
associations. Last year its members purchased about 4.5 billion
U.S. Dlrs worth of industrial products from Japan and about 1.8
billion from the U.S.
    The spokesman said Federation members were now discussing
the volume of business they could transfer to America.
    He said they had drawn up a list of about 80 industrial
products they would be shopping for in the U.S. During the
buying mission in September, but he could give no figure on how
much would be spent.
    A Board of Foreign Trade official told Reuters the
government would send two buying missions to America between
June and July this year and might send others later.
    Taiwan's trade surplus with the U.S. Rose to a record 13.6
billion dlrs last year from 10.2 billion in 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7626>
The U.S. Senate has unanimously
called for President Reagan immediately to force Japan to live
up to a pledge to stop dumping its microchips and open its
markets to U.S. Chipmakers.
    The Senate voted 93 to 0 to urge Reagan to impose penalties
on Japanese high-technology products containing semiconductors
in retaliation for what it sees as Japan's violations of the
semiconductor pact.
    While the measure does not bind Reagan to any action,
Senate leaders said its adoption would warn Japan stiffer
legislation would be considered if the violations continue.
    "We want to send a message to Japan to let it know how the
Senate feels about this matter," Senate Democratic Leader Robert
Byrd told the Senate.
    Senate Finance Committee chairman Lloyd Bentsen told the
Senate the measure was not aimed at retaliation but at
correcting Japan's unfair trade practices.
    A key House trade lawmaker, Representative Richard Gephardt
also announced he would seek to force Japan and other countries
with huge trade surpluses to slash their surplus by 10 pct a
year for three years.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7628>
Japan's economic policies face fierce
international attack as hopes fade of a substantial drop in its
trade surplus, international monetary sources said.
    At a meeting this week in Paris, senior government
officials from major nations are considering an Organisation
for Economic Cooperation and Development (OECD) staff report
that forecasts a continuing large Japanese trade surplus, they
said.
    Though Japanese exports have become more expensive with the
yen's sharp rise against the dollar, they still tend to surge
when growth picks up, according to the OECD.
    As a solution, the OECD staff has urged Japan to redirect
its export-driven economy, boosting domestic demand and imports
by adopting a more flexible fiscal policy, they said.
    That recommendation echoes calls made recently at secret
meetings of the International Monetary Fund's executive board.
    The monetary sources said Japan's policy was criticized
when the board met to consider the country's economy under the
annual consultations it holds with each of its members.
    The United States, which until recently has been reluctant
to criticize Japan's fiscal stance, joined in the attack, he
said.
    The IMF staff has also cast doubt on the Japanese
government's forecast of 3.5 pct economic growth in the fiscal
year beginning April 1. Most independent forecasters, including
the IMF, believe that growth in calendar 1987 will be below
three pct, monetary sources said.
    The Finance Ministry has been particularly sensitive to
such criticism because it is already under mounting domestic
pressure to boost an economy hard-hit by the yen's rise. The
yen's climb has lost exporters sales and profits in the huge
American market.
    Tokyo is also eager to avoid any suggestion that a further
yen rise might be needed to cut its trade surplus, which last
year amounted to a record 93 billion dlrs.
    Japan cannot tolerate a further rise of the yen, Foreign
Minister Tadashi Kuranari said recently. The yen closed here
today at 151.53 to the dollar. Most Japanese politicians,
including Finance Minister Kiichi Miyazawa, are clearly hoping
the yen will weaken, government officials said.
    At a meeting in Paris last month, Britain, Canada, France,
Japan, the United States and West Germany, agreed to cooperate
to hold currencies at around current levels.
    Officials said that wording represented a compromise.
Miyazawa hopes the agreement will hold the yen stable for a few
months, before it weakens later in the year.
    Japan wanted the Paris communique to imply a higher value
for the dollar, perhaps by substituting the word "recent" for
"current," while the United States wanted it to more clearly
point to the dollar's weaker levels now, perhaps by use of the
word "present," they said.
    In the months leading up the February 22 agreement, the
dollar dropped some 10 yen.
    The officials also sought to discredit suggestions in the
market that recent U.S. Action to prevent the dollar from
rising above 1.87 marks pointed to a 153 to 155 yen ceiling for
the U.S. Currency.
    Japan has also attacked OECD forecasts, which it says do
not take account of the structural changes in the Japanese
economy that will be triggered by the strong yen.
    Officials said there are already signs of that. More and
more companies have announced plans to move production
facilities offshore to take advantage of cheaper costs abroad,
they said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7632>
Japanese Agriculture Ministry officials
said a study of agriculture subsidies by the Organisation for
Economic Cooperation and Development, OECD, is still under way
and will be completed sometime next month.
    The officials said the study has been inaccurate so far,
and they said Japan would comment on the final results.
    A Reuter report from Washington yesterday said the study
has found that Japan has the highest agriculture subsidies in
the world and that dairy farmers benefit more than any other
commodity producers from subsidies. The study has not been
officially released due to objections from some countries.
    Japan has withdrawn its objection and decided to accept the
release of the study, the agriculture ministry officials said.
OECD directors are expected to approve the release at a meeting
in mid-May.
    One agriculture ministry source said the study so far was
based on the years 1979-81. Japanese subsidies have dropped
sharply since then, partly because of tight budgetary policy,
and foreign currency factors have also changed, he said.
    "The study is ... Unfair and unacceptable because it does
not take account of various differences in farming conditions
in each country, such as geography," the source said.
    He said it is highly likely that the final study will show
Japan has the highest farm subsidies in the world.
    "This would increase foreign pressure to open Japan's farm
market further, but this would have little impact on Japan's
agriculture policy," he said, without giving further details.
    A main purpose of the study is to clarify export subsidies
by major exporting nations like the United States and the
European Community, but Japan is a major importer, he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7633>
Federal Reserve Board
Chairman Paul Volcker said the U.S. Trade deficit is a
challenge for the U.S. Equal to the Soviet Union launching of
Sputnik.
    "The international challenge implicit in our huge trade
deficit has become the 1980s equivalent to the launch of
Sputnik by the Russians in the 1950s, when we suddenly feared
we were to be left in the wake of Soviet technological
achievement," he said in an address to Florida educators.
     He said the trade problem underscored the need to reform
the U.S. Educational system to improve economic performance.
    The Commerce Department reported last week that the
nation's trade gap, calculated on a balance-of-payments basis,
swelled to a record 38.37 billion dlrs in the fourth quarter,
bringing the 1986 deficit to a record 147.71 billion dlrs.
    Volcker called on educators to stress the development of
basic reading, writing and mathematics skills and urged them to
help students adapt to the fast-changing economic climate.
    Volcker said the challenge was greatest in the education of
low-income minority groups such as blacks and Hispanics.
           
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7640>
Indian and Australian businessmen
signed a memorandum of understanding to boost two-way trade and
joint industrial ventures in both countries, spokesmen of the
Indo-Australia Business Council told reporters.
    The Indian Council said it hoped India's exports to
Australia would improve in the next few months and reduce the
trade balance which is heavily in Australia's favour.
    In 1986 Australia sold 428 mln Australian dlrs' worth of
goods, including steel and coking coal, to India and bought
170.5 mln worth of items, including cotton textiles, from India.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7643>
The European Community (EC) and
Soviet-led Comecon ended talks here, having made progress on
setting up formal trade relations, but no breakthrough because
of Comecon's refusal to recognise West Berlin as part of the
EC, delegates said.
    Negotiators were trying to reach agreement on the draft of
a joint declaration setting up official relations after 30
years of mutual non-recognition. John Maslen, head of the EC
delegation, told Reuters as he emerged from the final session:
"We made some progress, but we have called for another meeting."
    Officials, who asked not to be named, said the Comecon team
had refused to accept a clause in the draft declaration which
would recognise West Berlin as part of the 12-nation EC.
    Under the 1957 Treaty of Rome all contracts and agreements
signed by the Community must contain this territorial clause
stipulating West Berlin is an integral part of the EC. An EC
negotiator taking part in the three-day talks said: "We wanted
the territorial clause in, but Comecon said no."
    A joint statement issued after the talks said progress was
made towards clarifying positions, but another meeting would be
necessary to complete the work.
    Any decision in principle to set up relations would require
approval by the Community's Council of Ministers and by the
executive committee of Comecon.
    Zdzislaw Kuroski, deputy director of Comecon, who heads the
East bloc delegation, told Reuters ahead of today's session: "We
have narrowed our differences on a range of questions, but not
on all questions."
    Asked whether Comecon would accept EC insistence that any
joint declaration stipulate West Berlin as part of the
Community, he replied: "This question is not contained in the
draft which our side presented."
    West German diplomats said they would insist on including
the clause on West Berlin in any EC-Comecon agreement.
    The talks followed an earlier round between the two trading
blocs here last September and the first-ever direct talks
between the EC and the Soviet Union on establishing diplomatic
relations in January.
    The EC trades with individual Comecon member states despite
non-recognition of Comecon. Last year, the EC had a five
billion dlr trade deficit with East European states, about half
the deficit of the previous year, due to a drop in the price of
Soviet oil imported by the EC.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7662>
Australian Treasurer Paul Keating said
he expects the country's 1986/87 current account deficit to be
one billion dlrs lower than the 14.7 billion forecast in the
August budget. Keating told a financiers' dinner that
February's 750 mln dlr deficit, against January's 1.23 billion,
was "in the groove" of the government's expectations.
    "We will probably bring the current account this year under
14 billion, I think, which will probably be about a billion
dollars less than we forecast in the budget," Keating said. "I am
sure we will see a lower current account deficit for next year
... And a fall as proportion of GDP."
    Australia posted a 13.82 billion dlr current account
deficit in 1985/86 and Keating said the latest monthly figures
showed an encouraging trend.
    Keating said the government would maintain responsible
economic management regardless of whether it was drawn into an
election, because it would take time to stabilise Australia's
80 billion dlr foreign debt.
    "We have to build the import competing sector back," he said.
"We are now trying to rebuild our capital structure. We are
trying to rebuild the culture of productivity and
manufacturing."
    Keating said the foundation for a transition of the economy
had been laid with the floating of the Australian dollar and
continued with wage restraint and deregulation.
    The Government would follow with spending cuts in its
economic statement on May 14, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7771>
The European Community Commission has
charged the United States with breaking international trade
rules by excluding Dutch-made fibres from the U.S. Market and
said it would take the issue to the world trade body GATT.
    In the latest of a series of trade disputes with
Washington, the executive authority alleged that a section of
the U.S. Tariff Act was incompatible with the GATT (General
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade) because it discriminated
against imported products in favour of domestically-produced
goods.
    The Commission said it would ask Geneva-based GATT to rule
on whether the section in question, which officials said had
proved a barrier to many EC exporters, conformed to its rules.
    Commission officials did not rule out retaliatory measures
if, after a GATT decision against it, Washington failed to
bring the disputed section into line with international rules.
    The executive's decision to go to GATT follows a complaint
to it by the Dutch company Akzo &lt;AKZO.AS>, whose "aramid"
synthetic fibres have been banned from the U.S. Market because
of charges by the U.S. Firm &lt;Dupont> that the fibres violate
the American company's patents.
    Akzo alleged that the ban, imposed by the U.S.
International Trade Commission (ITC), was discriminatory and
incompatible with GATT provisions.
    The dispute centres on the fact that section 337 of the
U.S. Tariff Act gives the ITC jurisdiction  over imported
products. The EC Commission charged that EC producers did not
have the same possibilities for defending themselves before the
ITC as they would have in a normal U.S. Court.
    "Consequently the procedure followed...Is less favourable
than that which takes places in normal courts of law for goods
produced in the United States," it said in a statement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7802>
The U.S. Will pursue its complaint that
European governments unfairly subsidise the Airbus Industrie
aircraft consortium in proceedings at the GATT civil aircraft
committee, a GATT spokesman said today.
    The U.S. Presented its case for the first time to the
aircraft committee of the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade (GATT) during a special two-day session ending today.
GATT rules cover some 80 pct of world commerce.
    The 20-member committee agreed to open debate on the U.S.
Complaint, starting with informal consultations and then
holding a special session in July, trade officials said.
    "The tension has eased," the permanent trade ambassador of
the 12-member European Community Tran Van Thinh told reporters.
"The U.S. Has decided to go through proper channels."
    U.S. Trade officials again made clear their anger over what
they call unfair government support for Airbus, voiced during a
visit to European capitals in February.
    In a letter calling for the special committee meeting,
Washington charged France, West Germany, the U.K., Spain and
the EC Commission with unfair practices on behalf of Airbus.
    The U.S. Charges that the Europeans are violating rules
laid down in the 1979 Agreement on Trade in Civil Aircraft.
    Washington presented its reading of rules on inducement to
purchase aircraft and support for development of airlines
during the special session and asked the committee to confirm
its view.
    Official sources in the delegations said the U.S. Views
would be considered during the informal consultations but the
Europeans would also be free to bring up any complaints against
American civil aircraft practices.
    Some delegates said the U.S. Position appeared to give such
broad interpretation to the rules as to suggest that the civil
aircraft accord needed re-negotiating. All these matters would
be considered during the informal meetings.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7804>
A panel of four leading economists
told a congressional hearing today that foreign economies will
need to expand to avoid recession as the U.S. trade deficit
declines.
    C. Fred Bergsten, a former senior Treasury Department
official, and Robert Solomon of the Brookings Institution told
the Senate Foreign Relations Committee, the major exporting
countries risk recession if they do not expand because U.S.
demand for imports is expected to fall.
    "They need to beef up domestic demand as their trade
surplus falls," or unemployment will keep growing, Bergsten
said.
    Bergsten predicted the U.S. trade deficit, which hit 169
billion dlrs last year, will fall 30-40 billion dlrs a year for
the next two years as a result of the dollar's 35-40 pct
decline since September 1985.
    The government should intervene to push the dollar down
further if the previous declines do not lead to an improvement
in the trade picture, if the U.S. budget deficit is not reduced
and if foreign expansion does not occur, he added.
    Solomon said the dollar must fall further to compensate for
the huge interest payments required on U.S. foreign debt. The
Paris agreement between the major industrialized countries
provided only for a pause in its decline, he said.
    Rimmer de Vries, senior vice president of Morgan Guaranty
Trust Co., said the U.S. trade deficit problem is a problem of
lagging growth in industrial economies, prolonged currency
misalignment, debt problems of the developing countries, and
unbalanced growth in the Asian industrializing countries.
    John Makin of the American Enterprise Institute, suggested
foreign tax cuts to increase demand and pick up the slack from
the U.S. trade deficit fall.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=7907>
Japan has agreed to drop barriers to
American-caught herring and pollock, opening the way for
shipments that could reach 300 mln dlrs annually, U.S. Trade
Representative Clayton Yeutter announced.
    Yeutter said the accord was reached after extensive
bilateral negotiations that ended earlier today in Tokyo.
    He said the Commerce Department estimated U.S. shipments of
processed pollock products and herring should rise to 85 mln
dlrs this year and to more than 300 mln dlrs annually in later
years.
    There was no immediate assessment of the value of current
U.S. shipments, but officials said the pact would lift quotas
to the point that Americans would be able to ship nearly all
the pollock and herring ordered by Japanese firms.
    At the same time, Yeutter said Washington was temporarily
suspending a complaint with the General Agreement on Tariffs
and Trade (GATT) that Japan was unfairly curbing imports of the
two fish.
    He said the complaint would be reviewed later this year
after an assessment to see if Japan lived up to the agreement.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8029>
Trade is the most urgent problem
facing U.S.-Canadian relations because of a pressing need to
reach a new bilateral pact within the coming months, Joe Clark,
Canadian secretary of state for external affairs, said.
    Negotiators for the two countries have been meeting for
more than a year in an effort to work out an agreement.
    "The most urgent problem now is the trade question because
that has to be decided within the next 10 months," Clark told
the Commonwealth Club of California. "We have a fast track
authority from your Congress for approval or rejection of
whatever the negotiators achieve."
    Clark said that, as a practical matter, an initial
agreement must be reached by late September or early October.
    He listed environmental questions, particularly acid rain,
and defense as the second and third most important bilateral
issues facing Ottawa and Washington.
    On Wednesday, President Reagan announced that he will seek
2.5 billion dlrs from Congress to address the acid rain
problem. Some interpreted the move as a goodwill gesture in
advance of his annual meeting, on April 5-6 in Ottawa, with
Prime Minister Brian Mulroney.
    In a question-and-answer session with the public affairs
group, Clark said that the two countries must find better
mechanisms for resolving their trade disputes.
    "This rash of countervailing actions, where we acted on
corn and you acted on soft wood and we both said they were
quasijudicial -- the dispute resolution mechanisims in place
now are not working adequately in either of our interests," he
said.
    Ottawa also is seeking to change some of Washington's rules
on government procurement that penalize Canadian businesses, he
said.
    "There are a number of Canadian companies that, in order to
secure substantial contracts in the United States, have had to
move their head offices out of our country into your country
because you have national procurement requirements," he said.
    In turn, he added, the United States would like to change
some of the procurement requirements that exist at the
provincial government level in Canada.
    Clark declined to forecast the outcome of the discussions.
    "What will come out of it remains for the negotiators, in
the first instance, to propose, and then governments and
congresses will have judge," he said.
    In his prepared remarks, Clark said that the United States
has tended to take Canada for granted, although it exports to
its northern neighbor more than twice what it exports to Japan.
"Yet you bought almost 10 per cent more from Japan last year
than you bought from Canada," he said. REUTER
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8044>
The United States will likely impose
sanctions soon on imports of Japanese microchips, senators said
today after a private meeting with Commerce Secretary Malcolm
Baldrige.
    Although the senators said Baldrige told them no decision
would be taken until a final determination is made on whether
Japanese microchips were dumped in the United States, they said
they were virtually sure Japan would face penalties.
    President Reagan's trade policy advisory group, of which
Baldrige is a member, will meet on the issue Wednesday.
    "I am confident we will see action taken," Sen. John McCain,
an Arizona Republican, told reporters.
    "I am expecting sanctions at least, and even more than
sanctions," Sen. Pete Domenici, a New Mexico Republican, said.
    The senators, several congressmen and U.S. semiconductor
industry representatives met with Baldrige and State Department
officials to discuss Japan's alleged violations of a September
1986 agreement to stop dumping its microchips in the United
States and other countries.
    They recommended Japanese firms be penalized through
tariffs or import duties over the next six to 12 months for
continuing to dump microchips. The violations were worth 100
mln dls to the Japanese semiconductor industry, they said.
    Asked if Baldrige intended to recommend sanctions, Sen.
Pete Wilson told reporters, "The clear import of what he said is
that there will be."
    "Japan can't just say they will comply. We think sanctions
must be applied," for past violations of the agreement, the
California Republican said.
    The semiconductor industry produces microprocessor chips
which are used in high technology products ranging from radios
to defence missile guidance systems.
    Sen. James McClure, an Idaho Republican, said Baldrige told
them the administration had not made a final determination that
Japanese companies had dumped semiconductor microchips below
the cost of production in the United States or other countries.
    But McClure said senators told him, "There is no doubt
dumping is going on," based on evidence such as invoices of
purchases of the Japanese products.
    The two countries signed a pact last September in which
Japan agreed to stop selling its microchips in the United
States and other countries below production costs and to allow
the U.S. semiconductor industry access to the Japanese market.
    In return, the United States waived its right to impose
import duties on the Japanese microchips.
    Japanese officials have said they have lived up to the pact
and have asked Japanese chip-makers to further slash output to
save the pact.
    Japan has frequently been the target of congressional
discouragement over last year's record 169-billion-dlr trade
deficit. Tokyo had a 59-billion-dlr surplus with the United
States last year and had large surpluses with other countries.
    The Senate yesterday unanimously passed a resolution
calling for action against Japan for violations of the pact
since September. The resolution will be introduced in the House
next week by Rep. Bob Matsui, a California Democrat.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8080>
Ministers from more than 20
nations were told by New Zealand that the next international
negotiations on liberalising trade would be the last this
century and the cost of failure could not be measured.
    Trade minister Mike Moore told his colleagues at a
welcoming ceremony before two days of talks here that great
progress had been made in preparing for the negotiations which
must not be sidetracked.
    "We live in troubled and dangerous times for the world
trading system," he said.
    "We have seen that the failure of the world trading system
has caused great depression and conflict in the past. Our
failure to maintain the momentum will be at great cost to us
all," Moore said.
    He added: "The cost of failure is beyond calculation. It is
our last hope and best opportunity this century. We will not
get another chance before the year 2000."
    The ministers are in New Zealand to review world trade
since the "Uruguay round" talks last Sepember. The meeting is
also part of preparations for a full-scale conference of the
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) in Venice in
June.
    The Uruguay meeting is considered by most countries to have
been particularly successful, with northern hemisphere
countries managing to have service industries such as banking
and insurance included in the next full round.
    The southerners' goal of including agricultural and
tropical products also was met.
    The meeting at this North Island tourist resort is
described by participants as informal and no declaration is
expected.
    Moore said one aim was to "instil a sense of political
urgency to avert potential economic tragedy."
    Another was to seek ways of popularising freer trade to
people who felt the pain of readjustment but could not see the
benefits, as well as preventing "bush fires of confrontation
while we proceed with orderly negotiations."
    The meeting is being attended by 25 overseas delegations
including representatives of GATT and the Economic Community.
    The delegates include U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter.
    American sources say he is ready to state that the best way
to reverse protectionist sentiment in the United States is to
implement four key Uruguay proposals:
    -- an end to agricultural subsidies;
    -- inclusion of trade in services and investments in GATT
regulations;
    -- tightening of restrictions on pirating of so-called
intellectual property such as trademarks, patents and
copyrights;
    -- new rules to resolve trade disputes among GATT's 92
member states.
    Earlier, New Zealand sources had said French Foreign Trade
Minister Michel Noir had pulled out of the informal GATT talks
for domestic political reasons.
    Cabinet chief Bernard Prauge will lead the French
delegation.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8102>
Long term pressure by trade
ministers is necessary if the current Uruguay round of talks on
the General Agreement on Trade and Tariffs (GATT) is to
succeed, New Zealand's Overseas Trade minister Mike Moore said.
    Moore told the opening meeting of trade ministers from 22
nations gathered for informal talks on the GATT that ministers
"need opportunities to keep in touch and to consider how the
political problems inherent in an exercise like this one can be
faced and resolved."
    Moore said the Taupo meeting is one of a series of such
international gatherings, which includes the OECD ministerial
meeting in May and the G-7 meeting in Venice in June, enabling
ministers to maintain contact.
    World trade conditions are getting better not worse, he
said.
    He said New Zealand is "moving rapidly and of our own
initiative in the direction of liberalisation, and I warn you
we shall be looking for partners."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8106>
The United States and Japan
are on the brink of serious conflict on trade, especially over
semiconductors, Japanese unwillingness for public bodies to buy
U.S. Super-computers, and barriers to U.S. Firms seeking to
participate in the eight billion dlr Kansai airport project,
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter said.
    He was talking to reporters yesterday on the eve of a
two-day meeting of trade ministers which will review progress
made by committees set up after the Uruguay meeting last
September launched a new round of GATT (General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade) talks.
    European Community (EC) commissioner Willy de Clercq
meanwhile told reporters conflict between the world's three
major trading and economic powers -- the EC, the U.S. And Japan
-- set a poor example for other members of GATT.
    Australian Trade Minister John Dawkins told the reporters
bilateral retaliation at the enormous expense of the rest of
the world was no way to solve trade disputes.
    New Zealand trade minister Mike Moore told his colleagues
great progress had been made in preparing for the current round
of GATT negotiations which must not be sidetracked.
    The ministers have said they want to maintain the momentum
towards fresh negotiations or avert serious trade conflicts.
    Yeutter said the problem with international trade talks was
that they tended to get bogged down for years. "Countries don't
get very serious about negotiating until the end of the day
which is, maybe, five or six years in the future."
    He also said he did not consider the new U.S. Congress as
protectionist as it was 18 months ago. "That's a very healthy
development," he added."If you asked me about that a year or 18
months ago I would have said that it was terribly
protectionist."
    "Members of Congress, that is the contemplative members of
Congress, have begun to realise protectionism is not the answer
to the 170 billion dlr trade deficit," Yeutter said.
    "They've also begun to realise that you cannot legislate
solutions to a 170 billion dollar trade deficit so they are
more realistic and, in my judgement, more responsible on that
issue than they were 12 or 18 months ago."
    He added, "Whether that will be reflected in the legislation
that eventually emerges is another matter."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8132>
Taiwan is expected to boost agricultural
imports from the U.S. And Europe in calendar 1987 to help
balance trade, the Council of Agriculture said.
    A council official, who declined to be named, told Reuters
the imports, which will include about seven mln tonnes of
oilseeds, grains and dairy products, would be worth some four
billion U.S. Dlrs against 3.72 billion in 1986 and 3.38 billion
in 1985.
    Taiwan's surplus with the U.S. Rose to 13.6 billion dlrs
last year from 10.2 billion in 1985, government figures show.
    Government figures also show Taiwan's surplus with Europe
rose to 1.53 billion dlrs last year from 543 mln in 1985.
    Taiwan's imports of U.S. Farm produce last year amounted to
1.41 billion dlrs against 1.52 billion in 1985.
    Imports from Europe rose to 182 mln U.S. Dlrs from 148 mln,
the official said.
    He attributed the decline in the value of U.S. Imports to
falling agricultural products prices last year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8135>
Debt among African countries
will continue to grow and their economies remain stifled unless
developed countries lower their interest rates, Nigerian Trade
Minister Samaila Mamman said.
    He told an informal General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
(GATT) meeting the widening gap between developed and
developing countries and an inequitable international economic
system were major impediments to growth in developing
countries.
    Delegates from 23 countries are attending the GATT talks in
the New Zealand resort of Taupo.
    "I wish to emphasise that the growth in the volume of the
external indebtedness of African countries reflects the full
effect of the deflationary monetary and trade policies of the
developed market economy countries," Mamman said.
    "The developed market economy countries have slowed down
output growth thereby drying up markets for the commodity
exports of African countries."
    Mamman said the World Bank estimated 35.3 billion dlrs a
year would be needed over the next five years for the African
continent to be able to achieve a gross domestic product growth
(GDP) rate of three to four pct by 1990.
    Yet at the same time Africa's debt service was estimated at
24.5 billion dlrs a year between 1986 and 1990.
    "With the best of intentions Africa cannot attain a three to
four pct GDP growth rate if the current high level of debt
persists," Mamman said. Developed countries must seek
alternatives to policies that resulted in the transfer of
resources and more indebtedness, he said.
    "The international community cannot fail to respond
positively to the collapse of the international market for
commodities ... And act quickly to stabilize demand and prices
of our commodity exports," he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8138>
The Philippines posted a trade deficit
of 68 mln dlrs in January, compared with deficits of 57 mln in
January 1986 and 28 mln in December, government figures show.
    The National Census and Statistics Office (NCSO) said
imports of 436 mln dlrs in January were up from 371 mln in
January 1986 and 393 mln dlrs in December, while exports of 368
mln were up on the 314 mln in January 1986 but lower than
December's 421 mln.
    The country's 1987-92 medium-term development plan targets
a 9.8 pct average annual growth in exports and a 10.7 pct
growth in imports, the NCSO said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8141>
Japan has assured a meeting
of trade ministers it is making every effort to expand domestic
demand and restructure its economy.
    Japanese trade representative Tsomu Hata told an informal
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) meeting that, in
addition to demand boosting measures adopted last September, a
comprehensive economic program will be prepared after the
1987/88 budget is approved.
    Hata, speaking at the first session of the two-day meeting,
said agriculture is no exception to the goal of restructuring
the economy, but did not elaborate.
    Hata said protectionist pressures in the international
economy are as strong as ever, reflecting financial deficits,
payment imbalances and serious unemployment in many countries.
    Despite great potential, developing economies are still
confronted by grave difficulties, particularly debt, he added.
    The basis for the talks is the GATT ministerial declaration
last September in Punta del Este, Uruguay, and the subsequent
trade negotiating plan agreed in Geneva.
    "It is essential that we first reaffirm here our commitment
to implementing that plan as scheduled," Hata said.
    Hata added it is not constructive to speed up negotiations
in some areas at the expense of others.
    In order to rebuild the free trade system, it is important
for each participant to have domestic policies that will serve
this end.
    As part of its contribution, Japan plans in April to
fundamentally improve its generalised system of preferences for
industrial and mining products to make Japan's domestic market
more open to developing countries, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8149>
Indonesia's non-oil and gas exports
fell to 5.79 billion dlrs in calendar 1986 from 5.98 billion in
1985, according to Bank Indonesia figures.
    Coffee exports rose to 753 mln dlrs from 580 mln in 1985,
but rubber shipments fell to 625 mln from 720 mln and tin to
180.6 mln from 246 mln, weekly central bank figures show.
    Indonesia hopes to boost its non-oil exports to make up for
oil revenue lost because of lower prices. But the lower value
of commodities such as timber, rubber, palm oil and tea on
world markets has prevented this, despite a 31 pct devaluation
of the rupiah against the dollar in September.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8151>
Australian Trade Minister
John Dawkins said if the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
(GATT) does not give high priority to agricultural trade reform
it will be neglecting the area of greatest crisis.
    In a statement to the informal GATT trade ministers
conference here he said agriculture is a problem which involves
all countries and seriously affects the debt servicing
abilities of a number of developing countries.
     He said major countries should be showing leadership on
this problem.
    "We will be giving close attention to the processes in the
OECD (Organisation of Economic Cooperation and Development) and
elsewhere leading to the Venice economic summit where we will
be looking to the participants to adopt a strong commitment to
agricultural trade reform," Dawkins said.
    The Venice summit is scheduled for June.
    He said Australia's interests in the Uruguay Round, the
eighth under the GATT, are wide ranging. Dawkins said he sees
the round as providing a timely opportunity to secure further
meaningful trade liberalisation in all sectors and to restore
confidence in the multilateral system.
    Dawkins said initial meetings of the negotiating groups
established in Geneva after the GATT declaration last September
in Punta del Este, Uruguay, have made a reasonable start, but
it is vital that trade ministers maintain the pressure on these
processes.
    "We must see that the commitments made at Punta del Este on
standstill and rollback are carried into practice."
    The standstill and rollback of protection offers the global
trading system a chance to hold and wind back protection during
the negotiations which are expected to last up to four years,
he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8153>
Japan is expected to post a 3.6 pct rise
in real gross national product in 1987/88, higher than the
official 3.5 pct target, a private economic institute said.
    The Research Institute on National Economy said in a report
the economy will start picking up in the April-June quarter,
partly because of an improvement in earnings performance and
capital spending in manufacturing industries.
    The institute assumed an average exchange rate in the year
starting April 1 of 150 yen to the dollar. It predicted the
Bank of Japan will not change the official discount rate in the
year.
    The institute forecast that Japan's exports will gradually
rise in the year in volume terms as the dollar's fall in the
past 18 months is likely to help prop up the U.S. Economy.
    Japan's trade surplus is expected to narrow slightly to
90.2 billion dlrs in 1987/88 ending March 31 from an estimated
98 billion in the current fiscal year, it said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8156>
Philippines Trade and
Industry Secretary Jose Concepcion told world trade ministers
he wondered if their agreement was of any real value after the
European Community (EC) imposed a levy on vegetable oils.
    Concepcion, speaking at an informal meeting of the General
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) here, said ministers
declared in Uruguay last September that the trade of
less-developed nations should not be disrupted.
    He said the EC not only ignored Manila's request for lower
tariffs on coconut oil but introduced a levy on vegetable oils
and fats that are vital exports for Southeast Asian countries.
    Concepcion said while the levy might be rejected by the EC
Council of Ministers, he noted that "I cannot help but wonder
whether the agreements we produce in meetings like this are of
any real value."
    He also said industrialised nations saved about 65 billion
U.S. Dlrs in 1985 through low commodity prices, but this had
affected the ability of developing nations to import goods and
services.
    "The health and the growth of world trade requires that the
new development of developing countries losing their share of
world trade be arrested and reversed," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8158>
Burma's debt service ratio will have
fallen to 48.8 pct in the fiscal year to end-March 1987 from 50
pct in 1985-1986, the official Council of People's Inspectors
(CPI) reported.
    Western diplomats in Rangoon estimate the figure at above
70 pct and say the country can no longer depend on foreign
exchange reserves to cover more than a few weeks' imports.
    The CPI, which oversees government spending, said in its
latest report to parliament that foreign currency reserves fell
to a record low of 407.9 mln kyats in September 1986 from 430.3
mln in March 1986. Earlier figures were not available.
    Debt servicing cost Burma 1.62 billion kyats in 1985-1986
while foreign exchange earnings -- export revenues plus loans
and aid -- totalled 3.23 billion kyats in the same period, the
council said.
    Later figures were not available.
    Burma, which diplomats here say now has foreign debts of up
to 3.4 billion dlrs, has applied to the United Nations to be
reclassified as one of the world's least developed countries in
order to qualify for softer loan and grant aid.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8173>
French gross domestic product should grow
by 2.3 pct in 1988 after two pct growth this year and 2.1 pct
in 1986, the Finance Ministry said.
    The latest forecast, prepared by the National Accounts and
Budget Commission, assumed an exchange rate of 6.20 francs to
the dollar this year and next and an average oil import price
rising to 18.9 dlrs a barrel next year from 17.4 dlrs this year
and 14.7 in 1986.
    The Commission, headed by Finance minister Edouard
Balladur, forecast a fall in consumer price inflation to two
pct year-on-year at end-1988 from 2.4 pct at end 1987 and 2.1
pct last year.
    In annual average terms inflation would fall to two pct in
1988 from 2.5 pct this year and 2.7 pct last year, it said.
    Trade should show a one billion franc annual surplus this
year and next after last year's 0.5 billion surplus, it added.
    Employment should rise by 0.1 pct a year over the next two
years while the state budget deficit should be cut to 2.2 pct
of GDP in 1988 from 2.6 pct this year and 2.9 pct in 1986.
    Other forecasts prepared by the Commission indicated a 1.8
pct 1988 rise in household purchasing power, up from 1.1 pct
this year but less than last year's 2.9 pct, and a 1.6 pct rise
in household consumption, compared with this year's 1.5 pct and
last year's 2.9 pct.
    Business investment is forecast to rise four pct a year
this year and next after 3.7 pct last year, with private sector
productive investment rising 4.9 pct in 1988 after a six pct
rise this year and 5.5 pct in 1986.
    The Ministry said updated forecasts would be prepared
before the autumn to serve as the basis for the 1988 budget,
which the government is now preparing for presentation in
September.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8174>
Denmark's balance of payments on
current account was provisionally put at zero in February,
against a 181 mln crown surplus in January and a 1.5 billion
deficit in February 1986, the National Statistics Office said.
    Exports rose to 13.94 billion crowns in February from 12.53
billion in January, against 14.16 billion in February last
year. February imports rose to 13.94 billion from 12.35 billion
in January, against 15.67 billion in February 1986.
    The February figure provisionally gives a trade surplus for
1987 of 180 mln crowns, against a 3.04 billion deficit in the
same 1986 period.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8186>
The United States and Japan
are on the brink of serious conflict on trade, especially over
semiconductors, Japanese unwillingness for public bodies to buy
U.S. Super-computers, and barriers to U.S. Firms seeking to
participate in the eight billion dlr Kansai airport project,
U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter said.
    He was talking to reporters yesterday on the eve of a
two-day meeting of trade ministers which will review progress
made by committees set up after the Uruguay meeting last
September launched a new round of GATT (General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade) talks.
    European Community (EC) commissioner Willy de Clercq
meanwhile told reporters conflict between the world's three
major trading and economic powers -- the EC, the U.S. And Japan
-- set a poor example for other members of GATT.
    Australian Trade Minister John Dawkins told the reporters
bilateral retaliation at the enormous expense of the rest of
the world was no way to solve trade disputes.
    New Zealand trade minister Mike Moore told his colleagues
great progress had been made in preparing for the current round
of GATT negotiations which must not be sidetracked.
    The ministers have said they want to maintain the momentum
towards fresh negotiations or avert serious trade conflicts.
    Yeutter said the problem with international trade talks was
that they tended to get bogged down for years. "Countries don't
get very serious about negotiating until the end of the day
which is, maybe, five or six years in the future."
    He also said he did not consider the new U.S. Congress as
protectionist as it was 18 months ago. "That's a very healthy
development," he added."If you asked me about that a year or 18
months ago I would have said that it was terribly
protectionist."
    "Members of Congress, that is the contemplative members of
Congress, have begun to realise protectionism is not the answer
to the 170 billion dlr trade deficit," Yeutter said.
    "They've also begun to realise that you cannot legislate
solutions to a 170 billion dollar trade deficit so they are
more realistic and, in my judgement, more responsible on that
issue than they were 12 or 18 months ago."
    He added, "Whether that will be reflected in the legislation
that eventually emerges is another matter."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8189>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
again said the meeting of six major industrial nations in Paris
last month did not establish a target exchange rate for the
dollar.
    Baker said in a television interview aired here yesterday:
"We don't have a target for the dollar." He declined to comment
on what might be a desired level for the dollar, saying: "We
really don't talk about the dollar."
    He said protectionism was becoming "extremely strong" in the
U.S. In response to widening U.S. Trade deficits and import
barriers in other countries.
    "The mood in the United States is extremely disturbing. It's
extremely strong," he said.
    "As I've said before, we sort of see ourselves as engaged
here in a real struggle to preserve the world's free trading
system, because if the largest market in the world (the U.S.)
goes protectionist we run the risk of moving down the same path
that the world did in the late 1930s," he said.
    While relative exchange rates had a role to play in
defusing the threat of protectionism, it alone did not offer
any solution, he said.
    "You must address this problem on the exchange rate side,
but it cannot be solved on the exchange rate side alone. It's
far more comprehensive and broad than that, and the solution of
it requires a comprehensive approach," Baker said in the
interview.
    Baker said it would be necessary for other countries to
adjust their currencies upwards, as well as remove their
barriers to U.S. Imports. But he did not elaborate or name any
countries.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8198>
Ministers from more than 20
nations were told by New Zealand that the next international
negotiations on liberalising trade would be the last this
century and the cost of failure could not be measured.
    Trade minister Mike Moore told his colleagues at a
welcoming ceremony before two days of talks here that great
progress had been made in preparing for the negotiations which
must not be sidetracked.
    "We live in troubled and dangerous times for the world
trading system," he said.
    "We have seen that the failure of the world trading system
has caused great depression and conflict in the past. Our
failure to maintain the momentum will be at great cost to us
all," Moore said.
   "The cost of failure is beyond calculation. It is our last
hope and best opportunity this century. We will not get another
chance before the year 2000," he added.
    The ministers are in New Zealand to review world trade
since the "Uruguay round" talks last September. The talks are 
also part of preparations for a full-scale June meeting of the
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) in Venice.
    The Uruguay meeting is considered by most countries to have
been particularly successful, with northern hemisphere
countries managing to have service industries such as banking
and insurance included in the next full round.
    The southerners' goal of including agricultural and
tropical products also was met.
    The meeting at this North Island tourist resort is
described by participants as informal and no declaration is
expected.
    Moore said one aim was to "instil a sense of political
urgency to avert potential economic tragedy."
    Another was to seek ways of popularising freer trade to
people who felt the pain of readjustment but could not see the
benefits, as well as preventing "bush fires of confrontation
while we proceed with orderly negotiations."
    The meeting is being attended by 25 overseas delegations
including representatives of GATT and the Economic Community.
    The delegates include U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter.
    American sources say he is ready to state that the best way
to reverse protectionist sentiment in the United States is to
implement four key Uruguay proposals:
    -- an end to agricultural subsidies;
    -- inclusion of trade in services and investments in GATT
regulations;
    -- tightening of restrictions on pirating of so-called
intellectual property such as trademarks, patents and
copyrights;
    -- new rules to resolve trade disputes among GATT's 92
member states.
    Earlier, New Zealand sources had said French Foreign Trade
Minister Michel Noir had pulled out of the informal GATT talks
for domestic political reasons.
    Cabinet chief Bernard Prauge will lead the French
delegation.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8212>
Finland had a 641 mln markka trade
surplus in February following an 80 mln markka surplus in
January and a 614 mln surplus in February 1986, Customs Board
preliminary figures showed.
    Exports in February were 6.38 billion markka and imports
5.74 billion compared with exports of 6.72 billion and imports
of 6.64 billion in January and exports of 6.92 billion and
imports of 6.31 billion in February last year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8240>
Debt among African
countries will continue to grow and their economies will remain
stifled unless developed countries lower their interest rates,
Nigerian Trade Minister Samaila Mamman said today.
    He told an informal meeting of the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade the widening gap between industrialized and
developing countries and an unfair international economic
system were major obstacles to growth in developing countries.
    "I wish to emphasize that the growth in the volume of the
external indebtedness of African countries reflects the full
effect of the deflationary monetary and trade policies of the
developed market economy countries," Mamman said.
    Delegates from 23 countries are attending the talks of the
world trade body in the New Zealand resort of Taupo.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8244>
Japan has assured a meeting
of trade ministers it is making every effort to expand domestic
demand and restructure its economy.
    Japanese trade representative Tsomu Hata told an informal
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) meeting that, in
addition to demand boosting measures adopted last September, a
comprehensive economic program will be prepared after the
1987/88 budget is approved.
    Hata, speaking at the first session of the two-day meeting,
said agriculture is no exception to the goal of restructuring
the economy, but did not elaborate.
    Hata said protectionist pressures in the international
economy are as strong as ever, reflecting financial deficits,
payment imbalances and serious unemployment in many countries.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8252>
Japan has launched a last-ditch effort to
salvage its computer micro-chip pact with the United States -
sending a letter to top American policy makers setting out its
case and instructing its producers to cut output further.
    "We must make our utmost effort to ward off any catastrophe,"
Ministry of International Trade and Industry (MITI) Deputy
Director General Masaji Yamamoto told reporters.
    "If hasty action is taken in the United States, it will
create very serious problems."
    The Reagan Administration's Economic Policy is expected to
meet Thursday to review Japanese compliance with the bilateral
agreement hammered out last year. Under the pact, Tokyo agreed
to stop selling cut-price chips in world markets and to
increase its imports of American semiconductors.
    Washington has accused Japan of reneging on the deal by
selling low priced chips in Asia and by failing to boost
American imports, and has threatened to take retaliatory
action.
    In an effort to save the agreement, MITI is asking Japanese
chip makers to limit production in the hope that will boost
domestic demand and reduce the incentive to export.
    Yamamoto said that Japan will slash output of 256 kilobit
dynamic random access and erasable programmable read only
memory chips by 11 pct in the second quarter. This follows a
cutback of more than 20 pct in the first three months of the
year.
    He said the cutbacks were already drying up the supply of
chips available for export through unregulated distributors in
the so-called grey market.
    "We have almost no grey market," he said. "Supply is
diminishing."
    To help ensure that the cutbacks are implemented, MITI
called in the president of Japan's largest semiconductor maker,
NEC Corp &lt;NIPN.T> last week, he said. It is also issuing
specific instructions on production to the Japanese subsidiary
of &lt;Texas Instruments Inc>.
    Trade and Industry Minister Hajime Tamura spelled out the
steps Japan was taking to salvage the pact and appealed for
U.S. Understanding in a letter to top American policy makers.
    The letter was sent today to U.S. Secretary of State George
Schultz, Treasury Secretary James Baker, Commerce Secretary
Malcolm Baldrige and U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter.
    The four, who make up the Economic Policy Council, are
expected to consider evidence presented by U.S. Chip maker
Micron Technology Inc &lt;DRAM.O> of cut-price Japanese sales in
Hong Kong.
    Yamamoto admitted that &lt;Oki Electric Industry Co>'s Hong
Kong subsidiary had sold chips at an inappropriate level but
denied that it was dumping chips at rock-bottom prices.
    "If the United States uses this as proof of dumping...We
will present our rebuttal," he said.
    The sales though were inappropriate in the light of MITI's
advice to semiconductor makers to sell chips at well above
production costs to avoid any hint of dumping, he said.
    He also called the case "strange," but he stopped short of
endorsing Japanese newspaper accusations that Oki had been
trapped into making the sales. He did say though that Micron
publicized the invoice documenting the sales on the same day
they were made and that Oki was unable to locate the person who
had bought the chips when it tried to buy them back last week.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8273>
Sen. David Pryor, D-Ark., said
he was considering amending the Senate Finance Committee's
trade bill with a provision to require a marketing loan for
soybeans, corn and wheat.
    Pryor told the Futures Industry Association that there was
great reluctance among members of the Senate Agriculture
Committee to reopen the 1985 farm bill, and that a marketing
loan might have a better chance in the Finance panel.
    The Arkansas senator said the marketing loan -- which in
effect allows producers to pay back their crop loans at the
world price -- had led to a 300 pct increase in U.S. cotton
exports in 14 months and a 72 pct increase in rice exports.
    Pryor serves on both the Senate Finance and Agriculture
Committees.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8554>
U.S. Agriculture undersecretary
Daniel Amstutz said it is possible to reach a global agreement
to scale-back agricultural supports in calendar 1988.
    Speaking to a Senate Agriculture Appropriations committee
hearing, Amstutz said "I think we can reach agreement in
calendar 1988."
    Amstutz said the U.S. places a high priority on the Uruguay
round of global trade talks.
    His comments followed a statement by Secretary of State
George Shultz last week urging agriculture be the highest
priority item during the upcoming summit of western heads of
state in Venice, Italy.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8592>
U.S. Trade Representative
Clayton Yeutter said trade ministers meeting here have reached
a general consensus on agricultural trade reform under the
latest Uruguay round of the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade (GATT).
    Yeutter gave no precise details of the understanding but
told journalists the consensus covers the principles involved
in agricultural trade reform and what needs to be done to
improve the global situation in agriculture.
    Delegates from 22 countries are meeting informally to
discuss progress made since the latest GATT round was launched
in Punta del Este, Uruguay, last September.
    Yeutter said "at least people seem to be going down the same
road...But how that translates ultimately into negotiations is
another matter entirely."
    There seems to be an understanding of the need to deal with
the problem quickly and "a more common understanding of how we
are going to get from here to there," Yeutter said.
    However, the hard work is still to come, with a couple of
years of tough negotiations ahead, he said.
    "It is ludicrous for the nations of the world to plough
immense amounts of financial resources into the production of
items that nobody wants to buy," he said.
    He said the long-term answer is to switch some of the
financial resources now committed to agriculture to other more
productive areas. This would help agriculture because some its
inefficient non-productive segments would stop operating, he
said.
    Individual segments in many countries may lose in the
process, but it should result in a more rational system of
world-wide production within 10 or 15 years, he said.
    It is important that the agriculture negotiations reach a
relatively early conclusion because the U.S. Is spending 26
billion dlrs a year and the European Community probably more
than that, which is an ineffective use of financial resources,
he said.
    Asked about the prospect of a priority for agriculture in
the negotiations, he said "one has to be politically
realistic... If there is any chance of getting it (agricultural
trade reform) done in two to three years it's going to have to
be as part of a larger package."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8596>
Philippines Trade and
Industry Secretary Jose Concepcion told world trade ministers
he wondered if their agreement was of any real value after the
European Community (EC) proposed a levy on vegetable oils.
    Concepcion, speaking at an informal meeting of the General
Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) here, said ministers
declared in Uruguay last September that the trade of
less-developed nations should not be disrupted.
    He said the EC not only ignored Manila's request for lower
tariffs on coconut oil but proposed a levy on vegetable oils
and fats that are vital exports for Southeast Asian countries.
    Concepcion said while the levy might be rejected by the EC
Council of Ministers, he noted that "I cannot help but wonder
whether the agreements we produce in meetings like this are of
any real value."
    He also said industrialised nations saved about 65 billion
U.S. Dlrs in 1985 through low commodity prices, but this had
affected the ability of developing nations to import goods and
services.
    "The health and the growth of world trade requires that the
new development of developing countries losing their share of
world trade be arrested and reversed," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8597>
Taiwan's foreign exchange reserves,
swollen by strong trade surpluses to a record 53 billion U.S.
Dlrs, are becoming a problem, government officials said.
    Official figures show the latest level compares with the
previous record of 51 billion dlrs on March 4 and about 26
billion in late March 1986.
    Central bank Governor Chang Chi-cheng told reporters the
increase in reserves was the result of heavy intervention by
the bank on the local interbank market. It bought nearly two
billion U.S. Dlrs between March 5 and 23, he said.
    Wang Chao-ming, vice chairman of the government's Council
for Economic Planning and Development, told Reuters the rising
reserves were "a big headache for Taiwan."
    He said the government expects heavier pressure from the
U.S., Where protectionist bills are being proposed against
nations such as Taiwan and Japan with large trade surpluses
with the U.S.
    Wang said the government would launch new measures within
the next two months to further reduce import tariffs and open
the market wider to foreign products, especially those from the
U.S.
    Wang said the measures aim at helping reduce Taiwan's trade
surplus, which rose to 2.73 billion U.S. Dlrs in the first two
months of 1987 from 2.02 billion a year earlier. Nearly 90 pct
of the surplus was with the U.S.
    Vice Economic Minister Wang Chien-shien agreed with Wang's
remarks and said efforts to avert U.S. Protectionism were
running out of time. "We must do it quickly or face retaliation
from Washington," he said.
    He said the measures would include removal of trade
barriers on insurance and inland services for U.S. Companies.
    Chang Chi-cheng said the central bank could not stop buying
U.S. Dollars because of heavy sales by local exporters who fear
the strong local dollar will cause them exchange losses.
    He said the bank is studying revision of the foreign
exchange rules in hope of further reducing currency controls,
but declined to give details.
    The Taiwan dollar has risen about 15 pct against the U.S.
Dollar since September 1985. It opened at 34.38 to the U.S.
Dollar today and is expected to rise further to 33 in June and
to 32 by end-year, some foreign bankers said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8599>
A successful new GATT
(General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade) round is needed to
halt growing bilateral trade problems between major trading
partners, U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter said.
    Yeutter, in New Zealand for informal GATT ministerial
talks, told Reuters bilateral trade disputes are increasing
because the multilateral system is inefficient.
    "That is really a strong rationale why we need a new GATT
round," he said. "The very existence of all these bilateral
irritants clearly emphasises the need to develop multilateral
solutions to some of these problems."
    The eighth GATT round of negotiations was launched at Punta
del Este in Uruguay in September 1986. Agriculture and services
were included in the negotiations for the first time.
    The growing debt burden of Latin American and African
nations will also provide impetus for the GATT round to
succeed, he said.
    "Clearly those countries need to develop their export
endeavours and they need open markets for that to happen and
that's the basic objective of the new GATT round," he said.
    But he said the GATT round is a long term endeavour. It
will not give any short term relief for debt ridden countries,
but it will make a difference in 10 to 15 years.
    "It's a worthwhile activity from their standpoint because
these debts are not going to go away in the next year or two,"
he said.
    "They ought to be very strongly supported in the GATT round
as a mechanism for relieving their debt burdens or making
possible debt amortisation in the future," he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8602>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone
intervened to try to resolve Japan's escalating dispute with
the U.S. Over semiconductor trade, government officials said.
    At today's Cabinet meeting, Nakasone told Trade and
Industry Minister Hajime Tamura to redouble his efforts to calm
U.S. Anger over what it sees as Japan's unfair trade practices
in semiconductors.
    Nakasone intervened only two days before a scheduled
meeting of the Reagan administration's Economic Policy Council
to consider whether Japan is reneging on its microchip pact
with the U.S.
    That pact, agreed last year after months of negotiations,
calls on Japan to stop selling cut-price chips in world markets
and to raise its imports of U.S. Semiconductors.
    Senior U.S. Officials have accused Tokyo of failing to live
up to the accord and have threatened retaliatory action.
    Yesterday, Tamura's Ministry of International Trade and
Industry (MITI) launched a last-ditch attempt to salvage the
pact by writing letters to U.S. Policy makers setting out
Japan's case and telling Japanese chip makers to cut output.
    In his letter, the contents of which were released today,
Tamura said a MITI survey carried out at the beginning of March
showed Japanese producers were not selling at cut-rate prices
in Asian markets.
    In a separate letter sent to senior U.S. Officials, MITI
vice minister for international affairs Makoto Kuroda suggested
the two countries could conduct a joint investigation into
allegations of Japanese chip dumping in such markets.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8608>
U.S. Trade Representative
Clayton Yeutter said he was unsure whether some of the trade
issues straining U.S.-Japanese relations would be resolved
before the two countries open trade talks in late April.
    "We are having high level discussions on them (the issues)
within the United States...The relationship on some of those is
very strained between us (Japan) at the moment and we need to
relieve those strains at the earliest possible date," he said.
    "I am not sure we can wait until late April," he added.
    Yeutter is in New Zealand for a two-day informal meeting of
trade ministers who are reviewing the Uruguay round of the
General Agreement on Trade and Tariffs (GATT).
    He said he will meet the Japanese delegation over the next
few days but declined to discuss methods of relieving the
strain between the two countries.
    Yeutter said earlier the three most contentious trade
issues were semiconductors, Japanese government unwillingness
to allow public entities to buy U.S. Super-computers and the
barring of U.S. Firms from the eight billion U.S. Dlr Kansai
airport project near Osaka.
    The Japanese delegation to the GATT talks said in a
statement yesterday they are making major efforts to dismantle
trade barriers in their country.
    "I am convinced that they are attempting to move their
policies in the right direction. The question is how far and
how fast," Yeutter said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8624>
Import prices in West Germany fell
0.7 pct in February from January to stand 15.6 pct below their
level in February 1986, the Federal Statistics Office said.
    In January the import price index, base 1980, was unchanged
compared with December but 17.8 pct lower against January 1986.
    February export prices, same base as import prices, were
unchanged compared with January and 2.5 pct lower than in
February 1986.
    In January export prices fell 0.3 pct against December to
stand 3.0 pct lower than in January 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8635>
Canadian Trade Minister Pat
Carney said that agricultural policies should not hurt world
international trade and should therefore become more price
responsive over time.
    She told delegates at the informal meeting of trade
ministers that this was one of five principles Canada wanted
adopted in reforming agriculture in the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade (GATT). Secondly, support for agriculture
should avoid production incentives, and thirdly, countries
should freeze and seek to reduce government aid measures that
distorted world prices, Carney said.
    Carney said the fourth principle was that countries should
not introduce new import barriers not mandated by existing
legislation and the fifth was that these basic principles must
be implemented collectively.
    Carney later told Reuters the Canadian guidelines are
basically compatible with the seven point Australian proposals
announced in Davos, Switzerland, in January.
    European trade sources said the conference welcomed the
Canadian initiative but some delegates, and not only the
European Community, voiced reservations about some of the
principles.
    Carney said there was a lot of political will among the
ministers here to complete the Uruguay Round of GATT in under
four years and that there is also a realisation that it has to
be done in a balanced way.
    "The consensus view was to proceed as fast as we can on a
broad front and see what areas emerge where we can get early
conclusion," she said.
    However, the meeting did not identify what those areas are,
Carney said.  She said Canada/U.S. Bilateral trade
negotiations, which must be concluded at least in draft form by
October, are progressing well.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8637>
Philippine Secretary of
Trade and Industry Jose Concepcion, who two days ago expressed
doubts about agreements produced at international conferences,
said he was pleased with the latest gathering here.
    Concepcion told Reuters in an interview that the informal
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) meeting gave
ministers from more than 20 nations the chance to examine
issues with which GATT did not have the political will to deal.
    "Also, the role of the developing countries has been
emphasised in this particular meeting. Somehow it has been the
perception of developing countries that GATT is a club of rich
countries," he added in an interview with Reuters.
    "In fact many of the issues that have been tabled for
discussion (in the Uruguay round of trade negotiations) will be
of more benefit to the developed countries," he said.
    Concepcion said at the start of the Taupo meeting that the
Uruguay round was meant to be a "shining act of faith" in the
world trade system.
    Concepcion said the Philippines would address the issues of
trade in tropical fruit and the improvement of GATT machinery
to make it more responsive.
    He said tropical fruit came from developing countries but
faced non-tariff barriers, quantitative restrictions or very
high duties in other nations. Concepcion named Japan and South
Korea as examples.
    He said he would go to Wellington for talks with New
Zealand, which had a surplus in trade with the Philippines, to
encourage it to switch imports from other countries. He noted
that New Zealand bought its bananas from Ecuador.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8662>
U.S. Trade Representative
Clayton Yeutter said trade ministers meeting here have reached
a general consensus on agricultural trade reform under the
latest Uruguay round of the General Agreement on Tariffs and
Trade (GATT).
    Yeutter gave no precise details of the understanding but
told journalists the consensus covers the principles involved
in agricultural trade reform and what needs to be done to
improve the global situation in agriculture.
    Delegates from 22 countries are meeting informally to
discuss progress made since the latest GATT round was launched
in Punta del Este, Uruguay, last September.
    Yeutter said "at least people seem to be going down the same
road...But how that translates ultimately into negotiations is
another matter entirely."
    There seems to be an understanding of the need to deal with
the problem quickly and "a more common understanding of how we
are going to get from here to there," Yeutter said.
    However, the hard work is still to come, with a couple of
years of tough negotiations ahead, he said.
    "It is ludicrous for the nations of the world to plough
immense amounts of financial resources into the production of
items that nobody wants to buy," he said.
    He said the long-term answer is to switch some of the
financial resources now committed to agriculture to other more
productive areas. This would help agriculture because some its
inefficient non-productive segments would stop operating, he
said.
    Individual segments in many countries may lose in the
process, but it should result in a more rational system of
world-wide production within 10 or 15 years, he said.
    It is important that the agriculture negotiations reach a
relatively early conclusion because the U.S. Is spending 26
billion dlrs a year and the European Community probably more
than that, which is an ineffective use of financial resources,
he said.
    Asked about the prospect of a priority for agriculture in
the negotiations, he said "one has to be politically
realistic... If there is any chance of getting it (agricultural
trade reform) done in two to three years it's going to have to
be as part of a larger package."
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8663>
Prime Minister Yasuhiro Nakasone
intervened to try to resolve Japan's escalating dispute with
the U.S. Over semiconductor trade, government officials said.
    At today's Cabinet meeting, Nakasone told Trade and
Industry Minister Hajime Tamura to redouble his efforts to calm
U.S. Anger over what it sees as Japan's unfair trade practices
in semiconductors.
    Nakasone intervened only two days before a scheduled
meeting of the Reagan administration's Economic Policy Council
to consider whether Japan is reneging on its microchip pact
with the U.S.
    That pact, agreed last year after months of negotiations,
calls on Japan to stop selling cut-price chips in world markets
and to raise its imports of U.S. Semiconductors.
    Senior U.S. Officials have accused Tokyo of failing to live
up to the accord and have threatened retaliatory action.
    Yesterday, Tamura's Ministry of International Trade and
Industry (MITI) launched a last-ditch attempt to salvage the
pact by writing letters to U.S. Policy makers setting out
Japan's case and telling Japanese chip makers to cut output.
    In his letter, the contents of which were released today,
Tamura said a MITI survey carried out at the beginning of March
showed Japanese producers were not selling at cut-rate prices
in Asian markets.
    In a separate letter sent to senior U.S. Officials, MITI
vice minister for international affairs Makoto Kuroda suggested
the two countries could conduct a joint investigation into
allegations of Japanese chip dumping in such markets.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8667>
Canadian Trade Minister Pat
Carney said that agricultural policies should not hurt world
international trade and should therefore become more price
responsive over time.
    She told delegates at the informal meeting of trade
ministers that this was one of five principles Canada wanted
adopted in reforming agriculture in the General Agreement on
Tariffs and Trade (GATT). Secondly, support for agriculture
should avoid production incentives, and thirdly, countries
should freeze and seek to reduce government aid measures that
distorted world prices, Carney said.
    Carney said the fourth principle was that countries should
not introduce new import barriers not mandated by existing
legislation and the fifth was that these basic principles must
be implemented collectively.
    Carney later told Reuters the Canadian guidelines are
basically compatible with the seven point Australian proposals
announced in Davos, Switzerland, in January.
    European trade sources said the conference welcomed the
Canadian initiative but some delegates, and not only the
European Community, voiced reservations about some of the
principles.
    Carney said there was a lot of political will among the
ministers here to complete the Uruguay Round of GATT in under
four years and that there is also a realisation that it has to
be done in a balanced way.
    "The consensus view was to proceed as fast as we can on a
broad front and see what areas emerge where we can get early
conclusion," she said.
    However, the meeting did not identify what those areas are,
Carney said.  She said Canada/U.S. Bilateral trade
negotiations, which must be concluded at least in draft form by
October, are progressing well.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8671>
Japan's economy remains sluggish but is
beginning to show signs it may bottom out soon, the Economic
Planning Agency said in a monthly report submitted to Cabinet
ministers.
    But a bottoming out of the economy depends largely on the
yen's exchange rate trend in the immediate future, Agency
officials said.
    The officials told reporters industrial production, down
0.5 pct in January from December, is likely to turn positive in
February and to rise thereafter, raising hopes for a brighter
economic outlook.
    The Agency predicted industrial production will grow 2.5
pct in the current January/March quarter after falling 0.7 pct
in the previous quarter.
    A rise of this size would be the largest since the fourth
quarter of 1984 when industrial output rose 2.7 pct, the
officials said.
    They also said an expected upturn in exports would be a
mixed blessing as it would contribute to economic growth but
would increase the chance of trade friction.
    Japanese exports contracted five pct in February from
January but are likely to grow from March if the yen stabilizes
around current levels, the officials said.
    They predicted exports will increase by 2.3 pct in the
January/March quarter from the October/December quarter.
    "But the problem is imports are not expanding," said one
official. Imports fell by 9.4 pct in February from January.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8676>
U.S. Trade Representative
Clayton Yeutter said he was unsure whether some of the trade
issues straining U.S.-Japanese relations would be resolved
before the two countries open trade talks in late April.
    "We are having high level discussions on them (the issues)
within the United States...The relationship on some of those is
very strained between us (Japan) at the moment and we need to
relieve those strains at the earliest possible date," he said.
    "I am not sure we can wait until late April," he added.
    Yeutter is in New Zealand for a two-day informal meeting of
trade ministers who are reviewing the Uruguay round of the
General Agreement on Trade and Tariffs (GATT).
    He said he will meet the Japanese delegation over the next
few days but declined to discuss methods of relieving the
strain between the two countries.
    Yeutter said earlier the three most contentious trade
issues were semiconductors, Japanese government unwillingness
to allow public entities to buy U.S. Super-computers and the
barring of U.S. Firms from the eight billion U.S. Dlr Kansai
airport project near Osaka.
    The Japanese delegation to the GATT talks said in a
statement yesterday they are making major efforts to dismantle
trade barriers in their country.
    "I am convinced that they are attempting to move their
policies in the right direction. The question is how far and
how fast," Yeutter said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8692>
Taiwan said it plans another round of
tariff cuts, possibly within a month, to try to narrow its
trade surplus with the U.S.
    Vice Finance Minister Ronald Ho said a high-level economic
committee recommended tariff cuts on 66 products requested by
Washington, including apples, chocolates and fruit juice.
    Ho said the cuts may come into effect by the end of next
month.
    Taiwan's trade surplus with the U.S. Widened in the first
two months of this year to 2.35 billion dlrs from 1.87 billion
dlrs in the same period last year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8699>
Taiwan said it plans another round of
tariff cuts, possibly within a month, to try to narrow its
trade surplus with the U.S.
    Vice Finance Minister Ronald Ho said a high-level economic
committee recommended tariff cuts on 66 products requested by
Washington, including apples, chocolates and fruit juice.
    Ho said the cuts may come into effect by the end of next
month.
    Taiwan's trade surplus with the U.S. Widened in the first
two months of this year to 2.35 billion dlrs from 1.87 billion
dlrs in the same period last year.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8725>
A successful new GATT
(General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade) round is needed to
halt growing bilateral trade problems between major trading
partners, U.S. Trade Representative Clayton Yeutter said.
    Yeutter, in New Zealand for informal GATT ministerial
talks, told Reuters bilateral trade disputes are increasing
because the multilateral system is inefficient.
    "That is really a strong rationale why we need a new GATT
round," he said. "The very existence of all these bilateral
irritants clearly emphasises the need to develop multilateral
solutions to some of these problems."
    The eighth GATT round of negotiations was launched at Punta
del Este in Uruguay in September 1986. Agriculture and services
were included in the negotiations for the first time.
    The growing debt burden of Latin American and African
nations will also provide impetus for the GATT round to
succeed, he said. "Clearly those countries need to develop their
export endeavours and they need open markets for that to happen
and that's the basic objective of the new GATT round."
    But he said the GATT round is a long term endeavour. It
will not give any short term relief for debt ridden countries,
but it will make a difference in 10 to 15 years.
    "It's a worthwhile activity from their standpoint because
these debts are not going to go away in the next year or two,"
he said.
    "They ought to be very strongly supported in the GATT round
as a mechanism for relieving their debt burdens or making
possible debt amortisation in the future," he said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8746>
The U.S. economy is showing some
promising signs of accelerated expansion despite the
sluggishness of the fourth quarter last year, private
economists say.
    Some of the slowness experienced in the October-December
period had been expected to spill over into the first quarter
this year, as the tax law changes that went into effect in
January slowed business and consumer spending.
    But some of the latest economic data show signs of
surprising strength in the U.S. economy, although some
economists remain cautious about the outlook.
    The Commerce Department reported today that new orders for
durable goods in February jumped by 5.7 billion dlrs, a six pct
rise, to 101.2 billion dlrs. Even excluding volatile defense
goods, durable goods orders rose a healthy 3.8 pct, the agency
said.
    The February numbers surpassed the expectations of many
financial analysts, whose predictions ranged from flat to
increases of up to five pct.
    The January/February employment statistics suggest the
Gross National Product will show a healthy rate of growth for
the first three months of this year, said Lyle Gramley, an
economist with the Mortgage Bankers Association.
    The U.S. jobless rate in February and January was 6.7 pct,
the lowest rate since March 1980. The number of new non-farm
jobs rose by 337,000 in February after a 319,000 gain in
January and a 225,000 December increase, the government said.
    The employment data suggests a GNP annual growth rate of
about three to 3.25 pct in the first quarter, said Gramley.
    Much of that will be attributed to businesses rebuilding
their inventories and is not likely to be sustained in the
second quarter, Gramley said. He expects a slowdown in the
second quarter with smaller increases in personal consumption
and government spending. He also sees residential construction
declining mostly for multi-family housing units.
    Fidelity Bank senior economist Mickey Levy said some of the
fourth quarter slowness will continue.
    Levy predicts GNP will grow at a scant 1.5 pct rate in the
first quarter of 1987, accelerate during the second quarter and
show a brisk 4.5 pct annual rate in the third quarter.
    The key to both forecasts is a marked improvement in the
U.S. trade balance which is expected because of the decline in
the dollar's value over the last year and half.
    "The improvement will be gradual and long lasting," Levy
predicted. Most of it will be through import reduction, but at
least one-third will be due to a rise in product exports as the
prices of U.S. goods become more attractive overseas.
    The Reagan administration has predicted the trade deficit,
which soared to record levels last year, will improve this year
and the U.S. economy will grow by a respectable 3.2 pct for the
year compared with a 2.5 pct rate last year.
    As part of the effort to reduce the trade deficit, the U.S.
has been pressing West Germany and Japan to stimulate their
domestic demand for goods from the U.S. and others.
    U.S. officials believe that would help take some of the
pressure off the United States whose five years of economic
growth has been the mainstay of developing countries.
    The U.S. economy provided them with a giant market for
their goods giving them a way to earn income badly needed to
service their foreign debt.
    The government last week said the U.S. economy grew at a
modest 1.1 pct annual rate during the fourth quarter.
    There were indications of improvement in the huge imbalance
between the volume of goods imported to the United States and
those shipped abroad. The report showed a rising volume of
exports corresponding to a decline in imports despite the fact
that in current dollar terms, the U.S. trade deficit worsened
during the closing three months of 1986.
    While fourth quarter economic growth was weak, corporate
profits jumped a healthy 6.1 pct during the period, the
government said. It also reported that inflation, as measured
by the GNP price deflator, remained in check, growing a
moderate 0.7 pct in the period, the lowest rise in 19 years.
    The government also reported that consumer spending, a key
element of the five year economic recovery, jumped 1.7 pct in
February, after falling two pct in January.
    The Federal Reserve Board also reported that the
manufacturing sector, which had been one of the weaker elements
of the U.S. economy, was showing signs of recovery.
    In its latest report on current economic conditions, the
Fed said that economic activity in the various regions of the
country ranged from uneven or steady to improving.
Manufacturing activity showed signs of improvement in most
regions except Dallas where orders remained sluggish.
    Chase Econometrics Chairman Lawrence Chimerine said the
pick up in the U.S. manufacturing sector is largely due to the
drop in the dollar's value. He said he does not foresee a major
pick up in economic activity, but does not believe the economy
will slip into recession either.
    He said higher prices on imported products and wage cuts
that have helped the manufacturing sector will squeeze
consumers purchasing power.
    "That pattern is starting and will continue for a number of
years," Chimerine said. He sees economic growth hovering around
a modest two pct level for the next few years.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8747>
World Bank President Barber Conable
linked increased borrowing by Indonesia, the Third World's
sixth largest debtor, to fresh measures to deregulate trade and
dismantle protectionist barriers.
    "We would like to see the Indonesian government continue the
adjustment process ... To move towards increased deregulation
of the economy," Conable told a press conference at the end of a
three-day visit to Jakarta.
    Conable directly linked further Bank help for Indonesia's
hard-pressed balance of payments to further measures by the
government to reduce protectionism and increase efficiency.
    The World Bank last month granted Indonesia a 300 mln dlr
trade adjustment loan. He said further loans would depend on
the economic policies Indonesia adopted.
    But he said that in meetings with both President Suharto
and leading Indonesian ministers he had not called for specific
policy changes.
    "The initiative will have to rest with the Indonesian
government. We are not here to dictate to them," he stated.
    Indonesia, the only Asian member of Opec, has been badly
hit by last year's slump in oil prices which cut its revenues
from crude exports in half.
    Conable had what he termed a frank meeting this morning
with Suharto.
    He voiced support for measures already taken, including
September's 31 pct devaluation of the rupiah, and efforts to
deregulate imports and stimulate exports.
    "The government can rely on the support of the World Bank in
a continuing program of adjustment to the economic realities of
today's world," he said.
    The Bank has loaned Indonesia 10.7 billion dlrs over the
past 20 years. Lending is now about one billion a year.
    The World Bank would probably like to see further
dismantling of tarrif barriers and measures to reduce
Indonesia's protected monopolies in areas like steel, plastics
and cement, western bankers and diplomats said.
    The government has already said it will announce further
deregulation measures, but has given no timetable. It is also
considering selling off loss-making state companies.
    Conable said the Bank would try to help Indonesia find
funds to cover its share of development projects, which
otherwise would have to be scrapped or postponed. Japan's Ex-Im
bank announced a 900 mln dlr untied credit last month.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8922>
A member of the Federal Reserve
Board, Robert Heller, said he wanted to see stronger Japanese
demand for American goods.
    "What I was advocating here was more Japanese purchases of
American goods," Heller said in response to a question about the
dollar's weakness in currency markets.
    He told a Heritage Foundation forum, "I'd be very happy to
see that."
    In his formal remarks, Heller said he supported the idea of
using commodity prices as an indicator for monetary policy.
    Asked if he would raise the issue at the next Federal Open
Market Committee meeting, he said, "Even at previous meetings
commodity prices were raised."
    He added, "I would not expect future meetings to be
different from past meetings in that respect."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=8982>
The U.S. House Foreign Affairs
Committee voted to ease restrictions on exports that are now
kept from shipment to Soviet-bloc countries but are no longer a
threat to U.S. national security.
    The Democratic-controlled committee said the
administration's export control policies, which restrict
shipment of thousands of products, contributed to last year's
record 169 billion dlr U.S. trade deficit.
    The committee said the legislation will cut government red
tape and make it easier for U.S. companies to compete with
foreign producers since many of the goods are readily available
from other countries.
    Rep. Don Bonker, chairman of the International Economic
Policy subcommittee, said the unnecessary restrictions had cost
the U.S. 17 billion dlrs in exports a year.
    "This is Congress' number one opportunity to attack the
trade deficit in a positive way by exporting more," the
Washington Democrat said.
    The legislation would order the Commerce Department to lift
controls on 40 pct of goods on the restricted export list over
the next three years unless other countries agree to comparable
controls.
    Most of these are of the least sophisticated type of
technology such as medical instruments.
    It would also give the Commerce Department primary
authority to decide which exports will be permitted and limit
the Defense Department to an advisory role in reviewing
requests to export highly-sensitive technology.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9007>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
said he supported efforts to persuade newly-industrialized
countries (NICS) to revalue currencies that are tied to the
dollar in order to help the United States cut its massive trade
deficit.
    "We do need to do something with those currencies or we
will be substituting Japanese products for Taiwanese products,"
or those of other nations with currencies tied to the dollar,
Baldrige told a House banking subcommittee.
    The U.S. dollar has declined in value against the Yen and
European currencies, but has changed very little against the
currencies of some developing countries such as South Korea and
Taiwan because they are linked to the value of the dollar.
    As a result, efforts to reduce the value of the dollar over
the past year and a half have done little to improve the trade
deficits with those countries.
    Baldrige told a House Banking subcommittee that the
Treasury Department was attempting to persuade those countries
to reach agreement with the United States on exchange rates.

 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9015>
William Bywater, president of the
International Union of Electronic Workers, called on President
Reagan to retaliate against Japan for unfair practices in
semiconductor trade.
    He said in a statement a crash program was needed in the
semiconductor industry to prevent the United States from
becoming "one of the world's industrial lightweights."
    Bywater's remarks came as the White House Economic Policy
Council prepared for a Thursday meeting to decide what
sanctions if any should be taken against Japan for alleged 
violations of a U.S.-Japanese semiconductors agreement.
    The pact, agreed to last July, called for Tokyo to end
selling semiconductors at below cost and to open its home
market to U.S. goods. In return, Washington agreed to forego
antidumping duties on Japanese semiconductors.
    But U.S. officials have said that while Japan has stopped
dumping in the U.S. market, it has not ended third country
dumping; nor has it opened its market to U.S. semiconductors.
    Japan yesterday, in an effort to ward off U.S. action,
ordered a cutback in semiconductors production as a way to
force prices up and end the dumping.
    Bywater, in his statement, said he backed a Defense Science
Board task force proposal to set up a consortium to develop new
electronic products and manufacturing processes and make the
U.S. industory more competitive.
    But he added the industry could not wait for legislation to
pass and that action was required now to help the depressed
electronic industry.
    Bywater said, "I urge the Reagan Administration to take full
and severe action immediately against Japan by invoking the
retaliatory steps that are permitted under U.S. law and GATT
(General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade)."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9051>
Brazilian Science and Technology
Minister Renato Archer said Brazil will keep its computer
market closed to foreign goods in order to give its own infant
industry time to develop.
    "Every country establishes laws to protect its interests.
The United States closed their borders at a certain stage to
some foreign goods and therefore protected its industrial
development. Now it is time for Brazil to do likewise," Archer
said at the opening of a national software conference.
    After several meetings, Brazil and the U.S. Have made no
major progress in their computer row, which they have been
trying to resolve for the past 18 months.
    The Reagan administration has objected to Brazil protecting
its computer industry from imports.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9055>
The chairman of the Federal Reserve
Board, Paul Volcker, has written to the chairman of the House
Banking Committee to raise concerns about legislative proposals
scheduled for consideration Wednesday.
    Volcker told committee chairman Fernand St. Germain a
proposal to deny primary dealer status to firms from countries
that do not grant U.S. firms equal access to their government
debt markets might invite retaliation against U.S. firms
abroad.
    He added, "even Japan, against whom this proposal seems to
be particularly directed," has started opening its markets.
    In his letter, made available at the Treasury, Volcker also
said a proposal to ease debt problems of developing countries
by setting up a public facility to buy their debts owed to
commercial banks, was a problem.
    "I believe that the prospect of debt relief would undermine
the difficult internal efforts of the borrowing countries to
achieve the structural reform that is needed regardless of the
policies that are followed on servicing external debt," Volcker
said.
    It might also cause private lenders to become reluctant to
extend more credit to the borrowing countries, he said.
    Volcker said he endorsed comments by Treasury Secretary
James Baker "about the inappropriateness of using public
resources for purchasing private commercial bank debt, which we
both see as an inherent aspect of the proposed international
debt facility."
    He also said a proposal for establishing formal procedures
for international negotiations on currency exchange rates "is
unrealistic and could well have damaging effects."
    "For example, the bill's directive to intitiate negotiations
in order to achieve a competitive exchange rate for the dollar
-- a matter upon which there can be considerable difference
among analysts -- runs the risk of building up potentially
destabilizing market expectations," Volcker said.
    He recommended "we should not lock ourselves into formalized
procedures for international negotiations" on exchange rates but
instead use other, more flexible means like the recent mmeting
in Paris between U.S. treasury and central bank representatives
and those of major trade allies.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9060>
Leading U.S. farm state senators are
seeking to insert into the Senate's omnibus trade bill a
provision that would broaden eligibility requirements under the
U.S. Agriculture Department's export enhancement program, EEP,
to include traditional buyers of U.S. farm products, including
the Soviet Union, Senate staff said.
    Under existing criteria, USDA can offer EEP subsidies to
recoup export markets lost to competing nations' unfair trading
practices.
    Senate Agriculture Committee Chairman Patrick Leahy (D-Vt.)
is leading a group of farm state senators in an effort to
broaden the criteria in such a way as to enable Moscow to be
eligible for the subsidies, sources said.
    The senators -- including Senate Finance Committee Chairman
Lloyd Bentsen (D-Tex.), Max Baucus (D-Mont.), David Pryor
(D-Ark.), John Melcher (D-Mont.) and Thad Cochran (R-Miss.) --
also may fold into the trade bill a measure to shield pork
producers and processors from Canadian imports.
    The measure, sponsored by Sen. Charles Grassley (R-Iowa),
would clarify the definition of "industry" in determining whether
or not imports were causing injury to U.S. producers.
    Grassley's bill stems from a 1985 decision by the
International Trade Commission that imports from Canada of live
swine -- but not fresh, chilled and frozen pork -- were harming
U.S. producers.
    The bill's proponents have argued Canada has simply
replaced shipments of live hogs with fresh pork.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9076>
External Affairs Minister Joe Clark
today vowed to do everything possible to fight the U.S. action
against Canadian potash exports, but also warned against
raising the alarm too early in the dispute.
    In the latest flashpoint in Canadian-U.S. trade relations,
the U.S. International Trade Commission ruled unanimously
Monday that Canadian potash shipments valued at 270 million
U.S. dlrs last year were injuring the U.S. industry.
    "We certainly intend to do everything we can to insure that
Canadian interests are well protected," Clark told the House of
Commons in the daily question period.
    But he said the opposition parties should be careful "not
to raise false alarms too early."
    The case now goes before the U.S. Commerce Department's
trade division to determine if a duty should be imposed. Potash
producers from New Mexico, claiming unfair government
subsidies, are seeking a 43 pct tariff on Canada's shipments.
    Canada, the world's largest potash producer, exported 9.8
mln metric tonnes of potash last year, with nearly a third
going to the U.S.
    Most of the potash, used in the production of fertilizer,
comes from provincially owned mines in Saskatchewan.
    In the Commons, Liberal member Lloyd Axworthy branded the
ruling as just another "trade harrassment" from the U.S. and
criticized Clark's assurances the country's interests would be
protected.
    "We received exactly the same kind of assurances in the
softwood lumber case that was totally fumbled and bumbled,"
Axworthy said.
    Canada's Progressive Conservative government agreed to
impose a 15 pct duty on its softwood lumber exports earlier
this year to end a long and bitter bilateral trade dispute with
the U.S.
    Axworthy urged the government to present Canada's case to
world trade authorities under the General Agreement on Tariffs 
and Trade.
    But Clark maintained the potash dispute was another example
of why Canada needs to find a new way to settle bilateral
irritants in the free trade negotiations under way with the
U.S.
    "What we are seeking to do is put in place a better
system," Clark said.
    Meanwhile, Saskatchewan Trade Minister Bob Andrew expressed
confidence Canada would win its case, claiming the problem
stems from low international commodity prices and not
government subsidies.
    "The reality of the problem and the injury is caused
worldwide," he said. "It's caused by a downturn in the
commodity price for fertilizer, whether it's potash fertilizer,
nitrogen fertilizer or whatever."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9135>
Preliminary trade figures for
February show an excess of exports over imports of 119.1 mln
N.Z. Dlrs, a Statistics Department statement said.
    This compares with a 3.3 mln dlr deficit (revised from 1.7
mln) in January and a 36.1 mln dlr deficit in February 1986.
    Exports rose to 998.4 mln dlrs, from 889.2 mln (revised
from 889.5) in January and 903.2 in February 1986. Imports
dropped to an estimated 879.4 mln dlrs from 892.5 (revised from
891.2) in January and 939.3 in February 1986. The deficit for
the eight months to the end of February was 15.3 mln dlrs, as
against 1.057 billion dlrs in the same period a year ago.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9143>
Bangladesh recorded an overall balance of
payments deficit of 8.3 mln U.S. Dlrs in October against a
10.33 mln deficit in September and a 6.67 mln surplus in
October 1985, Central Bank officials said.
    The country's current account deficit narrowed to 10.69 mln
dlrs in October from 79 mln in September and 11.75 mln in
October 1985.
    The October trade deficit narrowed to 36.36 mln dlrs from
160 mln in September and 83.79 mln in October 1985.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9171>
The Belgo-Luxembourg Economic Union
recorded a provisional trade deficit of 9.45 billion francs in
January after a December surplus of 15.32 billion francs,
revised upwards from a provisional surplus of 11.94 billion,
the National Statistics Office said.
    In January 1986, the union recorded a deficit of 23.31
billion francs.
    January imports fell to a provisional 228.86 billion francs
from 240.24 billion in December and 281.65 billion a year
earlier, but exports were also lower, at 219.41 billion francs
against 255.56 billion and 258.34 billion respectively.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9184>
Taiwanese investment in the U.S. Is
expected to nearly double to 80 mln U.S. Dlrs in calendar 1987
and rise to 400 mln dlrs a year by 1991, a five-year forecast
by the Economic Ministry showed.
    Taiwanese investment in the U.S. Last year totalled 46 mln
dlrs, the ministry document said. The investment was mainly in
electronics, trading, food and service industries.
    Lee Ming-Yi, deputy director of the ministry's Industrial
Development and Investment Centre, said the forecast rise is
due to planned government incentives and growing willingness
among Taiwanese to invest abroad.
    Lee told Reuters the incentives, to be introduced in May or
June, include bank loans and a reduction in capitalisation
requirements for businesses seeking to invest in the U.S. To 10
mln Taiwan dlrs from 20 mln.
    He said the moves to encourage investment in the U.S. Are
part of Taiwan's efforts to cut its trade surplus with
Washington, which rose to a record 13.6 billion U.S. Dlrs in
1986 from 1985's 10.2 billion.
    Taiwanese manufacturers can create jobs for Americans and
avoid import quotas if they set up plants in the U.S., He
added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9194>
China should tighten imports of ordinary
goods and restrict or even forbid import of goods which can be
made domestically, Premier Zhao Ziyang said.
    He told the National People's Congress, China's parliament,
that the country's foreign exchange is limited and must be used
where it is most needed.
    "We should expand production of import substitutes and
increase their proportion," he said.
    On exports, China should increase its proportion of
manufactured goods, especially textiles, light industrial
goods, electronics and machinery, he said.
    Zhao said China should lower the cost of exports and
control the export of goods that incur too much loss. In 1986
China had a trade deficit of 11.9 billion dlrs, down from a
record 14 billion in 1985.
    Zhao said China should work to provide a more favourable
investment environment for foreign businessmen. It should use
foreign funds for production and construction, with stress on
firms making goods for export or import substitutes.
    China should also earn more foreign exchange from tourists
and contracted labour abroad, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9315>
The House Ways and Means Committee
completed action on legislation to toughen U.S. trade laws,
chairman Dan Rostenkowski said.
    The committee's consideration of one of the most
controversial provisions, a plan to force major trade surplus
countries to cut their trade imbalance with the United States,
was deferred until the full House considers the trade bill, its
sponsor Rep. Richard Gephardt said.
    Gephardt, a Missouri Democrat, told Reuters he was not
certain the exact form his trade surplus reduction proposal
would take. Last year the House approved his plan to force a 10
pct surplus cutback each year for four years, by countries such
as Japan.
    The Ways and Means Committess' trade bill forces President
Reagan to retaliate against unfair trade practices that violate
international trade agreements but it allows him to wave
retaliatory tariffs or quotas if the action would hurt the U.S.
economy.
    The trade bill gives U.S. Trade Representative Clayton
Yeutter more authority in trade negotiations and in decisions
to grant domestic industries import relief.
    It also gives him authority to decide whether foreign trade
practices are unfair and violate U.S. trading rights. These
powers are currently held by President Reagan.
    The administration has strongly objected to this transfer
of authority from Reagan to Yeutter.
    The bill also extends U.S. authority to negotiate
multilateral trade agreements. The bill will be wrapped into
other trade legislation and voted on in the House in April.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9406>
The U.S. Senate Agriculture
Committee approved a bill that would establish farm trade and
aid missions to promote the use of U.S. food aid, donation,
credit and export subsidy programs by overseas customers.
    The bill, approved by voice vote, would establish trade
missions made up of representatives of the Departments of
Agriculture and State, the Agency for International
Development, the Overseas Private Investment Corp, market
development cooperatives and private voluntary organizations.
    At least 16 missions would have to be sent within one year
after enactment of the bill. The missions would promote U.S.
programs, including PL480, Section 416 donations, Export
Enhancement Program, the dairy export incentive program, and
export credit guarantee programs (GSM-102, GSM-103).
    The panel agreed to drop a provision in the original bill,
offered by Sen. John Melcher (D-Mont.), that would have
required the U.S. Agriculture Department to donate at least one
mln tonnes of surplus commodities to developing countries.
    Current law requires USDA to donate at least 750,000 tonnes
of surplus grains and dairy products under the Section 416 food
donation program.
    The Congressional Budget Office estimated that the proposed
increase in the minimum tonnage requirement would have cost up
to 50 mln dlrs per year, Senate staff said.
    The committee also dropped a provision identifying which
countries would be the focus of the trade missions' activities.
    Under the bill adopted by the committee, countries "friendly
to the United States" would be eligible to host the trade
missions.
    Melcher originally had proposed sending missions to Mexico,
the Philippines, Indonesia, Bangladesh, Senegal, Nigeria, Peru,
Kenya, the Dominican Republic, Costa Rica, Malaysia, Venezuela,
Tunisia and Morocco.
    The bill also would require the Foreign Agricultural
Service, FAS, to have at least 850 full-time employees during
fiscal years 1987-89. As of February 28, FAS had 790 full-time
employees, a FAS spokesman said.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9415>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
said the United States will not stand idly by and let Japan
dominate the world electronics market.
    Baldrige told the Senate Finance Committee the United
States would insist Japan open its markets to U.S. products as
the U.S. market is open to Japanese products.
    Asked after his testimony if this meant the United States
would close its markets to Japan if they did not open theirs,
Baldrige said, "I'm not prepared to say that, but it certainly
would be one of the alternatives studied."
    Baldrige said in his testimony Japan had a closed
supercomputer market and a restricted telecommunications
market.
    "I can only conclude that the common objective of the
Japanese government and industry is to dominate the world
electronics market. Given the importance of this market to U.S.
industry in general and our defense base in particular, we
cannot stand by idly," he said.
    He said it was these concerns about national security which
led him to express reservations over the proposed acquisition
of Fairchild Semiconductor by Fujitsu of Japan.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9498>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
the administration is confident the effect of exchange rate
changes will bring about a cut in the trade deficit this year.
    In testimony before the Senate Committee on Governmental
Affairs, Baker conceded that the effect thus far has "not yet
proved as quick or as strong as had been expected from past
experience."
    He told the committee, however, that the "initial signs are
encouraging."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9515>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
that some of the trade bills proposed by Congress conflict
significantly with certain basic principles the Reagan
administration considers critical.
    Baker told a Senate committee that the administration would
resist such measures as a general import surcharge,
sector-specific protection such as import quotas for individual
products, mandatory retaliation, and limits on presidential
discretion in negotiating more open markets abroad and other
trade steps.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9532>
The chairman of the U.S. Senate
committee with jurisdiction over trade said he was concerned
about a resolution on bilateral trade negotiations adopted by
the Canadian House of Commons last week.
    The resolution supports negotiation of a bilateral trading
agreement with the United States while protecting Canadian
political sovereignty, social programs, agricultural marketing
systems, the auto industry and Canada's cultural identity.
    Senate Finance Committee chairman Lloyd Bentsen said the
resolution may jeopardize the viability of the proposed free
trade agreement between the two countries, which are each
other's largest trading partners.
    "We need a truly free trade agreement, which means both
countries have to work toward a deal that is mutually
beneficial and comprehensive, a large agreement," the Texas
Democrat said in a statement.
    "I do not question Canada's right to protect its political
sovereignty or cultural identity. However, if these phrases
mean the government of Canada means to take important economic
issues off the table in these negotiations, I am deeply
concerned," he added.
    Bentsen said Canada restricts trade 15 different ways while
the United States uses only six trade restriction methods. He
said if Canada proposes an agreement where both countries get
rid of six methods of trade restriction, it would not be fair
and might not win Senate approval.
    "I am deeply concerned that when the President visits Prime
Minister (Brian) Mulroney next month, he will be presented with
this kind of argument, and I hope he makes it clear -- as I did
when I was in Canada -- that only a mutually beneficial
agreement will be successful," Bentsen said.
    Reagan and Mulroney are scheduled to meet April 5-6 in
Ottawa.
    Bentsen urged Mulroney to withdraw a proposal that would
ban imports of independently produced films into Canada by
non-Canadians, which the senator called a protectionist
measure.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9592>
Brazil wants to increase its
steel exports to the United States, now limited because of
tough import restraints set in 1984 by the Reagan
administration, a spokeswoman for the Brazilian Steel Institute
(IBS) said.
    Brazilian and U.S. Trade officials held the first of a
three-day meeting today in Brasilia to discuss the issue.
    In 1984, after three months of painstaking negotiations,
the U.S. Government reached accords with seven steel-exporting
nations - Australia, Brazil, Japan, Mexico, Spain, South Africa
and South Korea - to reduce their shipments to the United
States by about 30 pct in 1985.
    The 1984 restraints established that for 1987 Brazil's
steel exports to the U.S. Could not exceed 632,000 tonnes,
increasing to 640,000 tonnes in 1988 and 670,000 tonnes in
1989, the last of the five-year deadline set by the agreements.
    Brazilian officials are trying to increase Brazil's export
share of non-flat products to the U.S. Market.
    The spokeswoman said there were reports of domestic supply
problems in the United States.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9603>
Commerce Secretary Malcolm Baldrige
said the U.S. trade deficit should start to decline soon,
possibly in the figures for February or March.
    "We could see the trade deficit start down in February or
March," Baldrige said in an appearance before the Senate
Governmental Affairs Committee.
    He predicted the trade deficit, which was 170 billion dlrs
in 1986, would decline by 30 to 40 billion dlrs in 1987 and in
1988.
    Baldrige said he was making his prediction without having
seen the February trade figures, but he said that the volume of
imports has dropped beginning with the fourth quarter of 1986
and will continue to drop in this quarter.
    The eventual turnaround in the monthly trade figures will
reflect the impact of the decline in the dollar, Baldrige said.
    Ealier, Treasury Secretary James Baker told the committee
that the trade deficit had levelled off, but Baldrige said he
was more optimistic, adding, "I think we turned the corner in
February."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9628>
The Semiconductor Industry
Association urged the U.S. government to impose trade sanctions
against Japan for violating the U.S.-Japan Semiconductor Trade
Agreement.
    In a letter to Treasury Secretary James Baker the group
said sanctions should be imposed against Japanese chipmakers as
of April 1 and should continue until the United States is
satisfied that there is full compliance with the agreement.
    The group said action by Japan to cut back on semiconductor
exports is not what is required.
    "America's interests require that agreements be honored and
that U.S. industries not bear the burden for the persistent
unwillingness or inability of the government of Japan to
deliver on its commitments," the trade group said.
    The White House Economic Policy Council is expected to
discuss possible sanctions against Japan at a meeting scheduled
for Thursday.
    The trade group said Japan has not lived up to the terms of
the agreement last year which was aimed at ending Japanese
dumping of semiconductors and at opening Japanese markets to
foreign-based manufacturers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9657>
The Semiconductor Industry
Association urged the U.S. government to impose trade sanctions
against Japan for violating the U.S.-Japan Semiconductor Trade
Agreement.
    In a letter to Treasury Secretary James Baker the group
said sanctions should be imposed against Japanese chipmakers as
of April 1 and continue until the U.S. is satisfied there is
full compliance with the agreement.
    The group said action by Japan to cut back on semiconductor
exports is not what is required.
    "America's interests require that agreements be honored and
that U.S. industries not bear the burden for the persistent
unwillingness or inability of the government of Japan to
deliver on its commitments," the trade group said.
    The White House Economic Policy Council is expected to
discuss possible sanctions against Japan at a meeting scheduled
for Thursday.
    The trade group said Japan has not lived up to the terms of
the agreement last year which was aimed at ending Japanese
dumping of semiconductors and at opening Japanese markets to
foreign-based manufacturers.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9697>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
he expected the U.S. Trade deficit to fall by 15 billion to 20
billion dlrs in 1987.
    Commenting on the deficit during an interview on Cable News
Network, Baker said "I think you're going to see a 15 to 20
billion dlr reduction this year." The deficit was 170 billion
dlrs in 1986.
    Baker noted that the benefits of a weaker currency take 12
to 18 months to affect the trade balance, and said it is now 18
months since the Plaza agreement to lower the dollar's value.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9704>
The European Community (EC) considers
talks on agricultural trade reform to be inseperable from talks
on other trade reform in the present GATT round, Willy de
Clercq, external relations commissioner of the EC, said.
    He told reporters here the EC would not bow to pressure to
reach an early, seperate agreement on agricultural trade.
    He said the EC wanted to stick to the four-year schedule
agreed by members of the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
(GATT) in Punta del Este, Uruguay, last year. That included
agricultural trade liberalisation for the first time in the
lengthy program to re-negotiate the GATT.
    Other trade issues being discussed in the current GATT
round include reform of trade in merchandise and services.
    De Clercq is on his way to China after attending a two-day
conference for 22 GATT trade ministers held in New Zealand.
    Several of those ministers criticised the EC for what they
saw as restrictive agricultural trade practices and called for
urgent reforms. U.S. Trade representative, Clayton Yeutter,
also said it was important agreement on agricultural trade
reform was reached as early as possible.
    But de Clercq said the GATT program had been reached after
long and hard negotiations, and the EC did not want changes.
    "We just want to stick to the agreement which was reached,
and that was very clear -- that the new round would be one
undertaking. It is a global negotiation with no two tracks, no
fast track, no slow track. It has just one track, the track -
and that's all," de Clercq said.
    "If you start selecting priorities, your priority is not my
priority. We say that agriculture is urgent, but it's not the
only urgent thing," he said.
    He said the Punte del Este agreement had taken eight months
to prepare and eight days of negotiations.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9712>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita
said it is in Japan's national interest to make greater efforts
to reduce its trade surplus.
    He told business executives the most important issues for
the world economy are the correction of international trade
imbalances and a solution to the world debt problem.
    To this end, Japan and the U.S. Must make medium- and
long-term efforts to alter economic structures which have
expanded the trade gap between the two nations. World economic
growth and therefore an expansion of debtor countries' export
markets are needed to solve the debt issue, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9729>
The Federal Statistics Office will
today publish trade and current account figures for February, a
spokeswoman said in reply to queries.
    In January the current account surplus provisionally
narrowed to 4.9 billion marks from 8.5 billion in December. The
provisional January trade surplus narrowed to 7.2 billion marks
from a record 11.6 billion marks the month before.
    In February 1986 the current account had shown a 6.85
billion mark surplus and the trade account a 6.84 billion
surplus.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9749>
West Germany's current account
surplus widened to a provisional 6.6 billion marks in February
from a slightly downwards revised 4.8 billion in January, a
spokeswoman for the Federal Statistics Office said.
    The trade surplus in February widened to a provisional 10.4
billion marks from 7.2 billion in January, she added.
    The Statistics Office had originally put the January
current account surplus at 4.9 billion marks.
    The February trade surplus was well up on the 6.84 billion
mark surplus posted in the same month of 1986. But the current
account surplus was down slightly from the 6.85 billion surplus
recorded in February 1986.
    A Statistics Office statement said the widening of the
February current account surplus compared with January was due
to seasonal factors. Neither the trade nor current account
figures are seasonally adjusted.
    February imports, measured in terms of value, totalled
32.11 billion marks, a decline of 10 pct against February 1986
but a rise of 5.5 pct against January.
    Exports in February, also in value terms, totalled 42.56
billion marks, 0.5 pct less than in February 1986 but up 13 pct
compared with January.
    The Statistics Office said it was not yet able to calculate
the real change in exports and imports in February. But for
comparison purposes it noted that in January the average value
of imports had fallen 15 pct year-on-year while the average
value of exports had declined by only 4.4 pct.
    Within the current account, the services account had 300
mln marks deficit, supplementary trade items a 200 mln mark
surplus while transfer payments posted a 3.7 billion mark
deficit.
    Taking the first two months of 1987 together, imports in
value terms fell 14 pct to 62.6 billion marks compared with a
year earlier. The value of exports totalled 80.2 billion marks,
a decline of 7.4 pct against the same months of 1986.
    The resulting trade surplus of 17.6 billion marks for
January/February compares with a cumulative surplus of 14.1
billion marks in the year-ago period.
    The cumulative current account surplus for January and
February 1987 totalled 11.3 billion marks against 11.4 billion
marks a year earlier, the Statistics Office said.
    Bank economists said the rise in the February trade surplus
reflected an improvement in the terms of trade as well as
seasonal factors. The Federal Statistics Office said earlier
this week that February import prices fell 0.7 pct against
January while export prices were unchanged.
    "The rise in the nominal figures masks a lower export trend
that is not expected to change for several months at least,"
said an economist. He said the nominal trade surplus for 1987
as a whole is likely to fall only slightly from the record
112.2 billion marks in 1986 but other economists said the
surplus could fall to around 80 billion marks.
    An economist at the Bank fuer Gemeinwirtschaft (BfG) in
Frankfurt said a two-month comparison of trade figures gave a
more accurate picture of West Germany's trade position.
    He noted the 17.6 billion mark surplus for January and
February together was lower than the 21.6 billion mark surplus
posted in November and December.
    "The trend is clearly lower," he said.
    This economist, who declined to be named, said the February
rise was also partly explained by special factors in January,
when there had been a number of public holidays as well as
extremely cold weather, both of which hindered trade.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9751>
Treasurer Paul Keating forecast
economic growth at slightly under two pct in the financial year
ending June this year, down from the 2.25 pct forecast
contained in the 1986/87 budget delivered last August.
    Australia's terms of trade also fell, by 18 pct, over the
past two years, he told Parliament. Terms of trade are the
difference between import and export price indexes.
    Despite the figures, the budget forecast of about 1.75 pct
annual growth in employment would be met, Keating said.
    Unemployment is currently at 8.2 pct of the workforce.
    "This government is dragging Australia through a trading
holocaust the kind of which we have not seen since the Second
World War," Keating said.
    "We are not pushing this place into a recession. We are not
only holding our gains on unemployment, we are bringing
unemployment down," he said, adding that the government had help
the country avoid recession.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9763>
Firms need not be pessimistic about export
prospects even though foreign markets have become more
difficult because of the mark's strength the Economics Ministry
said.
     The ministry's parliamentary state secretary Ludolf Georg
von Wartenberg, told a business conference German exports could
start rising again in real terms during 1987, reversing the
lower export trend which emerged in mid-1986.
    But even if the turnaround did not occur, there would be no
need to worry about the economy as long as the weakness of
exports did not affect currently good domestic demand.
    Von Wartenberg said consumer demand remained quite good but
noted there had been a cooling in the investment climate. "This
is certainly a reason for heightened watchfulness but not for
stimulative steps," he said.
    The best way for Bonn to help its exporters is to work
actively to promote free world trade, he added.
    Von Wartenberg said the economy still had good export
opportunities. Price alone was not the only factor in
international competitiveness, he said, adding German firms
have a reputation for high quality standards, prompt delivery
times and good service.
    Von Wartenberg said the government was in a difficult
position on its trade figures.  It faced international pressure
to reduce its trade surplus, but West Germans were worried
about the effect of the mark's strength on the country's
exporters.
    Reports about the trade surplus, especially overseas,
tended to concentrate on nominal trade figures, which rose to a
record 112.2 billion marks in 1986, he said. But this rise was
due entirely to the lower value of imports caused by the
decline of both the dollar and oil prices. German exports have
in fact been falling in real terms for sometime, he said.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9770>
Britain's visible trade deficit narrowed
to a seasonally adjusted provisional 224 mln stg in February
from 527 mln in January, The Trade and Industry Department
said.
    The current account balance of payments in February showed
a seasonally adjusted provisional surplus of 376 mln stg
compared with a surplus of 73 mln in January.
    Invisibles in February were put provisionally at a 600 mln
surplus, the same as in January.
    Seasonally adjusted, imports rose in February to 7.16
billion stg from 6.73 billion in January. Exports rose to a
record 6.93 billion last month from 6.20 billion in January.
    Trade Department officials said the improvement in
Britain's current account contrasted with most private
forecasts and they attributed much of the strength to imports
rising less quickly in February than might otherwise have been
expected.
    The Department said exceptionally cold weather in January
reduced exports that month and that there had been an element
of catching up in the February figures.
    The seasonally adjusted volume index, base 1980, a guide to
underlying non-oil trade, showed exports rising to 131.0 from
114.6 in January and imports rising to 142.2 from 136.5.
    The value of British oil exports in February rose to 751
mln stg from 723 mln in Jnauary while oil imports rose to 425
mln from 352 mln.
    The Department said the upward trend in non-oil export
volume continues and the underlying level of non-oil import
volume seems to have stablised.
    The Departnment said exports to the U.S. May be benefiting
from fluctuations in the mark and yen exchange rates.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9777>
Bank of Japan Governor Satoshi Sumita
said it is in Japan's national interest to make greater efforts
to reduce its trade surplus.
    He told business executives the most important issues for
the world economy are the correction of international trade
imbalances and a solution to the world debt problem.
    To this end, Japan and the U.S. Must make medium- and
long-term efforts to alter economic structures which have
expanded the trade gap between the two nations. World economic
growth and therefore an expansion of debtor countries' export
markets are needed to solve the debt issue, he added.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9784>
The release of U.K. February trade data
showing that the current account surplus was a provisional 376
mln stg, up from a 73 mln surplus in January, has boosted hopes
of an early cut in interest rates, analysts said.
    Market forecasts had been for a worse outcome, with
expectations of a deficit in visible trade averaging about 750
mln stg, against the official figure of 224 mln stg, sharply
narrower than January's 527 mln deficit.
    "The figures are unreservedly good," Chase Manhattan
Securities economist Andrew Wroblewski said.
    Sterling rebounded on the trade figures, reversing a weaker
morning trend, to stand at 72.1 pct of its trade weighted index
against a basket of currencies at midday, unchanged from
yesterday's close but 0.3 points above the 1100 GMT level.
    The market had feared that a deteriorating non-oil trade
pattern would undermine international support for sterling,
which has been the motor behind the recent fall in U.K.
Interest rates. Money market sources said the market had begun
to doubt that a widely expected drop in bank base lending rates
to 9.5 pct from the present 10.0 pct was really on the cards.
    But sentiment now looks to have turned about again.
    There now looks to be no danger that the Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson's forecast of a 1987 current account
deficit of 2.5 billion stg will be exceeded, Wroblewski said.
    Seasonally adjusted figures showed imports rose in February
to 7.16 billion stg from 6.73 billion in January.
    Exports rose to a record 6.93 billion from 6.20 billion.
    However, Chris Tinker, U.K. Analyst at brokers Phillips and
Drew said the faster rise in exports than imports would prove
partly aberrational in coming months. He forecast the
Chancellor's Budget tax cuts would increase consumer
expenditure on imported goods.
    However, Warburg Securities economist Ian Harwood said his
firm was sharply revising its 1987 current account deficit
forecast in the light of the latest data, cutting one billion
stg off the expected full year total to about 1.75 billion stg.
    He said news of strong growth in exports of non-oil goods
confirmed recent bullish surveys among members of the
Confederation of British Industry.
    The growth in imports appears to be flattening, even if
January's bad weather had curbed consumer spending on overseas
goods and import-intensive stock building among manufacturers,
Harwood said.
    U.K. Government bonds, or gilts, surged by more than 1/2
point on the better-than-expected news, as earlier worries
about the figures evaporated.
    Sterling peaked at a high of 1.6075 dlrs, before settling
to a steady 1.6050 about 1300 GMT, nearly a cent higher than
the European low of 1.5960.
    However, analysts noted that the turnabout in market
sentiment still looks highly vulnerable to political news.
    Morning weakness in sterling and the gilt market was
largely attributed to a newspaper opinion poll showing that the
Conservative government's support was slipping.
    LONDON, March 26 - The Bank of England said it provided 15
mln stg in assistance to the money market this morning, buying
bank bills in band two at 9-13/16 pct.
    Earlier the Bank revised its money market liquidity
forecast from a flat position to a deficit of around 350 mln
stg.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9795>
U.S. Treasury Secretary James Baker
said that he opposes a Federal tax increase to help reduce the
budget deficit and favors spending cuts instead.
    "I don't think it's (a tax increase) is a very good idea
and I'm quite confident that President Reagan doesn't think
it's a very good idea," Baker said in an interview on Cable
News Network's "Moneyline" television program.
    He said U.S. taxpayers are taxed at a rate of 19 pct of GNP
which is traditionally where it has been, but the Federal
Government is spending at a rate of 24 pct of GNP. Baker said
spending cuts are clearly the best way to cut budget deficits.
    Baker said he opposed a stock transactions tax proposed by
House Speaker Jim Wright, D-Tex, or other special taxes.
    "The stock transfer tax would be a particularly unfortunate
approach to take," the Treasury Secretary said. He said the
United States has some of the most efficient capital markets in
the world and new taxes would impair efficiency.
    On the international front, Baker said banks must do more
lending to developing countries. He was questioned about this
after the Standard and Poor's Corp downgrading today of the
debt of six major money center bank holding companies, largely
because of their heavy developing nation loan exposure.
    Baker said that developing countries must adopt free market
economic policies such as in the United States. He said capital
flows will be required to support the needed reforms in the
economic systems of those countries.
    The money must come either through equity or debt and Baker
said that developing nations' "investment regimes do not
support enough equity investment, so you've got to have some
debt there."
    Commenting on the U.S. trade deficit, Baker said "I think
you're going to see a 15 to 20 billion dlr reduction this
year."
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9816>
Treasury Secretary James Baker said
he expected the U.S. Trade deficit to fall by 15 billion to 20
billion dlrs in 1987.
    Commenting on the deficit during an interview on Cable News
Network, Baker said "I think you're going to see a 15 to 20
billion dlr reduction this year." The deficit was 170 billion
dlrs in 1986.
    Baker noted that the benefits of a weaker currency take 12
to 18 months to affect the trade balance, and said it is now 18
months since the Plaza agreement to lower the dollar's value.
            
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9821>
Britain's visible trade deficit narrowed
to a seasonally adjusted provisional 224 mln stg in February
from 527 mln in January, The Trade and Industry Department
said.
    The current account balance of payments in February showed
a seasonally adjusted provisional surplus of 376 mln stg
compared with a surplus of 73 mln in January.
    Invisibles in February were put provisionally at a 600 mln
surplus, the same as in January.
    Seasonally adjusted, imports rose in February to 7.16
billion stg from 6.73 billion in January. Exports rose to a
record 6.93 billion last month from 6.20 billion in January.
    Trade Department officials said the improvement in
Britain's current account contrasted with most private
forecasts and they attributed much of the strength to imports
rising less quickly in February than might otherwise have been
expected.
    The Department said exceptionally cold weather in January
reduced exports that month and that there had been an element
of catching up in the February figures.
    The seasonally adjusted volume index, base 1980, a guide to
underlying non-oil trade, showed exports rising to 131.0 from
114.6 in January and imports rising to 142.2 from 136.5.
    The value of British oil exports in February rose to 751
mln stg from 723 mln in Jnauary while oil imports rose to 425
mln from 352 mln.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9836>
Hong Kong recorded a 3.51 billion
H.K. Dlr deficit in February after a 2.54 billion dlr surplus
in January as imports climbed and exports slid, the Census and
Statistics Department said.
    The deficit compared with a deficit of 1.76 billion dlrs in
February 1986.
    Imports rose to 24.12 billion dlrs, up 2.6 pct from
January's 23.52 billion dlrs and 42 pct above the 16.98 billion
dlrs recorded in February 1986.
    Total exports for the month fell 20.9 pct to 20.61 billion
dlrs from 26.06 billion in January.
    February exports were still 35.4 pct above the 15.22
billion dlrs recorded in the same month last year.
    Re-exports, the territory's traditional entrepot trade,
outpaced domestically produced exports for the first time since
March 1985.
    Re-exports fell 11.6 pct to 10.62 billion dlrs from 12.0
billion dlrs in January but were 54 pct above February 1986's
6.88 billion dlrs. Domestic exports slid 28.9 pct to 9.99
billion dlrs from January's 14.05 billion dlrs but were up 19.7
pct over the 8.35 billion dlrs recorded in February 1986.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9847>
One hundred members of Britain's ruling
Conservative Party have signed a motion calling for trade
sanctions against Japan to force Tokyo to open its domestic
market to British goods.
    The government announced last week that Japan had a 5.9
billion dlr trade surplus with Britain in 1986.
    The Department of Trade and Industry said the government
was drawing up contingency plans to force Japan into opening up
its domestic markets but a spokesman said such moves were very
much a last resort.
    Ideas being considered included blocking Japanese companies
from trading in Britain and revoking licenses of Japanese
operations in the London financial district.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9848>
The release of U.K. February trade data
showing that the current account surplus was a provisional 376
mln stg, up from a 73 mln surplus in January, has boosted hopes
of an early cut in interest rates, analysts said.
    Market forecasts had been for a worse outcome, with
expectations of a deficit in visible trade averaging about 750
mln stg, against the official figure of 224 mln stg, sharply
narrower than January's 527 mln deficit.
    "The figures are unreservedly good," Chase Manhattan
Securities economist Andrew Wroblewski said.
    Sterling rebounded on the trade figures, reversing a weaker
morning trend, to stand at 72.1 pct of its trade weighted index
against a basket of currencies at midday, unchanged from
yesterday's close but 0.3 points above the 1100 GMT level.
    The market had feared that a deteriorating non-oil trade
pattern would undermine international support for sterling,
which has been the motor behind the recent fall in U.K.
Interest rates. Money market sources said the market had begun
to doubt that a widely expected drop in bank base lending rates
to 9.5 pct from the present 10.0 pct was really on the cards.
    But sentiment now looks to have turned about again.
    There now looks to be no danger that the Chancellor of the
Exchequer Nigel Lawson's forecast of a 1987 current account
deficit of 2.5 billion stg will be exceeded, said Wroblewski.
    Seasonally adjusted figures showed that imports rose in
February to 7.16 billion stg from 6.73 billion in January.
    Exports rose to a record 6.93 billion from 6.20 billion.
    However, Chris Tinker, U.K. Analyst at brokers Phillips and
Drew said that the faster rise in exports than imports would
prove partly aberrational in coming months. He forecast the
Chancellor's Budget tax cuts would increase consumer expediture
on imported goods.
    However, Ian Harwood, economist at Warburg Securities, said
his firm was sharply revising its 1987 current account deficit
forecast in the light of the latest data, cutting one billion
stg off the expected full year total to about 1.75 billion stg.
    He said news of strong growth in exports of non-oil goods
confirmed recent bullish surveys among members of the
Confederation of British Industry.
    The growth in imports appears to be flattening, even if
January's bad weather had curbed consumer spending on overseas
goods and import-intensive stock building among manufactureres,
Harwood said.
    U.K. Government bonds, or gilts, surged by more than 1/2
point on the better-than-expected news, as earlier worries
about the figures evaporated.
    Sterling peaked at a high of 1.6075 dlrs, before settling
to a steady 1.6050 dlrs about 1300 GMT, nearly a cent higher
than the European low of 1.5960.
    However, analysts noted that the turnabout in market
sentiment still looks highly vulnerable to political news.
    Morning weakness in sterling and the gilt market was
largely attributed to a newspaper opinion poll showing that the
Conservative government's support was slipping.
    The Marplan poll, published in "Today," showed Conservative
support had fallen to 36 pct, from 38 pct last month, while the
Alliance of Liberals and Social Democrats had rallied to 31
pct, from 21 pct, to run neck and neck with the Labour Party,
whose own support fell from 38 pct.
    The poll was taken after the Budget, which was greeted
enthusiastically by financial markets but seems to have left
the voters indifferent, political observers said.
    Another regular poll is due tomorrow, and eonomists warn
that today's improved sentiment could be dented if support for
Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher slips again.
    This upsetting of the markets' political perceptions, which
are all but discounting a Conservative victory in the upcoming
general election, made them more sensitive to the trade data,
Harwood said. "The news did come as a very, very substantial
relief," he said.
    However, on the interest rate front, economists caution
that Lawson might be wary of leaving sterling vulnerable by
encouraging another base rate fall. They noted Lawson had
already got an inflation-reducing cut in mortgage rates in
response to lower base rates, so domestic political reasons for
lower rates have been curtailed.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9849>
South Korea is studying a plan to buy
more coal from the United States and to start importing Alaskan
crude oil to help reduce its huge trade surplus with the United
States, Energy Ministry officials said today.
    They said the plan would dominate discussions at two-day
energy talks between officials of the two countries in
Washington from April 1.
    Huh Sun-yong, who will attend the talks with three other
Seoul government officials, told Reuters that Seoul was
"positively considering buying a certain amount of Alaskan oil
beginning this year as part of our government's overall plan to
reduce a widening trade gap between the two countries."
    Huh said however that South Korean refineries considered
the Alaskan oil economically uncompetitive.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9864>
Treasury Assistant Secretary David
Mulford reaffirmed U.S. backing for the Paris Agreement among
six industrial nations to cooperate closely to foster exchange
rate stability around current levels.
    In testimony prepared for delivery before a Senate banking
subcommittee, Mulford said there was broad recognition in Paris
that "further substantial exchange rate shifts could damage
growth and adjustment prospects."
    But he also said while there are clear understandings among
the countries regarding cooperation, "We have refrained from
establishing a system of target zones or ranges."
    Mulford also said the six nations have not spelled out the
way in which they intend to deal with possible market
developments.
    He said governments must retain flexibility in dealing with
exchange market pressures and efforts to establish rigid
exchange rate objectives "or to specify too precisely the goals
of intervention" would hurt official attempts to react to
market pressures, he said.
    Accordingly, Mulford said setting specific currency
objectives and intervention to achieve those objectives would
be counterproductive.
    Commenting on the trade deficit, Mulford reiterated the
Treasury position that the current account deficit will decline
from 148 billion dlrs last year to around 130 billion dlrs this
year, due to the exchange rate adjustments of the past 18
months.
    But he added trade imbalances would also be corrected by
commitments from West Germany and Japan to stimulate their
economies and by U.S. efforts to cut the budget deficit and
enhance U.S. competitiveness.
    He also said some newly industrialized countries should let
their currencies appreciate.
 Reuter
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9897>
Treasurer Paul Keating forecast
economic growth at slightly under two pct in the financial year
ending June this year, down from the 2.25 pct forecast
contained in the 1986/87 budget delivered last August.
    Australia's terms of trade also fell, by 18 pct, over the
past two years, he told Parliament. Terms of trade are the
difference between import and export price indexes.
    Despite the figures, the budget forecast of about 1.75 pct
annual growth in employment would be met, Keating said.
    Unemployment is currently at 8.2 pct of the workforce.
    "This government is dragging Australia through a trading
holocaust the kind of which we have not seen since the Second
World War," Keating said.
    "We are not pushing this place into a recession. We are not
only holding our gains on unemployment, we are bringing
unemployment down," he said, adding that the government had help
the country avoid recession.
 REUTER
</BODY>
<BODY DOCID=9957>
Treasury Assistant Secretary David
Mulford said he did not believe that West Germany and Japan
have yet carried out their international responsibilities.
    "I do not believe they have up to this time," Mulford told
a Senate banking subcommittee.
    He said that for the U.S. trade deficit to continue
improving in the next two years, "We need more policy actions"
across the entire front of U.S. trade relations, including
Canada and the newly-industrialized countries (NICS).
    In particular, he said, efforts by South Korea and Taiwan
to strengthen their currencies were still disappointing.
    Mulford also said that OECD nations need to grow an average
three pct to help resolve the international debt crisis.
    He noted that Japanese and European imports from Latin
nations were significantly smaller than imports into the U.S.
    He stressed both Germany and Japan must continue to take
economic and structural measures to ensure stronger sustained
economic growth.
 Reuter
</BODY>
